 
 
Oddities and Humor
 
 
Beginning a new thread, a potpourri of items when they strike my fancy - or yours, if you want to join in.

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8jiBfYLxIs8 
 
 
Going the rounds on facebook:
It's better to have loved and lost.......than to have stayed with an idiot.
 
 
Posted by bear on facebook:
Although the Bible says do not tempt the Lord thy God.... I am going to wash my truck this afternoon and would like for Him to prove He loves me by sending newly separated Halle Berry to me topless in a thong to assist. Ball's in your court Lord.
 
 
World No1 John Higgins is suspended from snooker tournaments after reportedly agreeing to take a bribe.
 
 
Three Houston police officers have been assigned desk duties as city and federal authorities scrutinize the arrest of a local Chinese diplomat who says police hit him in the face during a traffic stop last weekend at the Chinese Consulate.

The Chinese government responded to last Saturday's arrest of Houston deputy Consul General Boren Yu, who said a security camera recorded the incident, with a call for a speedy investigation. China also noted that “solemn exchanges” had passed between China and the U.S. as a result of the incident. Under the Vienna Convention, local law officers are prohibited from entering foreign diplomatic offices in all but the most extreme circumstances.

Mayor Annise Parker, in announcing the officers' re­assignment on Friday, praised Police Chief Charles McClelland's handling of the case.

“This is important, as Houston has the third-largest number of consulates in the country,” Parker said. “We cherish our international residents and want to assure them they are welcome in our city.”

Reassigned to desk duties were Central Patrol Division officers Timothy Riley Jr., Quang Tran and Victor Olivares. Riley has been with the department since 2008; Tran and Olivares since last year.

Cuffed, but later released
In an interview Friday, Yu said he was traveling with his wife in a consulate vehicle when he saw a patrol car with flashing lights behind him. Yu said he stopped and waited several minutes, but drove off when the officer stayed in his car and took no apparent action.

Yu said he drove to the Chinese Consulate in the 3400 block of Montrose. When Yu drove through the consulate's automatic garage gate, the police car followed him.

Yu said he “made it clear” he was a Chinese diplomat, but the officer handcuffed him anyway. Yu said the officer struck him in the face, but he did not address the circumstances or specify when the alleged assault took place. Yu also suffered hand and neck injuries, according to a co-worker at the consulate.
 
 
 
 
 
There are some people who you just shouldn't mess with, and one of them is 'Golden Girls' goddess Betty White. In the wee hours of Tuesday night/Wednesday morning, a dastardly hoax was perpetrated in the comments area of popular gossip blog Oh No They Didn't, where a screen-shot of a fake TMZ article was posted claiming the actress had died.

How'd she perish? The faux article said it was a mixture of drug abuse and foul play.

From there, the rumor spread like wildfire and quickly became a hot trend on Twitter and Google. Countering the silliness, White's rabid fans began posting whimsical #BettyWhiteFacts ("Betty White turned Tiger down"... "Betty White taught MJ how to moonwalk") instead.

Of course, readers should have immediately known it was a hoax; the cause of death was about as believable as White's 'Golden Girls' character Rose Nylund being awarded the Nobel Prize in Science.

A blog called The Cutting Room Floor got to the bottom of the hoax early Wednesday. Though commenters on Oh No They Didn't claimed they had seen the article on TMZ, no such piece could be found on the popular Web site's homepage. Also, the font used in the fake did not match the one used by TMZ.

The offending post was eventually deleted by Oh No They Didn't, but the damage was done, and White's fans are calling for blood. Some common reactions on Twitter:

@loganX2: dear internet a betty white death hoax is never a joke!! thanks// i'll kill the internet for those remarks. Ordering a hit.

@LexiDV: Who would start a rumor Betty White died? Sick. May Sophia Petrillo curse you.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

betty white's revenge :

 
The night before Mother’s Day is going to be the mother of all Saturday Nights: TV icon Betty White will be the May 8 guest host of Saturday Night Live, with musical guest Jay-Z and a cast reunion of former female SNL stars Tina Fey, Amy Poehler, Maya Rudolph, Molly Shannon and Rachel Dratch.

 
 
 
 
 
 
@Francis,

scientists hard at work.........

 

...... and they found the answer !
 
 
@edgarblythe,

I think a possible wind spill is much better then the disaster of a mass blinding by a solar farm catastrophe!
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Very true and insightful.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

I try to use my power for the good of the people.
 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Sure, just keep things direct or use alternate humor (for watts worth)..
 
 
@Francis,

francis was very attentive in science class !

 
 
 
From the site called Info Please:

The ear finger, digitus auricularis"i.e. the little finger. The four fingers are the index finger, the middle finger, the ring finger, and the ear finger. In French, le doigt auriculaire. The little finger is so called because it can, from its diminutive size, be most easily introduced into the conduit of the ear.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

edgar :
pls tell newt gingrich to use the EAR finger next time !

 
 
 
@hamburgboy,

That bastard !
 
 
As you sit before the computer, lift up your right foot. Make clockwise circles with it. Simultaneously and at the same time even draw a six with your right finger. You will not be able to stop the foot from reversing direction.
 
 
BE KIND TO NURSES. They keep doctors from accidentally killing you
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Why not a sperm whale.

 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=44f5VH4DLmg&feature=related 

You're right about the foot, buddy
 
 
Right whales are more prettier.
 
 
I seen a stroy that mammoths had antifreeze blood.
 
 
Another group to like on FB: A paper cut is a tree's last revenge
 
 
@littlek,

I once knew a user on a forum, called himself screamingtree. Wondered for a long time what happened when he left.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
Posted by bear on facebook:
Although the Bible says do not tempt the Lord thy God.... I am going to wash my truck this afternoon and would like for Him to prove He loves me by sending newly separated Halle Berry to me topless in a thong to assist. Ball's in your court Lord.
 

Perhaps He loves Halle Berry too and will thus refrain from responding to the challenge.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
As you sit before the computer, lift up your right foot. Make clockwise circles with it. Simultaneously and at the same time even draw a six with your right finger. You will not be able to stop the foot from reversing direction.

 

  I just tried this, and you're right!    
 
 
@Reyn,

I'm always right, you know.
 
 
@ragnel,

 
 
Posted by bear on facebook:
Although the Bible says do not tempt the Lord thy God.... I am going to wash my truck this afternoon and would like for Him to prove He loves me by sending newly separated Halle Berry to me topless in a thong to assist. Ball's in your court Lord.
 

Perhaps He loves Halle Berry too and will thus refrain from responding to the challenge.

 

But, perhaps bear and Halle had an enjoyable time of it.
 
 
@Reyn,

 
 
As you sit before the computer, lift up your right foot. Make clockwise circles with it. Simultaneously and at the same time even draw a six with your right finger. You will not be able to stop the foot from reversing direction.

 

  I just tried this, and you're right!    

 

Ah HA!

I just did it!

all that kundalini finally pays off.
 
 
I found this funny for all the wrong reasons, but still, I just can't believe this is serious. Just about choked when I saw the commercial on T.V. last night.
 https://shakeweight.com/flare/next 
 
 
@Ceili,

That's funny. I bet they sell a million.
 
 
@chai2,

That's not fair.
 
 
Teddy Roosevelt wrote 37 books. Anybody read them?
 
 
@Ceili,

Oh yeah! oh yeah! work it baby, work it OUT!
 
 
@dadpad,

someone really " got a high " - at least momentarily......

 
Toronto " The Canadian Press
Published on Sunday, May. 02, 2010 3:30PM EDT

Last updated on Sunday, May. 02, 2010 5:35PM EDT

.A man who climbed a tree during a downtown Toronto rally to legalize marijuana was taken to hospital after falling out of the tree.

The man was perched about 20 to 30 metres up the tree when he was spotted by people attending the rally in Queen's Park on Saturday afternoon.

A bystander called for emergency crews but the tree swayed in the wind and the man fell before help could arrive. The man's name and age are unknown.

The fall occurred during the 12th annual Global Marijuana March, which organizers say attracted thousands of people.

Emergency crews at the scene thought the man may have suffered several internal injuries, and they took him to St. Michael's Hospital.

Toronto police say the man suffered a broken nose and several lacerations to his face.

 
 
 
Betty White: "No to nudity." - Thank all that's holy (edgarblythe)

Important Mother's Day Reminder: Betty White will finally make her long-awaited "Saturday Night Live" debut this coming weekend, along with musical guest Jay-Z.

"Isn't that something?" White, speaking on Monday's Today show, said of the guest-star pairing, also predicting -- modestly -- that the rapper will be the one to help boost Saturday's ratings. "He's tremendous."

And while there will be singing, dancing and comedy come Saturday night, White has put her foot down: No nudity.

Well, "Very little nudity," she promised "Today's" Meredith Vieira. "Here and there" some nudity, she teased. "Mostly here."

"Golden Girls" favorite White, 88, landed the hosting gig after a fervent Facebook campaign by fans.
 
 
@hamburgboy,

High as Charlie Brown's kite.
 
 
(CookingLight.com) -- Some nutrition myths bounce around on crazy e-mail chain letters and pop up on goofy evening news reports. Others fuel the sale of rip-off diet books. Some are so accepted they seem hardwired into our brains. Take deep-fried foods, for example. They're universally bad for you, right? Well, no.

When we challenged ourselves to explore whether fried foods could be made healthy, we discovered that, when done properly, fried foods don't have to be forever banished from a healthy diet.

The exercise inspired us to take on some other ingrained nutrition misconceptions. We talked with leading nutrition researchers, chefs, and food scientists and did some sleuthing of our own to debunk 10 myths so you can enjoy many once-forbidden foods without that old familiar twinge of guilt.

CookingLight.com: Spring clean your diet

Myth 1. Added sugar is always bad for you.

Truth: Use the sweet stuff to ensure that sugar calories are far from "empty" calories.

Sugar is essential in the kitchen. Consider all that it does for baking, creating a tender cake crumb and ensuring crisp cookies. Then there's its role in creating airy meringue or soft-textured ice cream.

Keep in mind that other sweeteners like "natural" honey are basically refined sugar anyway and they are all metabolized by your body the same way, as 4 calories per gram. Sugar also balances the flavors in healthy foods that might not taste so great on their own. Don't go overboard, of course. Most health experts suggest that added sugar supply no more than 10 percent of your total calories -- about 200 in a 2,000-calorie diet.

Good news: A little sugar can go a long way.

Adding a wee bit of sugar to balance a too-tart tomato sauce is a good thing; so is a teaspoon of honey on a tart grapefruit half or in plain yogurt. "Add a little bit of sugar to help boost your intake of nutrient-rich foods by making them tastier," says Jackie Newgent, author of the All-Natural Diabetes Cookbook.

In this refreshing palate cleansing sorbet, sugar tames the tartness of grapefruit juice. And with just two ingredients, it could not be simpler to prepare. A serving delivers about two-thirds of your RDA for vitamin C, and only 145 calories.

CookingLight.com: 8 healthy office snacks

Myth 2. Eating eggs raises your cholesterol levels.

Truth: Dietary cholesterol found in eggs has little to do with the amount of cholesterol in your body.

The confusion can be boiled down to semantics: The same word, "cholesterol," is used to describe two different things. Dietary cholesterol the fat-like molecules in animal-based foods like eggs doesn't greatly affect the amount of cholesterol circulating in your bloodstream. Your body makes its own cholesterol, so it doesn't need much of the kind you eat. Instead, what fuels your body's cholesterol-making machine is certain saturated and trans fats. Eggs contain relatively small amounts of saturated fat. One large egg contains about 1.5 grams saturated fat, a fraction of the amount in the tablespoon of butter many cooks use to cook that egg in. So, cutting eggs out of your diet is a bad idea; they're a rich source of 13 vitamins and minerals.

Good news: Eggs of all kinds are fine.

The kind of cholesterol found in eggs doesn't affect the cholesterol in your blood, so go ahead and enjoy eggs for breakfast, lunch, or dinner, guilt-free. In healthy people, "the research with eggs has never shown any link of egg consumption with blood lipids or with risk of heart disease," says Don Layman, professor emeritus in the Department of Food Science and Human Nutrition at the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign.

Make this Mexican scrambled egg dish for dinner, brunch, or for a hearty breakfast. Leave all the seeds in the jalapeño if you want a spicier kick, adjust the hot pepper sauce to taste, and throw in your favorite add-ins to create a satisfying meal for four.

Myth 3: All saturated fats raise blood cholesterol.

Truth: New research shows that some saturated fats don't.

Just when we'd all gotten comfortable with the idea that there are good-for-you mono- and polyunsaturated fats (like those found in olive oil and walnuts), along comes new research calling into question the one principle most health professionals thought was sacrosanct: All saturated fat is bad.

Researchers have long known that there are many kinds of saturated fats, and they are handled differently by the body when consumed. Stearic acid, a type of saturated fat found naturally in cocoa, dairy products, meats, and poultry, as well as palm and coconut oils, does not raise harmful LDL cholesterol but boosts beneficial HDL cholesterol levels.

CookingLight.com: Color your palate

Good news: Saturated fat may be better than once thought.

Eating foods like coconut and chocolate that contain stearic acid, an HDL-cholesterol booster that may eventually be called the "good" saturated fat, is healthier than once thought. This is not a license to eat freely of anything containing stearic acid, though, because foods rich in any type of fat tend to be dense in calories, as well.

Given that both chocolate and coconut are not as "bad" as once thought, and given that they taste mighty good together, we baked up a batch of toasty, chocolaty treats to celebrate. Like all sweets with few other nutrients, though, they are treats perfectly healthy every once in a while.

Myth 4: The only heart-friendly alcohol is red wine.

Truth: Beer, wine, and liquors all confer the same health benefits.

The so-called French Paradox elevated red wine to health-food status when researchers thought it was the antioxidants in the drink that protected the foie gras- and cheese-loving French from heart disease.

More recent research, however, has shown that antioxidants aren't the answer after all. Alcohol, the ethanol itself, raises levels of protective HDL, or good cholesterol, which help protect against plaque buildup in the arteries and reduce clotting factors that contribute to heart attack and stroke, according to Eric Rimm, associate professor of nutrition at the School of Public Health at Harvard University. Any kind of beverage that contains alcohol, when consumed in moderation (and that means one to two drinks a day), helps reduce heart disease risk.

Myth 5: Adding salt to the pot adds sodium to the food.

Truth: Salt added to boiling water may actually make vegetables more nutritious.

Public health messages encouraging us to shake our salt-in-everything habits are, in general, good; sodium is a potential problem even for non-hypertensive people. But it's easy to overlook how sodium can actually help in recipes.

"Salt in the cooking water reduces the leaching of nutrients from vegetables into the water," says Harold McGee, author of On Food & Cooking. That means your blanched broccoli, green beans, or asparagus likely retains more nutrients. "It also speeds up the cooking process so you don't lose as many nutrients from overcooking." McGee recommends using about 1 teaspoon of salt per cup of water. The amount of sodium absorbed by the food is minuscule.

Myth 6: Fried foods are always too fatty.

Truth: Healthy deep-fried food is not an oxymoron.

Here's how frying works: When food is exposed to hot oil, the moisture inside boils and pushes to the surface and then out into the oil. As moisture leaves, it creates a barrier, minimizing oil absorption when the frying is done right. Meanwhile, the little oil that does penetrate the food's surface forms a crisp, tasty crust.

To keep foods from soaking up oil, fry according to recipe instructions. For most foods, 375°F is optimal. Oil temperatures that are too low will increase fat absorption. When we added tempura-coated vegetables to cooler-than-optimal oil, the result was greasy and inedible -- they absorbed more than 1 cup of oil instead of 1/3 cup. So, watch the oil temperature like a hawk using a candy/fry thermometer, and drain cooked foods on a paper towel for a minute or two before diving in.

Good news: You can have fried catfish and hush puppies, too.

Keep in mind that we're not giving fast-food fried chicken dinners with French fries a passing grade. Such a meal contains an entire day's worth of calories and sodium, thanks to large portion sizes, excessive breading, and globs of sauces.

CookingLight.com: Food court survival guide

But as an occasional treat, home-fried foods have a place in a healthy diet. Use in moderation by pairing with a sensible side or salad. Always choose a healthy oil that's low in saturated fat -- such as peanut, soybean, and canola oils -- and follow our step-by-step techniques to frying basics to keep calories and fat as low as possible. In the hands of a careful home cook, a delicately breaded and fried catfish fillet with a few hush puppies can be a perfectly reasonable and delicious dinner.

Myth 7: The more fiber you eat, the better.

Truth: Not all fibers are equally beneficial. Consider the source.

Yogurt doesn't naturally come with fiber, yet the grocery aisles now boast fiber-supplemented yogurt, along with cereals, energy bars, even water. What's the deal?

Fiber is a fad-food component right now, and manufacturers are isolating specific types of fiber and adding them to packaged foods to take advantage. But the science isn't entirely clear yet: Just as we're learning more about different types of fat, research is showing how complex fiber is as well.

We now know that different fibers have different functions (wheat bran helps move foods along; oat bran lowers cholesterol; inulin supports healthy gut bacteria). Some experts are skeptical that the so-called faux-fiber foods offer the same beneficial effect as naturally fiber-rich ones like whole grains, vegetables, fruits, and legumes.

CookingLight: Dietitian-approved 12 healthy snacks

Good news: Fiber-rich whole foods satisfy hunger.

While it's true that only half of us eat the fiber we need for good health, eating processed foods with added fiber doesn't get us off the hook. Fact is, most processed foods lack a bevy of vitamins, minerals, and phytonutrients. Eating fiber-rich whole foods is the best way to gain this essential component of you diet.

In this recipe, whole-grain wheat berries are chewy, mild, and packed with fiber. Dressing the hot wheat berries in a homemade spicy-sweet vinaigrette and letting stand for 20 minutes infuses them with intense flavor. And more good news: This fiber- and protein-rich salad will curb hunger pains, something packaged foods can't always deliver on.

Myth 8: You should always remove chicken skin before eating.

Truth: You can enjoy a skin-on chicken breast without blowing your sat-fat budget.

Half the pleasure of eating roast chicken comes from the gloriously crisp, brown skin that seems to melt in your mouth. Yet the skinless, boneless chicken breast -- one of the more boring protein sources on Earth -- became the health-conscious cook's gold standard somewhere along the way. Fortunately, the long-standing command to strip poultry of its skin before eating doesn't hold up under a nutritional microscope. A 12-ounce bone-in, skin-on chicken breast half contains just 2.5 grams of saturated fat and 50 calories more than its similarly portioned skinless counterpart.

Good news: You can splurge with skin-on chicken from time to time.

A chicken breast will always be lean -- skinned or not. What's more, 55 percent of the fat in the chicken skin is monounsaturated -- the heart-healthy kind you want more of, says Amy Myrdal Miller, program director for Strategic Initiatives at The Culinary Institute of America at Greystone.

CookingLight.com: Big gains, small steps

So if you and your family are tired of plain skinless, boneless chicken breasts, splurge on a skin-on option like this oregano- and lime-scented dish. A quick pan sauce made from some of the delectable pan drippings will make your regular chicken dinner a lot more interesting and appetizing.

Myth 9: Organic foods are more nutritious than conventional.

If you buy organic because you believe that sustainable farming supports the health of the soil, the work of small farmers, or the well-being of livestock, that's all good. And you may find it more tasty. However, it's not accurate to also promote organic as inherently more nutritious. Researchers at the London School of Hygiene & Tropical Medicine provided the most comprehensive review of organic foods to date.

Their conclusion: No significant nutritional difference exists between conventional and organic crops and livestock. A good radish by any other name is still a radish. There is, of course, still the issue of trace amounts of pesticides or herbicides -- wash conventional produce carefully.

Myth 10: Cooking olive oil destroys its health benefits.

Truth: Even delicate extra-virgin oils can take the heat without sacrificing nutrition.

This one has been kicking around ever since olive oil became a "good" fat: Cook with premium versions and you heat away the healthful properties. It simply isn't true.

First of all, heart-healthy mono-unsaturated fats aren't unfavorably altered by heat. They survive a sauté intact. Now, research is showing that other plant-based compounds -- the elements that likely give olive oils their complex flavor profiles as well as other healthful properties -- can also stand up to standard cooking procedures. They're surprisingly stable, as long as the oil isn't heated past its smoking point, which for extra-virgin olive oil is pretty high, about 405°F.

Good news: Olive oil can take the heat

As long as oil is kept below its smoking point, flavor and nutrition are intact. More important is how you store the oil. Fats and phytonutrients stay stable for up to two years in unopened opaque bottles stored at room temperature and away from light. Heat, light, and air drastically affect stability. Store oil in a room-temp cupboard, and use within six months.

In this simple side dish, extra-virgin olive oil adds great fruity flavor, and sautéing over high heat doesn't burn away the oil's healthful antioxidants.
 
 
Geologists: 'We May Be Slowly Running Out Of Rocks'Article

RALEIGH, NC"A coalition of geologists are challenging the way we look at global stone reserves, claiming that, unless smarter methods of preservation are developed, mankind will eventually run out of rocks.
Enlarge Image
Geologists theorize that areas like this may have once been filled with rocks.
"If we do not stop using them up at our current rate, rocks as we know them will be a thing of the past," renowned geologist Henry Kaiser said at a press conference Tuesday. "Igneous, metamorphic, even sedimentary: all of them could be gone in as little as 500,000 years."
"Think about it," Kaiser added. "When was the last time you even saw a boulder?"
The scientists warned that, although people have long considered the world's rock supply to be inexhaustible, it has not created a significant number of new rocks since the planet cooled some 3.5 billion years ago. Moreover, the earth's rocks have been very slowly depleting in the last century due to growing demand for fireplace mantels, rock gardens, gravel, and paperweights.
Kaiser claims that humanity has "wreaked havoc" on the earth's stones by picking them up, carrying them around, and displacing them from their natural habitat.
"A rock can take millions of years to form, but it only takes a second for someone to skip a smooth pebble into a lake, and then it is gone." Dr. Kaiser said. "Perhaps these thoughtless rock-skippers don't care if they leave our planet completely devoid of rocks, but what about our children? Don't they deserve the chance to hold a rock and toss it up and down a few times?"
Continued Kaiser, "We are on a collision course to a world without rocks."
 
 
Publishers Clearing House: "How do you want your winnings; in one lump sum, or yearly payments?"
 
 
Where did they find the girl who does the Progressive advertisements?
 
 
@edgarblythe,

greetings from :

 

why do you not want to be a winner ?    
 
 
I want to win it honestly: With lottery tickets.
 
 
Phone conversation:

Last year I replaced all the windows in my house with that expensive double-pane energy efficient kind, and today, I got a call from the contractor who installed them. He was complaining that the work had been completed a whole year ago and I still hadn't paid for them.

Hellloooo,............just because I'm blonde doesn't mean that I am automatically stupid. So, I told him just what his fast talking sales guy had told me last year, that in ONE YEAR these windows would pay for themselves!

"Helllooooo? It's been a year!" I told him. There was only silence at the other end of the line, so I finally just hung up. He never called back. I bet he felt like an idiot.
 
 
Re: the video about sperm at the start of this thread.
Did the male presenter really say what i think he said right at the very end after the blackout?
 
 
Sounded like it to mois.
 
 
Hugo Chavez, the Venezuelan president well known for his marathon TV addresses to the nation, has taken to Twitter to share his thoughts.

After he promised to "let loose" on Tuesday night, a Spanish-language tweet duly appeared on his new chavezcandanga account 14 minutes after midnight.

It was a simple message to say he was off on a working trip to Brazil.

By morning the leftist leader, a divisive figure at home and abroad, had nearly 29,000 followers on Twitter.
 
 
@Ceili,

Oh jeeze.

LOL

They have GOT to be kidding.
 
 
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=E9_amg-Aos4 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ral_ksZ-iZY 

             
 
 
@Bella Dea,

Funny stuff.
 
 
Virginia state seal: Last week the Commonwealth's Attorney General said, after 150 years of corrupting young minds, it was time that strumpet cover up. He gave his staff a version in which she donned a more modest armored breastplate, which he prefers you call a naughty-womanpart-plate.

After some media fuss, he's relented
 
 
How much would it cost to solve some of the world's biggest problems? King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia says about $10 billion " that's the endowment he's given to the King Abdullah University of Science and Technology, or KAUST, a huge research facility devoted to solving some of the major problems facing the planet.

The brand new school " it opened just this past fall " rises from the desert north of Jeddah like the secret research lab in a James Bond movie. The desert blooms here, thanks to a private desalination plant and an army of gardeners. With a private Red Sea beach, knock-your-socks-off architecture and world-class labs, KAUST hopes to lure the world's brainiest scientists to this Xanadu for nerds.

This isn't a university in the traditional sense, says KAUST President Choon Fong Shih.

"KAUST is a global university of the 21st century," Shih says, "a place where we integrate graduate education with research and the cutting edge."

That word " global " is thrown around a lot in higher education these days. Every university is trying to spread its wings and go international. What's different at KAUST? Well, for one thing " money. And lots of it. Money can buy some very nice science toys.

Take KAUST's visualization lab. It's got a room-sized video screen that shows a microscopic view of a rat's brain with stunning clarity. Steve Cutchin, who manages the lab, says this display also enables smooth video conferencing to anywhere in the world, including with his former home campus of the University of California, San Diego, halfway around the globe.

Before serving as the first KAUST president, Choon Fong Shih was the head of the National University of Singapore.
Rethinking The System

There's something else KAUST's huge budget can buy, according to David Keyes, dean of math and computer sciences.

"You can purchase good friends, and we've purchased, if you will, a lot of very good friends," Keyes says.

When he joined KAUST, he left a nice post at Lawrence Livermore National Lab in California. KAUST is "buying" allegiances, Keyes says, by handing out big grants. Stanford, for example, is getting $5 million a year to help select KAUST faculty. Other schools receive millions to do joint research. At the same time, KAUST is trying to blow up the internal structures that often lead to internecine battles at traditional universities. There are no departments here. Instead, Keyes says, KAUST pursues a "mission oriented" strategy.

"A mission-oriented program might be solar energy, as opposed to chemistry, physics, math, computer science, other things that are the disciplines that feed into that group," says Keyes.

And, in a move that may shock many educators, KAUST has done away with tenure. That's right: People here will be judged only by how many useful ideas or products they come up with.

Relationship To Islam

The first class here numbers about 400, with students from all over the world. They chow down in the light-filled cafeteria, one of the few places in Saudi Arabia where college-aged men and women rub elbows. Computer science student Luca Passone is Italian and studied in England. He says he came prepared to do without, but instead was overwhelmed by the amenities.

Enlarge Larry Abramson/NPR
Matt Debont (right) and Luca Passone are graduate students in computer science at KAUST. Both say they were drawn by the school's advanced computer equipment, but have also found that recreational facilities on the campus are lavish.

. Both say they were drawn by the school's advanced computer equipment, but have also found that recreational facilities on the campus are lavish.
"We have a cinema, we have a beach, sports centers, multiple gyms. We are very, very lucky to have so many things available for us," Passone says.

KAUST has to pile on the luxuries because life can be pretty austere outside the gates. And even on campus, students cannot get alcohol or pork, which are banned in this Islamic state.

The university's relationship to the kingdom and to Islam are complicated at best.

At the KAUST museum, KAUST's PR man Christopher Sands describes the Arab world's golden age of learning a millennium ago.

"Because the king's vision has always been to try to go back to what was the original house of wisdom, intellectual inquiry and groundbreaking science and technology are deeply integrated in the values of Islam," Sands says.

In fact, the king defied conservatives in his country by going ahead with KAUST as a co-ed school in a country where the sexes are still segregated. Sands says religion is not taken into account in admissions. But in many ways, KAUST remains faithful to Islam.

Sands says there are five separate mosques on campus that accommodate thousands. But there is no place here, on or off campus, for other faiths to worship.

"People are free to worship. There aren't any official facilities for it, but people do worship in the way they wish," Sands says.

KAUST may be an anomaly in the academic world. It is less of an oddity in Saudi Arabia, which has long had special compounds for foreigners working here. KAUST clearly has the resources to succeed in the world of global research. The question is whether it will have an impact just beyond its walls, on the host country.
 
 
PASADENA, Calif. " It's a first for the boy with no name.

A former foster youth whose mother never got around to giving him a first or middle name is now legally known as Max Pauson.

Hospital administrators, who 20 years ago had to submit a record of birth to the California Office of Vital Records, simply filled in the blanks "Baby, Boy, Pauson."

His generic birth certificate became a problem when he tried to get a job " the name on his Social Security card didn't match.

Last year, a Los Angeles Superior Court judge approved the name: Maximus Julius Pauson. (See Max Pauson's photo here.)

Now he is trying to make another name for himself " as an artist and writer. The Pasadena art student displayed his work at a Sunday exhibit and intends to write children's books when he graduates.
 
 
DUBAI, United Arab Emirates " A Dubai appeals court has thrown out a public indecency conviction and a month's prison sentence for a Pakistani couple accused of having sex in their car after the pair claimed they were together in a private place, their lawyer said Tuesday.

Majid Al Kabban, the lawyer representing the husband and wife, said the ruling by the lower court was overturned last week. They couple were initially sentenced to a month in prison and deportation.

The pair successfully argued their car should be treated like a private house. Their lawyers argued that because of the car's tinted windows, a policeman who had raised the charge could not have seen what the couple were doing inside.
 
 
BOSTON -- Three sixth-graders at the Sumner Whitter School in Everett were taken to Children's Hospital after swallowing dry ice Wednesday morning, according to Superintendent Frederick F. Foresteire.

He said the students apparently swallowed the dry ice because of a dare.

There was no immediate word on their identities or condition, although one boy was in respiratory distress when he was taken from the school, and he was being given oxygen.
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=75nDvFSHCBc 
 
 
This came from the Enquirer:

ELVIS PRESLEY was believed to have died from a massive heart attack in 1977 but now his doctor is singing a different tune.

At the time of his death it was reported that The King had died from cardiac arrhythmia, an irregular heartbeat brought on by drug addiction, obesity and a bum ticker.

But now El's pal and personal physician Dr. George "Nick" Nichopoulos, who tried to resuscitate him that fateful day, has finally revealed the true cause of death in his new tell-all The King and Dr. Nick.

"After he died we weren't sure (the exact cause of death) so I continued to do some research and I had some doctors call me from different places and different med schools that were doing research on constipation and different problems you can get into with it. " Dr.Nick writes.

According to the physician, now retired, the autopsy revealed Presley's colon was 5 to 6 inches in diameter (the normal width is usually 2 to 3 inches) and instead of being 4 to 5 feet in length, his colon was 8 to 9 feet in length.

"We didn't' realize until the autopsy that his constipation was as bad - we knew it was bad because it was hard for us to treat, but we didn't realize what it had done.

"We just assumed that the constipation was secondary to the meds that he was taking for his arthritic pain and for his insomnia."

In 1975, the primary treatment was a colostomy, the removal of the colon but according to the book, Presley's "ego" got in the way.

"He was embarrassed.

"He'd have accidents onstage. He'd have to change clothes and come back because of the way we were trying to treat his constipation.

"If they had done the colostomy then, he'd probably still be here," Nichopoulos said.
 
 
CNN) -- A Maryland funeral home has lost its license after investigators found about 40 bodies stacked on top of each other, leaking fluid, in a garage, a state official said.

The state Board of Morticians and Funeral Directors revoked the license of Chambers Funeral Home & Crematorium in Riverdale, Maryland after an April 26 visit to the site.

Hari Close, president of the the state funeral board, told CNN Tuesday that some of the bodies were cadavers who had been donated to a local university for research. Other bodies came from other funeral homes, Close said.

The bodies were supposed to be cremated, but investigators were alarmed at how they were stored in the garage while they awaited cremation.

"Even somebody who donates their body to science, they still should be treated with dignity," said Close. "Not to mention the health and safety issues with the body fluids flowing out."

William Chambers, co-owner of the funeral home, told CNN-affiliate WJLA said that he hopes to work with the state to resolve the alleged violations.

When investigators inspected the funeral home they were warned by an employee, who told them, "Don't get upset about all the bodies in there," according to documents released by the state funeral board.

Inside the room was a "large pile, approximately 12 by 12 feet, of body bags containing human remains strewn on the floor of the garage in front of a removal van. There was visible leakage from the body bags as well as a pungent odor," the documents said.

"The investigator also observed writing on some of the body bags," they said. "However, fluid leakage from the body bags caused the writing to smear and become illegible. As a result, it was not immediately possible to determine the identity of the remains."

There will be a hearing at the end of the month to determine whether the funeral home will get its license back, Close said
 
 
It may sound ridiculous, but a few blogs today are considering this question:

Is it appropriate to send or receive text messages during sex?

The chatter is a spin-off from a 1,000-person survey, published in March, which found about one in 10 people younger than 25 say that they would not mind being "interrupted by an electronic message" during sex.

Among people older than 25, 6 percent said they would be fine with that inconvenience, according to the online survey by Retrevo, a website that reviews consumer electronics.

The survey reports a 4 percent error margin.

About a quarter of people in the under-25 group said they wouldn't mind getting a text message or e-mail while using the restroom (the chart actually says "on the John," but can we all agree to boycott that phrase?). And half of the younger people said they would be OK with a digital intrusion into a meal.

Older people were less fond of this all-the-time messaging. Sixty-two percent of people older than 25 said they don't like being interrupted by digital communications in general.

Maybe there's a serious conversation to be had somewhere in these salacious details.

Do you find electronic messages intruding in on your life?

Would you text during dinner with a friend? Are there any limits?
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
The chatter is a spin-off from a 1,000-person survey, published in March, which found about one in 10 people younger than 25 say that they would not mind being "interrupted by an electronic message" during sex.
 

Seeing that I do not even own a cell phone, I'm probably bias here.

I think this whole scenario that you mention here is ludricrious! What's the matter with folks today? Are their phone calls and text messages that important, and just can't wait until later?

The world's gone mad.    
 
 
@Reyn,

Some people are more attached to cellphones and other electric gadgets than to people it seems.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Yes, indeed!

I should add to what I said above, and that is that it seems to be a sin to only do one thing at a time these days.

The buzz word, "multi-tasking", seems to be the order of the day. I really hate that mentality.  
 
 
 
Is it appropriate to send or receive text messages during sex?
 

For those that need step by step instructions, it may even be vital!  

Also, Viagara commercials warn about erections lasting more than 4 hours. If that happens, I would text all my friends to brag about it!  

......this story inspires all kinds of jokes
 
 
A four hour erection certainly leaves plenty of time for texting.
 
 
SEOUL, South Korea " A South Korean woman who earned a driver's license after 960 tries is ready to buy a car and get behind the wheel.

Yonhap news agency reported Thursday that 69-year-old Cha Sa-soon passed the driving part of the test last month on her 10th try. South Korea requires a written test first, and Cha took it nearly daily since April 2005 before passing last year.

Yonhap quoted her as saying she wanted to buy a small secondhand car to visit her son and daughter and for her business selling vegetables.
 
 
Why did a man marry his cat?

The cat was apparently dying. The German postman is reported to have unofficially married his cat after the animal fell ill and vets told him it might not live much longer. (This from BBC news site)
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
SEOUL, South Korea " A South Korean woman who earned a driver's license after 960 tries is ready to buy a car and get behind the wheel.

 

Yeah, I caught this on the radio yesterday. Funny as heck!

She must have been very determined!
 
 
@Reyn,

Fortunately, an ocean keeps her off of our streets.
 
 
Miami, FL, United States (AHN) - A Transportation Security Agency employee at Miami International Airport has been arrested for attacking a co-worker who teased him about the size of his genitals after he walked through a body scanner.

Rolando Negrin, 44, was charged with aggravated battery after he used a police baton to beat Hugh Osorno on Tuesday. According to a police complaint, Negrin was upset following a training with whole body scanners with other co-workers.

"The x-ray revealed [he] has a small penis and co-workers made fun of him on a daily basis," the complaint read.

The beating happened in the employee parking lot. Negrin allegedly struck his co-worker repeatedly and then forced him to kneel down and apologize. Osorno suffered cuts and bruises on his arms and back. He was treated by the airport fire rescue.

CBS4 reported that a TSA spokesman issued a statement Thursday that Negrin will be suspended and an investigation on the incident launched.
 
 
New York Yankees pitcher Phil Hughes retaliates by punching out Red Sox
 
 
What was billed as the Muslim world's first nudist hotel has been forced to close, just six days after it opened.

It was shut after a local authority inspection which found that one of the balconies did not conform to the architect's drawings.

The first 12 sparsely-clad guests at the 64-room resort in Datca on the Turkish Riviera have had to be moved to more conventional accommodation.

The hotel owner said he hoped to modify the balcony and re-open by Wednesday.

Entrepreneur Ahmed Kosar, a 15-year veteran of the Turkish tourism industry, told the BBC that he was always looking for new niches to exploit in the $20bn (£13.6bn) business, and that a number of European clients at his other hotels had expressed an interest in nudism.

The resort was constructed in a quiet spot on the Datca peninsula, east of the popular resort of Marmaris.

It offers guests the opportunity to bare all around the pool, or to take a special shuttle bus to a private beach where nudity is tolerated.

Mr Kosar said he was campaigning to re-open the hotel, and argued that many other hotels in the area have been allowed to continue operating despite not getting some of the many different licences required in Turkey.

It took him two years to build, and he said there were no objections from the local inhabitants, provided the naked tourists confined themselves to the grounds of the resort and the private beach.

The hotel is only open to foreigners - Turks are not allowed to stay - and the staff, nearly all male, keep their clothes on.

Mr Kosar would not be drawn on the subject of whether officials from the governing AK Party were behind the closure - the party is frequently accused of quietly implementing a conservative Muslim agenda in many parts of Turkey.

But he said that if his project continued to be blocked, he would consider moving it to another country like Croatia or northern Cyprus
 
 
JARRATT, Va. " Kendall Gibson would seem to be one of Virginia's most dangerous prisoners.

For more than 10 years he has lived in segregation at the Greensville Correctional Center, spending at least 23 hours every day in a cell the size of a gas station bathroom. In a temporary home for the worst of the worst " inmates too violent or disruptive to live among the rest of society's outcasts " he has been a permanent fixture.

He is there, he says, not for his crimes but for a crime he will not commit " a crime against God.

The only thing imposing about Gibson is his long black dreadlocks, resting on the front of his shoulders so they won't drag the ground as he shuffles along in his orange jumpsuit.

It is his hair " winding locks he considers a measure of his Rastafarian faith " that makes him a threat, according to Virginia Department of Corrections Operating Procedure No. 864.1.

The rule took effect on Dec. 15, 1999. Inmates had two choices: cut their hair no longer than their collars and shave their beards, or be placed in administrative segregation.

In the beginning, Gibson was among as many as 40 inmates who opted for confinement over cutting. By 2003, when a handful of the inmates filed a federal lawsuit against the department over their detention, 23 remained in segregation.

The lawsuit failed. Some cracked under the pressure of constant isolation with no visits from loved ones, educational or religious programs or commissary. Some went home.

Today, it's difficult to tell exactly how many remain in isolation. The Department of Corrections won't volunteer the information, but has confirmed 10 names given to The Associated Press by a group of Rastafarian inmates.

Not everyone can handle it, Gibson says. For those weak in mind or spirit, the walls can easily close in on them.

"People always ask how I can smile in a place so negative," he says. The Rastafarian God, Jah, "is my answer. Without Jah in my life I wouldn't be able to handle it."

___

Like most of the Rastafarians in segregation, Gibson didn't become a believer until after he entered prison. He was 18 and had a long time to do, sentenced to 47 years on robbery, abduction and gun charges.

Gibson had always loved the "peaceful vibes of Rastafari livity," but like many he knew the movement by the hair, the music and the ganja. In prison, he met others who taught him the spiritual aspects. He took on the name Ras-Talawa Tafari, a strong leader who inspires awe.

Rastafari draws from the Bible, mixing in African and Caribbean cultural influences. It is considered by many more of a way of life or movement than a religion. They preach unity with god, nature and each other, but are loosely organized and followers are free to worship with other congregations.

Rastafarians regard Ethiopian Emperor Haile Selassie I, who was known as Ras Tafari before he rose to power in 1930, as the second coming of Christ. They believe Jah inhabits them so there it no real need for a church. They smoke marijuana as a sacrament and adhere to a vegetarian diet.

While some view growing their hair as optional, most Rastafarians see it as demanded by the Nazarite Vow in the Bible (Numbers 6:5), "There shall no razor come upon his head."

Gibson never entertained the thought of cutting his hair when the policy was announced or during the 10 long years since. "Jah didn't lead I to feel that this plight was burden enough to bow," he says.

A person must be willing to stand up and fight for a worthy cause, he says, echoing Rastafarian messenger Bob Marley's rhythmic chant "Get up. Stand up. Stand up for your rights."

Gibson longs to hear such reggae music. A clear analog radio that picks up about nine stations is his only luxury in his small cell, but the island music doesn't get much air time in these parts.

His days are long but compact. Five days a week, he is led in restraints to an outside cage that resembles a dog kennel for an hour of recreation. Otherwise, he only leaves his 8-by-10 cell for three, 20-minute showers each week.

His cinderblock walls are off-white or gray, depending on the way the light hits them. The cell is freshly painted, drowning out the smell of his Dove soap resting on his one-piece sink-toilet unit.

If he stands on top of his mounted stainless steel bed Gibson can peak out the window, where he can see inmates in the general population recreation yard in the distance. He prefers to stare into the woods just beyond the razor-wife fence. On occasion he spies a deer grazing in the field.

The segregation unit has 16 cells, and although the inmates can't see each other they often talk. Gibson is amazed at what he calls their pure confusion and senseless babbling " obsession with the lives of movie stars and rappers and sports figures.

And then there are the other Rastafarians. "These people may have my physical body confined, but I refuse to surrender my mind and spirit," says Allen McRae, also known as Ras-Solomon Tafari, who is serving 20 years for cocaine possession.

Elton Williams, who is behind bars for armed robbery, gets the question all the time from inmates pulling stints in segregation. Wouldn't it be easier just to cut his hair?

His answer: "My very soul depends on the decisions I make."

Williams, 31, likens it to a Christian who is told that, for security reasons, he must denounce Christ. Williams is set to leave prison in December; he could cut his hair until then, he says, but what would happen to his soul?

Then there was Ivan Sparks, a 59-year-old Rastafarian elder who refused to cut his hair and was sent into segregation at Buckingham Correctional Center.

He never left it " except to die at Virginian Commonwealth University Medical Center last fall, of prostate cancer.

___

The way Department of Corrections officials see it, the inmates could come out of segregation any time they wish.

They made a choice to go to segregation instead of cutting their hair, spokesman Larry Traylor says. Should they decide to comply with the grooming policy, they could return to general population.

"Rules must be in place in order to have a secure, safe environment for everyone," Traylor said. "An inmate that will not follow the rules jeopardizes normal prison operations and is potentially a danger to other inmates and staff."

Virginia is among only about a dozen states, mostly in the South, that limit the length of inmates' hair and beards, according to the American Correctional Chaplains Association. A handful of those allow religious accommodations for Rastafarians, Muslims, Sikhs, native Americans and others whose religious beliefs prohibit shaving or cutting their hair.

There is no hair policy for federal prisoners.

The U.S. Supreme Court has said that constitutional protections, like the right to practice religion, do not end at the prison gates. Congress has said institutions can restrict religious liberties only for compelling reasons, like security, but the policies must be the least restrictive means to accomplish that.

Still, inmates have rarely been successful in challenging prison grooming policies.

A native American inmate spent a year in his cell and lost other privileges before a federal appeals court ruled in 2005 that the California prison system's ban on long hair violated his religious freedom.

In a 2002 case, a group of Rastafarian and Muslim federal inmates who were housed in Virginia prisons challenged the grooming policy and a federal court ordered the Bureau of Prisons to transfer them to other facilities that did not have such policies. The court also required the federal prison system to evaluate inmates' religious beliefs and refrain from sending them to Virginia or other states with burdensome grooming policies.

But in the case filed by the Virginia state prisoners, a federal appeals court ruled in 2008 that the Department of Corrections' argument that inmates could hide weapons and other contraband in long hair or easily change their appearance upon escape was compelling enough reason to require trimmed hair.
 
 
 
As a young man, practically a boy, I was fascinated by Brigette.
 
 
A Russian MP has asked President Dmitry Medvedev to investigate claims by a regional president that he has met aliens on board a spaceship.

Kirsan Ilyumzhinov, the leader of the southern region of Kalmykia, made his claim in a television interview.

MP Andre Lebedev is not just asking whether Mr Ilyumzhinov is fit to govern.

He is also concerned that, if he was abducted, he may have revealed details about his job and state secrets.

The MP has written a letter to Mr Medvedev raising a list of his concerns.

In his letter he says that - assuming the whole thing was not just a bad joke - it was an historic event and should have been reported to the Kremlin.

He also asks if there are official guidelines for what government officials should do if contacted by aliens, especially if those officials have access to state secrets.

Mr Ilyumzhinov said in an interview on primetime television that he had been taken on board an alien spaceship which had come to planet Earth to take samples - and claims to have several witnesses.

He has been president of Kalmykia, a small Buddhist region of Russia which lies on the shores of the Caspian Sea, for 17 years.

The millionaire former businessman has a reputation as an eccentric character.

As president of the World Chess Federation, he has spent tens of millions of dollars turning the impoverished republic into a mecca for chess players - building an entire village to host international tournaments.
 
 
 
As a young man, practically a boy, I was fascinated by Brigette.
 

I hope, as a wise man you are know, you are revulsed by such a despicable, nazi-like person..
 
 
@Francis,

When she was popular, I didn't know anything about her in a personal way. I can hold on to memories without endorsing whatever it is she stands for these days.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

She was pretty fair in those days, Ed, but old age is a wreckage, most of the time..
 
 
I don't follow her exploits since she retired from films.
 
 
AUSTIN, TX -- Country music great Willie Nelson is being honored in Austin with plans for a guitar-in-hand bronze statue and a street named in his honor.

The city council on May 27 is scheduled to vote on dubbing a stretch of 2nd Street "Willie Nelson Boulevard."

A smaller version of a planned Nelson statue was unveiled Thursday.

The larger version is scheduled to be placed next year near the entrance the new studio of the famed public broadcasting music program Austin City Limits. Nelson was featured in the 1974 pilot episode.

The nonprofit group Capital Area Statues Inc. commissioned the Nelson sculpture by Philadelphia artist Clete Shields, as part of a continuing salute to Texas history and culture.

The 77-year-old Nelson is from Abbott, located 25 miles north of Waco.
 
 
The Houston Art Car Show was last week. Here is a video about artists who participate.
 http://www.chron.com/disp/video.mpl/featured/20483306?83039680001 
 
 
The Onion CORRECTIONS: After receiving fewer e-mail complaints than usual, it occurred to us that we have failed to incorporate the word "moist" into any of our recent articles. The Onion regrets missing the opportunity to offend its fragile readers' delicate sensibilities. Moist.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Ha! My daughter hates that word. She cringes when I say Moist, so I do it on a daily basis...  
 
 
I don't recall ever using it in all my writing. Too stereotypical? Perhaps?
 
 
When President Obama was asked if he would play a round of golf with his talk-radio nemesis Rush Limbaugh, the response, relayed by a top Democrat, was: "Limbaugh can play with himself."
 
 
Came across these on Facebook today and they had me chuckling:

 

 
 
 
@Butrflynet,

Funny stuff.
 
 
Another one from Facebook:

 
 
 
DES MOINES, Iowa " The siblings of a man who died more than a year ago must exhume his body so his head can be cut off and cryogenically frozen, the Iowa Court of Appeals has ruled.

The court sided this week with Alcor Life Extension Foundation, which sought to dig up the remains of 81-year-old Orville Richardson of Burlington. Richardson had signed a contract with Alcor in 2004 and paid $53,500 to have his head placed in cryonic suspension after his death.

When he died in February 2009, Richardson's brother and sister buried him instead, having told him earlier that they would have nothing to do with his plan, court records show.

Alcor learned of Richardson's death two months afterward, when his brother, David Richardson, asked the Scottsdale, Ariz.-based company to refund the money already paid.

The company filed a lawsuit seeking to exhume Orville Richardson's body at its own expense, but a Des Moines Country District Court judge denied the request. The appeals court reversed that decision Wednesday. It said the lower court should have granted Alcor's request because Richardson's siblings ignored their brother's request, "despite knowledge he had made different arrangements."

It was unclear what condition the body would be in.
 
 
Gravestones often display macabre humor:

On the grave of Ezekial Aikle in East Dalhousie Cemetery, Nova Scotia: Here lies Ezekial Aikle/Age 102/The Good Die Young.

In a London cemetery: Ann Mann/ Here lies Ann Mann/ Who lived an old maid/ But died an old Mann. Dec. 8, 1767.

In a Ribbesford, England, cemetery: Anna Wallace The children of Israel wanted bread/ And the Lord sent them manna, Old clerk Wallace wanted a wife/ And the Devil sent him Anna.

Playing with names in a Ruidoso, N.M., cemetery: Here lies/ Johnny Yeast/ Pardon me/ For not rising.

Memory of an accident in a Uniontown, Pa., cemetery: Here lies the body/of Jonathan Blake/ Stepped on the gas/ Instead of the brake.

In a Silver City, Nev., cemetery: Here lays Butch/ We planted him raw./He was quick on the trigger/ But slow on the draw.

A widow wrote this epitaph in a Vermont cemetery: Sacred to the memory of my husband John Barnes/ who died January 3,1803 /His comely young widow, aged 23/ has many qualifications of a good wife/ and yearns to be comforted.

A lawyer's epitaph in England: Sir John Strange/ Here lies an honest lawyer/ And that is Strange.

Someone determined to be anonymous in Stowe, Vt.: I was somebody. Who, is no business/ Of yours.

Lester Moore was a Wells Fargo Co. station agent for Naco, Ariz., in the cowboy days of the 1880s. He's buried in the Boot Hill Cemetery in Tombstone, Arizona: Here lies Lester Moore/ Four slugs from a.44/No Les No More.

In a Georgia cemetery: I told you I was sick!

Anna Hopewell's grave in Enosburg Falls, Vt., has an epitaph that sounds like something from a Three Stooges movie: Here lies the body of our Anna/ Done to death by a banana/ It wasn't the fruit that laid her low/ But the skin of the thing that made her go.

More fun with names with Owen Moore in Battersea, London, England: Gone away/ Owin' more/ Than he could pay.

On a grave from the 1880s in Nantucket, Mass.: Under the sod and under the trees/ Lies the body of Jonathan Pease./ He is not here, there's only the pod:/ Pease shelled out and went to God.

Oops! Harry Edsel Smith of Albany, N.Y.: Born 1903 - Died 1942/ Looked up the elevator shaft/ to see if the car was on the way down./ It was.

In a Thurmont, Md., cemetery: Here lies an Atheist/ All dressed up/ And no place to go.

But does he make house calls? Dr. Fred Roberts, Brookland, Ark.: Office upstairs.
 
 
Francis and butrflynet: Great stuff.
 
 
SACRAMENTO, Calif. " California corrections officials dangled an attractive offer Saturday before hundreds of parolees who have become fugitives: Turn yourself in, get a $200 reward and qualify for an amnesty program.

About 150 who showed up in Oakland were sorry they did.

Instead of getting a check, they soon found themselves in handcuffs and, for most, headed back to state prison for violating their parole.

Agents set up the elaborate ruse with its own website and e-mail account. They appointed an agent to the fictitious post of "amnesty program director." They sent 2,700 letters to relatives of parolees-at-large advertising the reward and fake amnesty program.

The sting was aimed at some of the more than 14,000 California ex-convicts who broke off contact with their parole agents, are suspected of committing new crimes or of violating terms of their parole.
 
 
HUNTINGTON, N.Y. - A New York animal shelter is seeking donations of Viagra to treat a pit bull with a heart condition. Staff members at the Little Shelter Animal Rescue and Adoption Center in Huntington, on Long Island, say 6-year-old Ingrid needs two of the little blue pills every day or she will risk heart failure. They said a vet suggested it.
 
 
 
A tourist is lucky to be alive after a deadly spider bit him on the penis.

The Canadian backpacker was attacked after skinny-dipping in New Zealand.

While he was swimming, a rare katipo spider crawled into the shorts he had left on the beach. When the man returned, he put them back on and fell asleep " but the trapped spider then nipped him on his manhood.

Within minutes, the spider's venom was causing him to have agonizing chest pains, a racing heart, high blood pressure and severe swelling to his penis.

Dr. Nigel Harrison, who treated the 22-year-old at Dargaville Hospital, revealed the case in a report for the New Zealand Medical Journal.

"It was a rather nasty, ill-placed bite,” Harrison said. “The man woke to find his penis swollen and painful with a red mark on the shaft suggestive of a bite. He rapidly developed generalized muscle pains, fever, headache, photophobia (light sensitivity) and vomiting."

The unidentified man's condition "improved rapidly" after treatment with an anti-venom, but he was kept in the hospital for 16 days before being allowed to return to Canada.

The katipo, a Maori word meaning "night-stinger,” is an endangered species in New Zealand.

The pea-sized spiders are related to the American Black Widow. Bites to humans are rare, but two fatalities were recorded in the 1800s.
 
 
 
In a Georgia cemetery: I told you I was sick!
 

supposedly this appears on Spike Milligans headstone as well

Milligan gets last laugh on grave
The gravestone
Spike Milligan decided on his epitaph before he died in 2002
Comedy legend Spike Milligan has finally got the last laugh, more than two years after his death.

It follows an agreement with the local diocese over the wording on the headstone of his grave at St Thomas's Church in Winchelsea, East Sussex.

Relatives of the former Goon have now decided that it can bear the star's epitaph: "I told you I was ill."

However, the inscription had to be written in Gaelic in order for it to be approved by the Chichester Diocese.
 http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/uk_news/england/southern_counties/3742443.stm 
 
 
Charlie Sheen may face 45 days in jail for assaulting wife Brooke Mueller in Aspen last Christmas, but a source tells UsMagazine.com he's most worried about being able to smoke behind bars.

The actor's criminal defense attorney, Richard Cummins, has been asking local law enforcement if they'd be willing to make an exception to the jail's no-smoking policy.

Authorities say they aren't likely to make an exception to the no-smoking rule, which has been in effect for 10 to 15 years.

The Two and a Half Men star, 44, is likely to end up in Aspen's Pitkin County Jail, which allows nicotine patches for inmates. Nicotine gum is not allowed to prevent gum from ruining the carpet.

Us has learned that the Aspen County District Attorney has offered Sheen a plea deal that would put him behind bars for 45 days, but prosecutors would drop the felony charge in return for Sheen pleading guilty to a misdemeanor.

But Sheen's legal team is trying to knock the amount of time down. The actor is also keen on limiting the amount of probation/parole so that if he gets in trouble again, it won't compound his problems.

At Pitkin County Jail, which is decked out with plants, spacious living area, televisions and other amenities, inmates are allowed to mingle with the opposite sex in shared living areas. The lock up is also known for its cuisine; on Christmas day, when Sheen was arrested, prime rib was served for lunch and Cornish hen for dinner.

Says a high-ranking official of Sheen, "He'd be crazy not to want to do his time here in Aspen."
 
 
 
to prevent gum from ruining the carpet.
 

Carpet ??? In a jail ????
 
 
@dadpad,

It sounds almost like a country club. I feel certain there are no poor people in there.
 
 
New Study Confirms Humans Only Use 10% Of Genitalia

BOSTON"A surprising new study published in The New England Journal Of Medicine this week has revealed that human beings only use 10 percent of their genitalia at any given time. "To think of all that we could accomplish if we just unlocked the remaining 90 percent," said Dr. Howard Schwartz, who contributed to the sex-organ capacity study. "Why, the back shaft alone could represent a vast reservoir of untapped potential. It's frightening, but we, as a species, have barely scratched the surface of our genitals." Schwartz maintained, however, that with enough time and late-night exploration, human beings could someday live up to "the promise of their junk."
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Study conducted by THe Onion.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
 

While he was swimming, a rare katipo spider crawled into the shorts he had left on the beach. When the man returned, he put them back on and fell asleep " but the trapped spider then nipped him on his manhood.
...

 

During the Gulf War, we were always told to shake out our boots before putting them back on in order to avoid snakes or scorpions.

To heck with the man! Poor pea sized spider! Poor spider indeed is what I'm thinking!! The guy's an idiot for taking his shorts off in the first place then not shaking them out before putting them back on.

Poor spider moseying along then she finds some shade (the shorts). Takes a cool brief rest in this cotton cave of sorts. Then all of a sudden the world starts shifting and rising from the ground then the poor spider is trapped in the dark along with this sinister snake !! What else can this spider do but defend itself!!
 
 
Speaking as one who has had a scorpion run inside his pants leg, the little beggars get scant sympathy from the bitten and stung.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

I looked that up, cos I just KNEW it was related to the Australian redback:

Australian redback:
 

I have to say I wish the redback was endangered. Though very poisonous, they are not aggressive at all.

Sounds like the katipo was sorely provoked.
 
 
That Australian Redback looks much more like an American Black Widow than the other one.
 
 
 
I've a friend who went to Oz a few years ago. She was working on a farm, one day they found her driving in circles in the field. When she'd put on her headphones to block out the noise of the tractor, she was bitten by a redback. She woke up three weeks later in a hospital. Spent another two recuperating, in delirium and pain, in the farmer's home, on the living room floor where they could keep an eye on her.
I'm told they can kill a horse.
The black widow is the only poisonous spider I've ever seen in Canada and it only lives in a few select locations. Most of us are unused to shaking our shoes and clothing before we put it on.
He's not an idiot but I'd agree to ignorant.
 
 
Black widows hide from you, generally. You have to lift up a rock or something to find them, most of the time.
 
 
@Ceili,

 
she was bitten by a redback.
I'm told they can kill a horse.

 

Incorrect. Only small children and elderly people are at risk of dying, most people are safe as long as traetment is administered within a reasonable time.
I have redbacks in my shed. Once a year i spray them with flyspray. Dlowan is correct they are very nonagressive.
 
 
I think most poisonous animals are not that aggressive. Water moccasin snakes are more afraid of us than we are of them. We had one get inside a storage room, on the patio of an apartment. It hid beneath a pile of stuff. Not feeling heroic, I called animal control. The man they sent was wearing tennis shoes. He stepped into the room, moved the stuff about and fished the snake up with something and dropped it in a cage. He took it to the country and turned it loose. A year later, I discovered another one near the same apartment. I radioed my coworker for help. The snake saw me and dove into some weeds. It was quick enough, it could have escaped, but it chose to hide. We flushed it out and killed it. I felt we had to get it because there were small children living there.
 
 
 
MOON AND VENUS
 
 
NEW YORK - Pee-Wee is Broadway bound.

"The Pee-Wee Herman Show" will have a 48-performance run at the Stephen Sondheim Theatre starting Oct. 26.

It is based in part on the cult TV show "Pee-Wee's Playhouse" and will star Pee-Wee himself, Paul Reubens
Producer Scott Sanders said Thursday that it will follow "a day in the life of our bow-tied hero."

Other cast members will be announced later.
 
 
A Miami court ruled on Thursday that Burger King Holdings has the right to set prices at its stores but said allegations by the franchisees of bad faith by the company had enough plausibility to be argued in court.

The National Franchisees Association had alleged Burger King admitted that selling its double cheeseburger at $1 could lead to the bankruptcy of stores.

U.S. District Judge K. Michael Moore ruled that, "construed in a light most favorable to the NFA, these allegations plausibly state a claim that BKC breached its duty of good faith."

Burger King said in a statement emailed to Reuters it was pleased by the court's decision to reaffirm its rights, and added that extensive testing "more than validated the business case for the addition of this competitively priced product to its Value Menu."

Burger King spokesman Miguel Piedra also said that a number of franchisees had embraced the promotion before its national roll-out.

The National Franchisees Association sued Burger King late last year in the Miami federal court, alleging that the company did not have the right to enforce maximum pricing rules.

Fast-food restaurants use low-priced food like $1 burgers to lure diners into restaurants, but if those items are priced below cost, franchisees can suffer.

Officials at the National Franchisees Association and Burger King could not immediately be reached for comment.

Shares in Burger King closed up 17 cents at $18.88 on Friday.
 
 
(A customer who has just made a purchase comes back into our store asking for help; she’s locked her keys in her car. I go out to try and help.)

Me: “Ma’am, your window is open.”

Customer: “What?”

Me: “Your window. It’s open.”

(The customer reaches in and gets her keys, opens the door, rolls up the window, locks the car, throws the keys back inside, and closes the door.)

Me: “Um…”

Customer: “I know! I know! It’s just that I already called my husband to bring the second set! He’d have given me h*** if he saw the window was open!”
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
Water moccasin snakes are more afraid of us than we are of them.

 

No Edgar, you just fail to recognize the depth of my feelings towards to poisonous reptiles.
 
 
@dadpad,

 
 
 
@roger,

The one I described us killing was terrified of us. I felt very badly to be taking its life. I don't really think it would have harmed anybody, but there is just enough chance I was wrong, I could not let the little kids play out there with it around.
 
 
RENO, Nev. - Voters dressed in chicken costumes won't be allowed inside Nevada polling places this year.

State election officials on Friday added chicken suits to the list of banned items after weeks of ridicule directed at Republican Senate candidate Sue Lowden.

The millionaire casino executive and former beauty queen recently suggested that people barter with doctors for medical care, like when "our grandparents would bring a chicken to the doctor."
Democrats responded by setting up a website, "Chickens for Checkups," and by sending volunteers in chicken suits to her campaign events.

Lowden is in a 12-way primary race to decide Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid's Republican opponent. She had been the front-runner in the race, but was in a virtual tie for the lead in a recent poll.

Under the new rule, chicken costumes will be banned along with political buttons, shirts, hats and signs within 100 feet of polling places.

Washoe County Registrar of Voters Dan Burk said such a costume would be an "inappropriate and obvious" advocacy message against Lowden.

Lowden campaign manager Robert Uithoven hailed the decision.

"I think voters will be spared the Harry Reid carnival and that's a good thing," he told The Associated Press. "I think most voters are going to the polls thinking about far greater things than Harry Reid's chickens."

Reid spokesman Jon Summers said the Nevada Democratic Party has been sending the volunteers in chicken costumes to Lowden events and he was unaware of any plans for them to show up at the polls.

"Maintaining fair elections is an important thing and we respect the decision that has been made by election officials," he said. "I certainly can understand why that would be a sensitive issue for her since she has been called out on her concept of bartering chickens for checkups."
 
 
Today I watched Judge Judy (Don't Piss on Me and Tell Me It's Raining) Sheindlin. Couldn't believe this kid. He told the judge, "I was cold walking home, so I pushed her to the ground and took her car." He made it sound as though his situation justified a car jacking. Then, at the end of a police chase, he wrecked the car. "I don't think I should have to pay for the car. I was driving, but the police made me have the wreck." He had already been in trouble for marijuana and assaulting a teacher in school. Nothing happened as a consequence of any of his bad actions, except that he got 5 years probation over the car. The judge lectured him and made him pay for the car. After the ruling, he was shown to say, "I still don't think I should have had to pay for the car."
 
 
A stash of trash collected by an elderly pair of South Side hoarders held them hostage for weeks. It appears the woman, 75, fell through mounds of trash in her home on the 1500 block of East 69th Street in the Grand Crossing neighborhood. When she couldn't free herself from the rubble, her 76-year-old husband tried to her rescue her but suffered the same fate. Luckily Chicago police conducted a well-being check at the home Monday evening and found the couple alive. No word who requested the well-being check since no other residents live in the building
 
 
JAKARTA, Indonesia - A video of smoking toddler is sparking outrage on the web. When the clip of 2-year-old Sumatran Ardi Rizal puffing away surfaced on YouTube Wednesday, it spread to online social media like, well, fire. Popular blog Gawker linked to the smoking baby video, calling him "totally cooler than you." But user Faldo777's response was the more typical response: "His parents should be jailed..."

In fact, his parents say Rizal throws a tantrum when they refuse to give him a cigarette. His father gave him his first smoke when he was just 18 months old.

The smoking toddler was witnessed by a reporter who recently visited his home in the fishing village of Musi Banyuasin, in Indonesia's South Sumatra province.

"I'm not worried about his health, he looks healthy," shrugged the boy's father Mohammad Rizal. "He cries and throws tantrums when we don't let him smoke. He's addicted."
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Hpuye64qoqY 
 
 
I have kept a book at my job for about 17 years. Reptiles and Amphibians. It is from a series called "A Golden Nature Guide." I kept it for the pictures, mainly to identify the snakes and such that we occasionally have encountered. Today I casually read some text from it that startled me. In a section titled, Values of Reptiles, somebody wrote: "As a group, they are neither "good" or "bad," but are interesting and unusual, although of minor importance. If they should all disappear, it would not make much difference one way or the other." The book is copyright, 1952, published by Simon and Schuster.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

It is said the kid smokes 44 cigarettes per day.
 
 
updated 12:46 p.m. CT, Wed., May 26, 2010
PHILADELPHIA - Airline officials are trying to figure out how a sleeping passenger was left aboard a flight for four hours after it landed in Philadelphia.

According to police and the Transportation Security Administration, the passenger didn't wake up when her United Express flight from Dulles airport outside Washington landed shortly after midnight Tuesday. At about 4 a.m., a cleaning crew found her.

United Airlines says they're working with a regional partner carrier to determine why the plane wasn't cleared upon landing.
 
 
LOS ANGELES, Calif. -- Gary Coleman is reportedly hospitalized in critical condition.

According to TMZ, the former "Diff'rent Strokes" star is currently hospitalized in Utah.

The actor's brother-in-law told TMZ that Coleman fell and suffered a head injury.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
LOS ANGELES, Calif. -- Gary Coleman is reportedly hospitalized in critical condition.

According to TMZ, the former "Diff'rent Strokes" star is currently hospitalized in Utah.

The actor's brother-in-law told TMZ that Coleman fell and suffered a head injury.

 

Gary is on life support.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
[youtube]http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Hpuye64qoqY[/youtube]

 

I have been reading that many kids just a few years older than this one takes up smoking over there.
 
 
Create your own comics
 http://dropcomics.com//blog2.php 
 
 
One of the joys of my job comes when I clean out the skimmers of the swimming pool. Birds have learned that I almost always scoop out insects and toss them to the side. When I approach the pool, I hear excitement in their chirping. One little bird in particular barely fears me at all now. It comes within a few feet of me to grab the choicest morsels. I worry some that the little bit of pool water they may ingest will do them harm. Hopefully they will survive.
 
 
On the subject of animal life at my place of work, I am constantly disturbed to watch residents and one employee kill lizards and geckos as though they were the equivalent of flies or roaches. An ex-employee once shot a mockingbird for singing near his window late at night. One resident even wanted us to track down and dispose of a noisy frog.
 
 
When Jerry Ehman wrote that three-letter word, "wow," he was a professor at Ohio State University volunteering with SETI, the Search for Extra Terrestrial Intelligence. Every few days, a messenger would bike over from "The Big Ear," Ohio State's giant radio telescope in Delaware, Ohio, and hand Jerry computer records of sounds coming in from deep space. If something surprising popped up, he was to notify the other SETI folks.

What he saw that day was like an answered prayer.
Eighteen years earlier, two Cornell physicists, Philip Morrison and Giuseppe Cocconi, had tried to imagine how an intelligent alien civilization might try to signal Earth. We should look, they said, for a radio transmission. Radio waves are cheap to produce, don't require much energy and travel vast distances across space.

Cocconi and Morrison guessed that the aliens would choose a frequency that would mean something to creatures who know math and chemistry. Hydrogen is the most common element in the universe. Zap a hydrogen atom and it will resonate at a particular rate: 1420 megahertz (MHz). So look, they said, for a signal coming in at 1420 MHz. And look for something loud, something that would catch our attention.

And on Aug. 15, in it came, exactly as predicted.

What Jerry saw was, yes, a radio signal and, yes, a radio signal very, very close to 1420 MHz (it was 1420.4556, just a smidge from where it was expected). It lasted 2 to 2 1/2 minutes. It was loud. And the transmission had the shape that Cocconi and Morrison had predicted. If you look at this printout, you will see this sequence of letters and numbers: 6EQUJ5.

According to science writer Michael Brooks in his book 13 Things That Don't Make Sense, "The letters and numbers are, essentially, a measure of the intensity of the electromagnetic signal as it hit the receiver. Low power was recorded with numbers 0 to 9; as power got higher, the computer used letters: 10 was A, 11 was B and so on." So by the time you get to the last letters of the alphabet, you are getting a very powerful signal.

That's why when Jerry saw this letter U on his printout (U is the 21st letter of the alphabet) he knew something was up.
"I had never seen any signal that strong before," Jerry says. "U," in a logarithmic way, means about 30 times louder than the ordinary noise of deep space. That's kind of a "Hello!" level. And that explains Jerry's reaction.

"That's the nice thing about the word 'wow.' I was, uh... I was astonished," he says.

The Universe Is A Noisy Place

As surprised as he was, Jerry was also puzzled. Where did the signal come from? SETI scientists traced it back to the constellation Sagittarius, just to the northwest of the globular cluster M55. But when they looked for the source, there was nothing there, no planet, no star. Still, the shape of the signal, its narrow AM/FM-like focus, not to mention its surprisingly tantalizing frequency suggested intentionality. Maybe whoever or whatever sent the signal had moved on?

B.J. Mochejska (CfA), J. Kaluzny (CAMK), 1m Swope Telescope
SETI scientists traced the Wow signal to an area just northwest of M55, a cluster of 100,000 stars inside the constellation Sagittarius.

Or maybe not. Maybe there was no signal. Jerry and his colleagues checked all the alternative explanations they could think of. Was it a satellite transmission (no), a military signal (no), an aircraft signal (no), a broadcast beam (no), an accidental beam ricocheting off space debris (no)? Could it have been something natural? A pulsating star? That's where things began to unravel.
Astronomers keep discovering new noisemakers in space: colliding black holes, glitching pulsars, gamma ray bursts. Columbia University astronomer Caleb Scharf says it is very hard to exhaust the possibilities when we are learning more every year about the universe.

For Jerry Ehman, the big puzzle is: Why only one signal? If an alien intelligence is trying to send a message somewhere, wouldn't it make sense to send the message a few times? The signal landed once on Aug. 15, 1977. It never repeated.

"That's key in the scientific method," says Columbia's Scharf. "You want to see a repeat." That way, other scientists can confirm the finding.

And yet, the "Wow!" signal is the only reliably recorded sound apparently received from deep space that has the quality of an intentional signal. Jerry Ehman has never claimed he'd heard from E.T. Where the signal came from is still an open question for him. All Jerry Ehman will say is that having eliminated (as best he can) every other explanation, a message from E.T. is one possibility he can't dismiss.

Michael Brook's account of the "Wow!" signal is probably the best I've ever read. It can be found in chapter seven of his book "13 Things That Don't Make Sense," published in 2008.
 
 
Guinness could really be good for you

The long-running ad campaign is well-known
The old advertising slogan "Guinness is Good for You" may be true after all, according to researchers.

A pint of the black stuff a day may work as well as a low dose aspirin to prevent heart clots that raise the risk of heart attacks.

Drinking lager does not yield the same benefits, experts from University of Wisconsin told a conference in the US.

Guinness was told to stop using the slogan decades ago - and the firm still makes no health claims for the drink.

The Wisconsin team tested the health-giving properties of stout against lager by giving it to dogs who had narrowed arteries similar to those in heart disease.

They found that those given the Guinness had reduced clotting activity in their blood, but not those given lager.

Heart trigger

Clotting is important for patients who are at risk of a heart attack because they have hardened arteries.

A heart attack is triggered when a clot lodges in one of these arteries supplying the heart.

Many patients are prescribed low-dose aspirin as this cuts the ability of the blood to form these dangerous clots.

The researchers told a meeting of the American Heart Association in Orlando, Florida, that the most benefit they saw was from 24 fluid ounces of Guinness - just over a pint - taken at mealtimes.

We already know that most of the clotting effects are due to the alcohol itself, rather than any other ingredients

Spokesman, Brewing Research International
They believe that "antioxidant compounds" in the Guinness, similar to those found in certain fruits and vegetables, are responsible for the health benefits because they slow down the deposit of harmful cholesterol on the artery walls.

However, Diageo, the company that now manufactures Guinness, said: "We never make any medical claims for our drinks."

The company now runs advertisements that call for "responsible drinking".

A spokesman for Brewing Research International, which conducts research for the industry, said she would be "wary" of placing the health benefits of any alcohol brand above another.

She said: "We already know that most of the clotting effects are due to the alcohol itself, rather than any other ingredients.

"It is possible that there is an extra effect due to the antioxidants in Guinness - but I would like to see this research repeated."

She said that reviving the old adverts for Guinness might be problematic - at least in the EU.

Draft legislation could outlaw any health claims in adverts for alcohol in Europe, she said.

Feelgood factor

The original campaign in the 1920s stemmed from market research - when people told the company that they felt good after their pint, the slogan was born.

In England, post-operative patients used to be given Guinness, as were blood donors, based on the belief that it was high in iron.

Pregnant women and nursing mothers were at one stage advised to drink Guinness - the present advice is against this.

The UK is still the largest market in the world for Guinness, although the drink does not feature in the UK's top ten beer brands according to the latest research.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

true story;
the last time my brother and I were in London we stopped into a pub for lunch. My brother (a beer drinker) wanted to try a brit beer so he asked the barkeep "what's the best selling beer?" the barkeep told him "Long-neck Bud." "ok" my brother said "what's the 2nd best selling beer?" the barkeep said "Bud lite" My brother had a Fosters.
 
 
@dyslexia,

I wonder, would the same thing would happen in Melbourne or Capetown.
 
 
CONCORD, N.H. (AP) " Tina Anderson was a scared 15-year-old when she was summoned by church leaders to stand before her congregation and apologize for getting pregnant out of wedlock.

Just minutes earlier in that evening service in 1997, a longtime church member admitted publicly that he had been unfaithful to his wife.

Now, 13 years later, Ernie Willis is charged with raping Anderson, and police are investigating what church leaders knew about the assault and whether they shipped Anderson out of state to keep the matter quiet.

When the pastor heard Anderson's allegations, he told her that if she had "lived in the Old Testament," she would have been stoned to death for not reporting the attack sooner.

"He also said I had 'allowed myself to be put in a compromising situation,' Anderson said. The pastor decided she needed to be "church-disciplined."

"I was completely humiliated," Anderson said, her voice quavering at the memory. "I hoped it was a nightmare I'd wake up from, and it wouldn't be true anymore."

The Associated Press does not generally identify victims of sexual assault, but Anderson asked that her name be made public. Several witnesses to the church service involving Willis and Anderson recounted details to The Associated Press.

Willis, 51, of Guilford, will be arraigned June 16 on sexual assault charges. He was released on a $100,000 personal-recognizance bond after his arrest last week. A message left on a cell phone linked to him was not returned. A woman who answered the phone at a number listed to him said he no longer lived there. Court documents do not list an attorney.

Concord police also are weighing whether to bring obstruction-of-justice charges against anyone who may have concealed the girl's location during the initial investigation, which authorities say they were forced to shelve when there was no victim to testify.

After all these years, Anderson decided to come forward after she was contacted by a Concord police detective in February.

She told police she started baby-sitting for Ernie and Tammie Willis' children when she was 14. When she was 15, Willis volunteered to teach her to drive after her mother refused to do so.

 http://home.myhughesnet.com/news/read.php?ps=1011&rip_id=%3CD9FVDVT01%40news.ap.org%3E&_LT=HOME_LARSDCCLM_UNEWS 
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
I wonder, would the same thing would happen in Melbourne or Capetown.

 

Not on your life.
Melbourne:
Carlton draught from the tap and VB if packaged.
Different for other states
NSW tooheys
QLD 4X
Tas cascade
WA Swan larger
SA Ummm who cares...? Ok possibly Resches
 
 
Lone Star- ?
 
 
 
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dMN00JD2AaM 
 
 
@dadpad,

i guess i'd like QLD & WA
 
 
none of this is particularly humourous, but it's odd

it's beginning to look like Canada might have some trouble filling top military spots
first this story
Top Canadian Soldier Charged with Murder

As the commander of Canada’s largest Air Force base, Colonel Russell Williams once regularly met with dignarities; now, he has been charged with the murder of two women and the sexual assault of two others. The 23-year veteran is believed to have killed Jessica Lloyd, 27, whose body was found earlier Monday, and Marie Comeau, 38, who was found dead in November.

Williams was on the fast track to be a major player in the Canadian military, some had suggested he had what it takes to be the head of the Armed Forces eventually

then this happened

Col. Geoff Parker, the highest ranking Canadian to be killed in Afghanistan, leaves behind a wife and two young children after he was killed in Afghanistan by a suicide car bomb today.

Col. Parker, 42, was the 145th Canadian soldier to die in Afghanistan. As a commanding officer, he was often quoted speaking about the deaths of soldiers under his own command, always treating them with compassion and respect.

One Canadian Forces member travelling in a NATO convoy was killed after an insurgent detonated a vehicle borne improvised explosive device between the convoy of vehicles in Kabul at approximately 8 a.m. local Afghanistan time on May 18, 2010. Colonel Geoff Parker killed this morning in the suicide bomb attack that also killed 5 US servicemen.
“There was no hesitation in his mind that that was the place for him … happy to do what was required of him in theatre,” he said of a soldier who died in 2008, the year after he moved to CFB Gagetown in New Brunswick.

Col. Parker’s official biography, published by the Department of National Defence, describes him as a natural leader and career soldier born in Oakville, Ont. Flags in his hometown have been lowered to half mast. In 2007, Col. Parker moved his family to CFB Gagetown to take over a Commanding Officer of the Second Battalion of the Royal Canadian Regiment. He and his family looked forward to exploring the Maritimes.

He joined the military in 1989 while still a student at the University of Western Ontario. When he graduated the following year with a Bachelor of Engineering Science, he finished his Infantry Officer training and was posted to the 1st Battalion, The Royal Canadian Regiment in London, Ont., the following year.

In 1992, Col. Parker moved north to Petawawa, Ont., with the battalion and wound up commanding a M113 rifle platoon, among others.

From there, Col. Parker moved to Belleville, Ont., for another posting. He returned to Petawawa in 1996. Four years later, he was promoted to Major.

In 2003, his ascending career took him to Toronto, where he attended the Canadian Forces College. He then returned to Petawawa as the G3 of the 2 Canadian Mechanized Brigade Group (2 CMBG). During his tenure, the force generated three Afghanistan Rotations. He was promoted to Lieutenant-Colonel in 2006, and shortly thereafter moved to CFB Gagetown.

A few months ago, Col. Parker and his family moved back to Ontario. When he died, he was in Kabul as part of a NATO team preparing for their upcoming mission, DND said in a statement.

Michaelle Jean, Governor General of Canada, said in a statement:

“This barbaric act of aggression in the middle of rush hour reminds us of the many dangers our brave military personnel and the Afghan population are exposed to every day. Despite this tragedy, the will of Colonel Parker’s brothers- and sisters-in-arms to protect the Afghan people remains unshaken. Together with NATO forces, they are fully committed to fulfilling their difficult mission of restoring justice and peace to a country ravaged by decades of oppression and injustice.”
Col. Parker leaves behind his wife, M.J., and his children, Charlie and Alexandria.

and now this

Brig.-Gen. Daniel Ménard has been relieved of command of Canadian troops in Afghanistan following allegations he was involved in an inappropriate personal relationship while in theatre.

Military sources have told CBC News that Ménard, head of Joint Task Force Kandahar, is alleged to have had an affair with a female member of his staff.

The military has strict rules forbidding its personnel from engaging in personal relationships while in theatre. They include relationships of an emotional, romantic or sexual nature.

The Defence Department issued a statement saying only that the decision was made following "allegations concerning Ménard's inappropriate conduct related to the Canadian Forces personal relationships and fraternization directives."

Ménard's spouse also serves in the Forces.

Col. Simon Hetherington said Lt.-Gen. Marc Lessard made the decision to relieve Ménard of his duties after he lost confidence in Ménard's ability to command.

An investigation into the allegations has been launched, DND said.

Hetherington has been designated acting commander in the interim. In the near future, Brig.-Gen. Jon Vance will assume command, pending the arrival of the next commander, Brig.-Gen. Dean Milner, DND said.

Earlier this week, Ménard was fined $3,500 " the stiffest fine ever levied on a soldier for mishandling a weapon.

He received the fine after pleading guilty to an offence under the National Defence Act in a court in Gatineau, Que.

The March 25 incident occurred as Ménard and his boss, chief of defence staff Gen. Walt Natynczyk, were about to board a Blackhawk helicopter at Kandahar Airfield.

Ménard said he was loading his C8 carbine, something he has done thousands of times, when it discharged. No one was injured and nothing was damaged, but the National Defence Act makes it an offence to accidentally discharge a weapon.

Ménard formally took over from Vance as top officer for Task Force Kandahar last November.

since February the Canadian Armed Forces have lost 3 (2 absolutely, the newest one almost certainly) high ranking officers
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ozd2osh5rB4 
 
 
Los Angeles, California (CNN) -- A public memorial service for heavy metal rocker Ronnie James Dio is planned for Sunday, with members of the Westboro Baptist Church saying they will picket the ceremony.

The church in Topeka, Kansas, is known for its intolerance of gays and its picketing of soldiers' funerals.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

that might just get interesting ed...

the Ronnie fans I know would just as soon kick Fred Phelps' bunch's ass as look at him.

his was a kinda rough crowd.
 
 
@Rockhead,

Be there or be square.
 
 
SOAP LAKE, Wash. " A sheriff's office in Washington state has paid more than $400 to replace an inmate's locks and keys after a deputy left the keys on the back of his cruiser and took off without grabbing them.

Authorities in Grant County say Michael Eugene Power was arrested for violating a protection order. Before transporting Power, a deputy placed the suspect's keys and wallet on top of the closed trunk of his patrol vehicle.

But when the deputy was ordered to respond to a different call, he took off without grabbing the keys and wallet and they fell off. The wallet was returned to Power, but the keys have not been found.

The sheriff's office replaced the keys and locks for Power's home and vehicle.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Talk about oddities. Look at this:

 

 http://www.scpr.org/news/2010/03/26/chinese-mummies/ 
 
 
Nice eyelashes for a 3,800 year old woman!
 
 
@Eva,

Your mother has nice eyelashes for someone that I just had sex with.
 
 
Thanks for the Mummy, letty. There is no end to what people will do to themselves and also their remains.
 
 
Dead at age 17, World's Ugliest Dog
 
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uDagLnXzy4M 

Many of the topics I cover on this thread often end up being seperate threads, days or even weeks later.
 
 
Was late getting to the pool this morning. As I walked the sidewalk in that general area, some of the birds actually swooped in front of me, reminding me of my duty to toss the bugs out of the skimmers.
 
 
REHOBOTH BEACH, Del. (AP) - Rehoboth Beach in Delaware isn't a topless beach " but a few transgender women caused a stir by treating it like one.

Police say passers-by complained after they removed their tops and revealed their surgically enhanced breasts over Memorial Day weekend. A lifeguard asked them to put their tops back on. They initially refused, but covered up before police arrived.

Even if they hadn't, though, Police Chief Keith Banks notes they were doing nothing illegal. Since they have male genitalia, they can't be charged with indecent exposure for showing their breasts. Banks says there's no need for a specific law to address the issue.

Rehoboth Beach commissioner Kathy McGuiness isn't so sure. She says the matter will be discussed at a town hall meeting next week.
 
 
A fat bloke with big manboobs takes his top off.
A skinny flat chested woman takes her top off.

Who gets arreated and why.
A. The woman does.
Why? Cause she doesnt have a penis.

Who do you find more offensive?
 

 
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 

i can see why high heels could make some misconstrue natural beauty as being provocative

tx edg
 
 
@dadpad,

I get your point.
 
 
@oolongteasup,

I bet that dog was a good pet.
 
 
Ratner hired to bring 'edgier' Snow White to big screen
Snow White is heading for a Hollywood make-over - movie bosses are preparing a big-budget blockbuster based on the classic fairytale.

The story was made famous by the Brothers Grimm and is best remembered in 1937 animated Disney classic, "Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs", but other incarnations have included little-known 1997 horror "Snoww White: A Tale of Terror", starring Sigourney Weaver and Sam Neill.

Now Hollywood executives are hoping to follow the success of Tim Burton's recent re-imagining of "Alice In Wonderland" by bringing Snow White back to the big screen in an "edgier" modern tale called "The Brothers Grimm: Snow White".

"X-Men: The Last Stand" director Brett Ratner will act as a producer on the project.

Meet Bill director Bernie Goldmann, who is also producing, reveals several high-profile names have already expressed an interest in the film, but he's refusing to divulge any details.

He tells Variety.com, "Talent and directors of the highest level have already responded to the new, edgier concept, and to (the) script."

"While retaining the elements of the beloved Brothers Grimm tale, this is certainly not your mother's Snow White."

-- WENN Newsdesk
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
"X-Men: The Last Stand"
 

rose red will be in it i gather
 
 
@oolongteasup,

Don't know. I have never seen any X Men.
 
 
A San Bernardino mother whose children were kidnapped 15 years ago was able to finally track them down using Facebook.

San Bernardino’s Deputy District Attorney says it’s the first time his office has handled a case like this one. But in this digital age, it may not be the last.

Faustino Utrera, father of two toddlers, a boy and girl, vanished with them in 1995. Their mother reported them missing and 15 years passed. "At the time, they were 2 and 3 years old. So they’re now 17 and 16," said Kurt Rowley, San Bernardino Deputy District Attorney.

But in those years, the Internet exploded and social networking sites revolutionized the process of tracking people down.

"The mother got on to Facebook and typed in one of the children’s names and hit a Facebook page," said Rowley.

It was her daughter, and they started corresponding. The mother even sent the teenager a family photo, dating back to before the split. But the relationship stalled. "The teenager said, 'Not interested in a relationship. We just have a happy life. Leave us alone,'" said Rowley.

The teen’s Facebook page disappeared. The mother, who still lives in San Bernardino, contacted Rowley and his investigators. They tracked the Facebook profile and the girl to Orlando, Fla.

Utrera was then arrested and is now charged with two counts of kidnapping, and two counts of violating child custody orders.

As for the mother and her children, they will have to build a new relationship.

"There is no relationship there," said Carrie Hoeppner of the Florida Department of Children & Families. "You don't have that immediate joyful reunification. If in fact that is what will progress, it will take time. These children will have to build a relationship, and that is something that will not happen overnight."
 
 
Facebook is being used to serve summonses (supeonas?) here in Oz.
 
 
@dadpad,

I don't see how that could stick, but it seems it must.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
I don't see how that could stick, but it seems it must.

 

Court uses Facebook to serve paternity test order
KIM ARLINGTON COURTS
June 4, 2010
In a case which highlights the difficulties of keeping a low profile when you have a Facebook account, a court has ordered that the social networking site be used to serve legal documents on an elusive father in a child support dispute.

The federal magistrate who made the order, Stewart Brown, said the Adelaide case was unusual but ''demonstrative of social movements and the currency of the times''.

The man, known as Mr Howard, had a brief relationship with a woman who later gave birth. No father was named on the birth certificate, and when the mother sought an assessment of child support her application was rejected for lack of legal proof of paternity.

The mother's solicitor repeatedly wrote to Mr Howard asking him to undergo a paternity test, but he moved regularly and there was no reply. Letters sent care of his parents and current girlfriend elicited no reply, and a process server had no success delivering the documents.

But Mr Howard was a regular Facebook user. When Mr Brown was told a private message could be left for Mr Howard on Facebook, he ordered that the documents be served electronically.

In a recently published judgment, delivered in Adelaide, Mr Brown said he was satisfied Mr Howard had been properly served with the documents and inferred Mr Howard wanted no involvement as ''the parentage test can have only one outcome because he is [the child's] father''.

Mr Howard closed his Facebook profile and MySpace website after the documents were served. But Mr Brown found the mother was entitled to an assessment of child support, payable by Mr Howard.

It is believed to be only the second time in Australia that legal documents have been served via Facebook; a Canberra law firm used it in 2008 to serve notice of a judgment on two borrowers who defaulted on a loan.

Tim Butcher, a senior lecturer at RMIT, said it was an example of creativity in the legal system.

''People are finding new ways to use social media every day,'' he said. ''It's only natural that courts, businesses, government agencies will use these tools to track us down. You have the world at your fingertips - but the flip side is that people can find us as well.''
 http://www.theage.com.au/technology/technology-news/court-uses-facebook-to-serve-paternity-test-order-20100603-x7dc.html 
 
 
June 3, 2010

Hundreds of seemingly drunk lorikeets are falling out of trees and the sky in Palmerston, near Darwin, mystifying vets. The parrots are showing signs of drunkenness by losing all co-ordination and passing out, and then cowering in cages as they recover from their "hangovers".

a few other odd spots
 http://www.theage.com.au/execute_search.html?text=odd+spot&ss=theage.com.au 
 
 
@dadpad,

Really, I can't fault the judge for that. Plus, the guy had it coming.
 
 
I had seen a number of those stories about the web. Interesting to have them gathered like that. As for the birds, it is common around here for them to attack a tree or bush of fermented berries and get drunk that way.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

we get one of those "odd spots" in our national daily each day.
You can understand why many Australians shake their heads and think all Americans are stupid when we are exposed to daily doses of: A missouri man... and A Florida woman....
 
 
@dadpad,

Can't blame them. To me, it shows that news gathering is pretty darned active in the states. Insatiable.
 
 
Another facebook application: THEY'RE going THERE with THEIR friends. It's called grammar, use it.
 
 
My dog is half Labrador retriever and half pit bull. Naturally, I figured, if she ever got the little kitten across the fence, it was a goner. A week or so old, three kittens were waiting for their mother. One kept wandering up to the fence wire. I restrained Punky once and grabbed the kitten. I pitched it onto a soft spot away from the wire. Then I brought my dog into the house. A while later, I noticed she had gone back out. I ran around the house to find her carrying the kitten around in her mouth. I got her to release it. Could not believe she had made no effort to harm it.
 
 
My good friend and co-worker got his GED this week. I feel so proud.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

That's great about your friend, edgar. Often a GED is better than a regular diploma.

Wish that I could have found a photo for this news.

 http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20100607/ap_on_re_eu/eu_britain_gladiators__graveyard 
 
 
That's a awesome story, letty.
 
 
Neighbors From Hell brings a little bit of Hell to Houston

In Neighbors from Hell, a new TBS animated series premiering tonight at 9 p.m., a family of demons moves to the suburbs in an attempt to stop a greedy oil company from developing a drill large enough to reach the inner core of Earth, where Hell is located. And those suburbs? Happen to be in Houston.

The series has stellar comedic credentials: the creator, Pam Brady, was a former writer on South Park, and two of the demons are voiced by none other than the hilarious Patton Oswalt and Molly Shannon. But is this series a diss on our hometown? Brady claims, "Houston equals every suburban town. I love space and space travel! I'm very pro Houston!" Still, there's something unsettling about the fact that our hometown is portrayed as being filled with people whose behavior shocks the consciences of demons from Hell. Then again, BP does have offices in our fair city. /cheapshot
 
 
You can only be young once. But you can always be immature. - Dave Barry
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Funny, edgar, and the demons' anecdote is awesome as well.

Another oddity.

 

Galileo's finger.

I couldn't find but one, however.

 http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20100608/ap_on_re_eu/eu_italy_galileo_s_fingers 
 
 
@Letty,

Here are the two left, Miss Letty:

 
 
 
The Flayed Fingers, by Guy De Maupassant.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

I'll give you a hand, mon bel ami..
 
 
Scary stuff.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Indeed..
 
 
Bra training complete...
 
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8qIkou5oNXo 
 
 
 
Melissa Dahl writes: Well. Here’s something you didn’t even know you needed to be terrified of.

A healthy, 25-year-old Christian minister went to an Alameda, Calif., emergency room in September 2008, complaining of something in his eye, reports a case study in this month’s issue of The Annals of Emergency Medicine. An eyelash, maybe? A pesky speck of dust, perhaps? Or, ew, maybe a stray contact lens had wedged its way somewhere in there?

It’s just so much worse. Israel Orellana’s discomfort was caused by something called an African eye worm. That’s a worm. In his EYEBALL.

It’s an infection called loaiasis, a skin and eye disease caused by the loa loa, a parasitic worm endemic to West and Central Africa
 
 
just wanted to say, this is one my favourite threads... nothing to add sadly.
 
 
I love the Doritos commercial. I've watched it multiple times.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

African eye worm? Yikes, edgar. Don't remember the Doritos commercial, however.

another oddity.

 

Alain Robert the human spider man.

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AcV7E60r9eU 
 
 
All I can say about human spiders is, they is nuts. Oddly, I have never heard about one having a serious fall.
 
 
WASHINGTON " About 5,500 years ago someone in the mountains of Armenia put his best foot forward in what is now the oldest leather shoe ever found.

It'll never be confused with a penny loafer or a track shoe, but the well-preserved footwear was made of a single piece of leather, laced up the front and back, researchers reported Wednesday in PLoS One, a journal of the Public Library of Science.

Worn and shaped by the wearer's right foot, the shoe was found in a cave along with other evidence of human occupation. The shoe had been stuffed with grass, which dated to the same time as the leather of the shoe " between 5,637 and 5,387 years ago.

"This is great luck," enthused archaeologist Ron Pinhasi of University College Cork in Cork, Ireland, who led the research team.

"We normally only find broken pots, but we have very little information about the day-to-day activity" of these ancient people. "What did they eat? What did they do? What did they wear? This is a chance to see this... it gives us a real glimpse into society," he said in a telephone interview.

Previously the oldest leather shoe discovered in Europe or Asia was on the famous Otzi, the "Iceman" found frozen in the Alps a few years ago and now preserved in Italy. Otzi has been dated to 5,375 and 5,128 years ago, a few hundred years more recent than the Armenian shoe.

Otzi's shoes were made of deer and bear leather held together by a leather strap. The Armenian shoe appears to be made of cowhide, Pinhasi said.

Older sandals have been found in a cave in Missouri, but those were made of fiber rather than leather.

The shoe found in what is now Armenia was found in a pit, along with a broken pot and some wild goat horns.

But Pinhasi doesn't think it was thrown away. There was discarded material that had been tossed outside the cave, while this pit was inside in the living area. And while the shoe had been worn, it wasn't worn out.

It's not clear if the grass that filled the shoe was intended as a lining or insulation, or to maintain the shape of the shoe when it was stored, according to the researchers.

The Armenian shoe was small by current standards " European size 37 or U.S. women's size 7 " but might have fit a man of that era, according to Pinhasi.

He described the shoe as a single piece of leather cut to fit the foot. The back of the shoe was closed by a lace passing through four sets of eyelets. In the front, 15 pairs of eyelets were used to lace from toe to top.

There was no reinforcement in the sole, just the one layer of soft leather. "I don't know how long it would last in rocky terrain," Pinhasi said.

He noted that the shoe is similar to a type of footwear common in the Aran Islands, west of Ireland, up until the 1950s. The Irish version, known as "pampooties" reportedly didn't last long, he said.

"In fact, enormous similarities exist between the manufacturing technique and style of this (Armenian) shoe and those found across Europe at later periods, suggesting that this type of shoe was worn for thousands of years across a large and environmentally diverse region," Pinhasi said.

While the Armenian shoe was soft when unearthed, the leather has begun to harden now that it is exposed to air, Pinhasi said.

Oh, and unlike a lot of very old shoes, it didn't smell
 
 
Have you received an e-mail claiming you're about to be assassinated?

Don't worry; law agencies say its author doesn't really want to kill you " just separate you from your money.

The e-mails that have been terrifying Montgomery County residents for the past few days are part of an international scam that dates back years. In most cases, they claim a hit man will kill you if you don't give him money. But law enforcement say the threats are usually mass-mailed and have never been carried out.

Most of the time, the scam's operators are located outside the United States in countries like Nigeria. They're a variation on other Internet extortion schemes, such as the infamous “419” scam, in which people are encouraged to send copious amounts of money in order to secure the release of millions of dollars.

The Montgomery County Sheriff's Office recommends you delete unsolicited e-mails or report them to the Internet Crime Complaint Center at ic3.gov.

If an e-mailed threat seems personal, police say, or if you're otherwise sure you're being targeted for assassination, call police immediately.
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZPyo_MxRfeo 
 
 
 
Boy has parasitic twin removed
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Wow!

Another oddity, edgar.

 
 
 
Insterding. Calls to mind a novel I read when still perty young.

DONOVAN'S BRAIN
The novel is written in the form of diary entries by a physician, Dr. Patrick Cory, a middle-aged physician whose experiments at keeping a brain alive are subsidized by Cory's wealthy wife. Under investigation for tax evasion and criminal financial activities, millionaire megalomaniac W.H. Donovan crashes his private plane in the desert near the home of Dr. Cory. The physician is unable to save Donovan's life, but removes his brain on the chance that it might survive, placing the gray matter in an electrically charged, oxygenated saline solution within a glass tank. The brainwaves indicate thought --and life-- continue. Cory makes several futile attempts to communicate with it. Finally, one night Cory receives unconscious commands, jotting down a list of names in a handwriting not his own-- it is Donovan's. Corey successfully attempts telepathic contact with Donovan's brain, much to the concern of Corey's occasional assistant, Dr. Schratt, an elderly alcoholic.

Gradually, the malignant intelligence takes over Cory's personality, leaving him in an amnesiac fugue state when he awakes. The brain uses Corey to do his bidding, signing checks in Donovan's name, and continuing the magnate's illicit financial schemes. Corey becomes increasingly like the paranoid Donovan himself, his physique and manner morphing into the limping image of the departed criminal. Donovan's bidding culminates in an attempt to have Corey to kill a young girl who stands in the way of his plans. Realizing he will soon have no control over his own body and mind, Corey devises a plan to destroy the brain during its quiescent period. Corey resists the brain's hypnotic power by repeating the rhyme "He thrusts his fists against the posts and still insists he sees the ghosts." With Dr. Schratt's help, he destroys the housing tank with an ax and leaves the brain of Donovan to die, thus ending his reign of madness.
Wikipedia
 
 
Lost Camera Hitches 1,100 Mile Ride on Sea Turtle
(NewsCore) - A photographer was reunited with a camera he had lost in the Caribbean after a sea turtle swam all the way to Florida with it, De Telegraaf reported Wednesday.

The camera's strap caught on the reptile's shell after Dutchman Dick de Bruin dropped it in the sea during a trip to Aruba last November.

In its efforts to free itself, the turtle accidentally switched the waterproof device on and filmed part of its 1,100 mile journey.

The camera washed up six months later in Key West, Fla., where it was spotted by Paul Shultz, an investigator with the U.S. Coast Guard.

Shultz charged up the battery and found a series of photos capturing various Aruban landmarks.

He posted the footage on YouTube along with a brief note about its contents in a bid to trace its owner, De Telegraaf said.

Residents of the sundrenched Caribbean island circulated the report until De Bruin, a Dutch photographer who had been taking snaps of a shipwreck, spotted it and contacted Shultz.

"I'm still amazed it floated all the way to Key West. I will be shipping it Fed-Ex to you tomorrow'" an excited Shultz replied.

Experts say the camera may have floated part of the way before become entangled in the turtle.

Aruba is one of the Lesser Antilles in the southern Caribbean Sea, located around 15 miles off the coast of Venezuela.

The 21 mile long island forms part of the Kingdom of the Netherlands.
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ACpNVD5GMUw 
 
 
 
 
 
The tiger stripes look amazingly realistic.
 
 
The race has been run in and around Llanwrtyd Wells since 1981 The annual Man v Horse race in the heart of the Welsh countryside has been won again by a four-legged entrant.

Sly Dai, ridden by Llinos Jones, from the contest's home village of Llanwrtyd Wells, Powys, ran the 22-mile course in two hours seven minutes four seconds.

The first man home was Haggai Chepkwony, aged 40, a Kenyan living in Bristol, in 2:17. He was also first man across the line in 2006.

Man has triumphed only twice in the 31 years of the race, in 2004 and 2007.

The event carries a 1,000 guinea (£1,050) first prize, and it began to try to settle a bar-room argument over which was faster over a long distance.

When Mr Chepkwony was first man across the line in 2006 he was some nine minutes behind the winning horse.

Although he was about 10 minutes slower than the horse this time, his overall time was two minutes faster than four years ago.

Mr Chepkwony, who left the British Army two years ago, said he was getting better at the race, and believed that one day he could win outright.

'Minor bumps and bruises'

The run begins in the town centre and continues through countryside on the edge of the Brecon Beacons.

The number of horses is limited to 50 for safety reasons, and there were more than 500 entrants in total.

The race is organised by Green Events, which is also in charge of other wacky Llanwrtyd Wells competitions such as the annual bog snorkelling championship.

The Green Events chairman, Lindsay Ketteringham, said: "There were one or two minor bumps and bruises, as there always are, but it's been a gorgeous day".

However, the two-legged competitors failed to take full advantage of Saturday's warm weather, which favoured them as horses overheat more readily.

Mr Ketteringham said: "The higher the temperature, the horses struggle".
 
 
A vicar has revived an ancient law to call members of her parish together for archery practice.

The Reverend Mary Edwards, of Collingbourne Ducis, near Marlborough, called residents to the village recreation ground on Friday.

Residents were rewarded for complying with the law with a bar, a barbecue and live music.

Church warden Mike Cox said: "It seems she's still entitled to do that."

"I've been checking on the web and most archery experts and clergy seem to agree she is," Mr Cox added.

"Though a lot of the laws were repealed, that particular one still stands so she's entitled to call the men of the village, and presumably the women and children too, to archery practice.

"Mary's always wanted to do it ever since she found out she could. It's been one of those hankering ambitions. It's sufficiently bizarre that you want to have a go at it."

Mrs Edwards said: "It's an unrepealed law from some time in the middle ages and I can call all the men - but I've extended it to all people - in the parish to archery practice.

"We are celebrating the building of a new loo in the church. After all these years we have at long last brought running water to the church."
 
 
@edgarblythe,

A new loo in the church? Love it, edgar.

Don't know if this is the right streak, but it seems to match the news item.

 

 http://news.yahoo.com/nphotos/Hayabusa-southern-Australia-Glendambo-journey/photo//100614/481/urn_publicid_ap_org_c44333b52724456290a26dbfbfddf22c//s:/ap/20100614/ap_on_sc/as_australia_space_landing 
 
 
That's a great story, letty. I am eager to find out what they accomplished.
 
 
 http://www.cnn.com/video/#/video/us/2010/06/14/woman.shoots.self.health.wsbt?hpt=T2 
Here is the tale of a woman who could not afford proper care for her condition. Since nobody would help, she shot herself in the arm, hoping that would upgrade her condition to serious enough to be cared for.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
"We are celebrating the building of a new loo in the church."

 

is this a pew with a loo ?
 
 
@hamburgboy,

I think it may be spelled P-U.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

My word, edgar. I guess we do what must be done to get treatment for pain. That was odd, however.

hbg, funny.

 

Here are the results of the capsule, Texas.

 http://www.google.com/hostednews/ap/article/ALeqM5jbGWxryxkvUUxHdPWy7VYjKiDIKwD9GB2I580 
 
 
Thanks for the update on that, letty. It was remarkable acheivement, regardless of the final analysis.
 
 
 
This statue was struck by lightning. It burned to the ground.
 
 
DENVER – An American man has been detained in the mountains of Pakistan after Pakistani authorities found him carrying a sword, pistol and night-vision goggles on a Rambo-style solo mission to hunt down and kill Osama bin Laden.

Friends and family say construction worker Gary Brooks Faulkner is a devout, good-humored Christian who has traveled widely in that part of the world.

The 51-year-old Faulkner, who has a lengthy arrest record and served time in a Colorado prison, arrived June 3 in the town of Bumburate and stayed in a hotel there. He was assigned a police guard, as is common for foreigners visiting remote parts of Pakistan.

When he checked out without informing police, officers began looking for him, according to the top police officer in the Chitral region, Mumtaz Ahmad Khan. Faulkner was found late Sunday in a forest.

"We initially laughed when he told us that he wanted to kill Osama bin Laden," Khan said. But when officers seized the weapons and night-vision equipment, "our suspicion grew." He said the American was trying to cross into the nearby Afghan region of Nuristan.

Chitral and Nuristan are among several rumored hiding places for bin Laden along the mountainous border between Afghanistan and Pakistan.

Pakistan's military and intelligence establishment generally deny the possibility that bin Laden is hiding somewhere along the Pakistan-Afghan border, as Western intelligence agencies believe.

Faulkner's sister, Deanna M. Faulkner of Grand Junction, Colo., said her brother suffers from kidney disease that has left him with only 9 percent kidney function. But she told The Associated Press that she did not think his illness was his motivation to go to Pakistan.

"I don't believe this was, 'I'm dying, and I'm going to do a hurrah thing,'" she said. She said her brother was "very religious" but would not elaborate.

Family members have not heard from him since he left the country, his sister said.

On Tuesday, Faulkner was being questioned by intelligence officials in Peshawar, the main northwestern city. He has not been charged with any wrongdoing.

Khan said Faulkner told investigators he was angry after the Sept. 11 attacks in the United States.

"I think Osama is responsible for bloodshed in the world, and I want to kill him," Khan quoted him as saying.

When asked why he thought he had a chance of tracing bin Laden, Faulkner replied, "God is with me, and I am confident I will be successful in killing him," Khan said.

He said police confiscated a small amount of hashish, enough for a single joint, from Faulkner.

"I'm worried about him," his sister said. "I'm worried that in Pakistan, they won't give him his dialysis. And if he doesn't get it, he's in serious trouble."

Bin laden, who is also reported to have kidney problems, has evaded a massive manhunt since the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks on the United States, which he is accused of masterminding along with other attacks. The federal government has offered a bounty of $25 million for information leading to his capture.

Faulkner's brother, Scott Faulkner, said his brother is "doing something that we would all wish to do."

"If we saw Osama walking down the sidewalk... well, I know I would probably put a bullet in the guy's head. Yes, I'm a doctor, but I'm still an American," he told CNN.

Scott Faulkner said his brother had been to Afghanistan at least six times and had "picked up quite a bit" of the local language, grown a long beard and "looked like Taliban."

"He could blend in with the local population and go places that our military cannot go," he said, adding that his brother "has some assistance. He's made friends. I will not tell you who those friends are because that's up to Gary to reveal his sources."

At Faulkner's last known address, a modest apartment building in the northern Colorado town of Greeley, no residents answered their doors Tuesday. An apartment manager would not confirm whether Faulkner still lived there.

Hugo Corral, who owns a barber shop in Greeley, recalled cutting Faulkner's hair a few months ago. He said Faulkner was quiet and wouldn't answer his questions. After the haircut, Corral said, he saw Faulkner acting strangely outside his shop.

"He would walk, then stop, then do something like he was saluting something. It was kind of weird," Corral said. Through the glass of his shop, he said he could hear Faulkner cursing at no one in particular.

Gary Faulkner was in and out of Colorado state prisons between 1981 and 1993, serving a total of about seven years in five separate stints for burglary, larceny and parole violations, state officials said.

The Larimer County sheriff released a mug shot from a 2006 arrest on charges of failing to have car insurance. In the photo, Faulkner has shoulder-length gray hair parted in the middle with bangs that reach the sides of his wire-rim glasses.

He also has a shaggy, black beard with traces of gray hair in it, and he appears to be wearing a camouflage-patterned shirt.

Faulkner allegedly told Pakistani police he visited Pakistan seven times, and this was his third trip to Chitral, a mountainous region that attracts adventurous Western tourists and hikers. Unlike much of northwestern Pakistan, it is considered relatively safe for foreigners.

Deanna Faulkner said her brother had been "all over the world many times" but declined to give details of past trips.

U.S. Embassy spokesman Richard Snelsire said the embassy had received notification from Pakistani officials that an American citizen had been arrested. He said embassy officials were trying to meet the man and confirm his identity.

Deanna Faulkner said her brother usually gets dialysis every three days but can go up to two weeks without it.

"We contacted the State Department to let them know of his medical condition and that his family is here and we love him," she said.

___

Chris Brummit reported from Islamabad. Associated Press Writer P. Solomon Banda in Denver and AP researcher Jennifer Farrar in New York also contributed to this report.
 
 
Does anybody watch this TV show? I do now and then.

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=O5WOSAubvEk 
 
 
KENNER, La. — Authorities in the New Orleans area say a cab driver is accused of locking a Texas tourist in his cab and demanding a 10 percent tip on a $33 airport fare.

The Jefferson Parish Sheriff's Office says in an incident report that 37-year-old Sohail Kahn was booked with extortion and false imprisonment, and the New Orleans Taxicab Regulation Bureau also seized his permit.

Kahn could not be reached for comment Wednesday by The Associated Press because he has no listed phone number.

The Times-Picayune quotes the incident report as saying the passenger, a 57-year-old woman from Bellaire, called 911 from her cell phone after arguing with the driver for a half-hour.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

And here was me thinking that tipping was "optional".  

What a idiot this cab driver is!
 
 
@Reyn,

I have seen people go to pretty good lengths to get tips. Once, in a restaurant, the waiter brought out exactly how many dollars he wanted in quarters when he gave my change. A friend in NYC had his truck getting worked on. It was not that big a job, but the mechanic kept telling my friend, "I don't know if I can have it ready today." After a long standoff, my friend gave the mechanic a substantial tip, and the truck was rolled out, all fixed up, in less than ten minutes.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Well, I know what I would do. I would no longer shop at those businesses!
 
 
I just remembered my first day in New York City. I went in some hole in the wall coffee shop and had a cup. The man serving me stuck all of my money in the register. "I kept the change for a tip," he said. It was not a lot of money. I figured it must be the way they do things there. But I was carefull after that to carry small bills and lots of change.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Hey Edgar, here's a nice little story to add to your collection of oddities.

It's a small story where some group in Vancouver bought some cars, took out the engines, and put trees there instead! Photo included.

 http://stickshiftproject.com/2010/06/17/102/#comments 
 
 
@Reyn,

Great, Reyn, and here's another. The body of Big Foot?

 

Billy Willard's story.
Here in Spotsylvania County, in the forests around Lake Anna, Willard claims there have been 14 sightings in the past decade of that most fabled of cryptozoic beasts: Bigfoot.
Or Sasquatch, as the elusive, apelike brute is referred to in more high-minded circles -- and on the side of Willard's blue pickup. The decal on the truck reads "Sasquatch Watch of Virginia," of which Willard is chief pooh-bah (when he's not earning a living installing and removing underground home oil tanks).
Go ahead, call him a loon, a flake, a huckster. He's heard it all. But Willard knows what he knows, which is that three people from this area -- a woman, her husband and their granddaughter -- told him they saw a shaggy, super-size figure on two legs gallivanting across their wooded property. Last month, Willard led a weeklong expedition to the site, where he installed five motion-sensor cameras that will snap photos if the big galoot wanders by again.
 
 
@Reyn,

Say, that's ridiculous.
 
 
 
@Letty,

Well, letty, I have never seen big foot in Tomball. That's all I am saying. Some years back, there were constant sightings, in Texas, of Big Bird, a six foot tall bird of some sort. Eventually the sightings dropped off and nobody today seems to believe it exists.
 
 
HEADLINES FROM GULF OF MEXICO
BP put a large wedding ring over the well leak earlier this morning and it immediately stopped putting out.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
Say, that's ridiculous.
 

Yeah, I didn't put the photo up, because I knew it was huge.  
 
 
SAN FRANCISCO — The pink slip for Harold Voelker's 1956 Ford F-100 pickup was tucked away with the memories of his prized truck after it was stolen in 1972 in Los Angeles.

Both were dusted off when authorities told the 63-year-old man last week they had found the vehicle in Modesto.

The California Highway Patrol says officials noticed a discrepancy in the vehicle identification number when a couple tried to register it after receiving it from a relative in Texas who didn't know it was stolen.

A CHP officer found the original identification number and traced it to Voelker, who says the truck is running well and even seems to have more power.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Ah, a nice story with a happy ending! I'll see if I can come up with one myself.  
 
 
Walt Disney chose Marilyn Monroe as a figure model for Tinker Bell.
 
 
John Lennon's handwritten lyrics to the epic Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band closer "A Day in the Life" sold today for an impressive $1.2 million, a bid that far exceeded its initial $500,000 to $700,000 pre-auction estimate. According to Bloomberg, three buyers were vying for the piece of Beatles memorabilia at Sotheby's of New York, and the winner was an unidentified American who phoned in the $1.2 million bid. Despite breaking the million-dollar threshold, the handwritten lyrics narrowly missed becoming the highest-priced Beatles lyric sheet to sell at auction: In 2005, the hand-penned lyrics to "All You Need is Love" went for $1.25 million.

As Rolling Stone previously reported, the handwritten lyrics to "A Day in the Life" were once the property of Beatles road manager Malcolm "Mal" Evans and represent the legendary song as a work in progress: There were spelling mistakes and words crossed out as Lennon developed the track, which Rolling Stone ranked as one of the 500 Greatest Songs of All Time. On the back side of the lyric sheet, however, is a more polished version of "A Day in the Life," written in all capital letters, with a break in Lennon's lyrics where he anticipated Paul McCartney would add his famous "Woke up, fell out of bed…" bridge. "A Day in the Life" is regarded as one of the final true collaborations between Lennon and McCartney and a song that Rolling Stone said "made rock's possibilities seem infinite."

The conclusion of the Sotheby's auction ends an adventure of sorts for the prized lyric sheet. Sotheby's of London first sold the sheet in 1992, then in 2006 it returned to the block when New York auction house Bonham's hosted a "sealed bid" auction, at which point it failed to sell. At the time, Bonham's estimated that Lennon likely penned both versions of the lyrics in the morning and afternoon of January 17th, 1967.
 
 
Spaghettios are being recalled, I saw in the news. Must have accidentally gotten real food in the cans.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Marie Callendar is also doing a recall; this one for samonella. I always knew it was wrong to take raw vegetables, passing them quickly through wamd steam, and calling them cooked.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
... "A Day in the Life" sold today for an impressive $1.2 million,...
 

So, what ya figure, Edgar, will this be a good investment for the buyer? It's a lot to pay for the lyrics of a single song.
 
 
@roger,

Sounds like a recipe for feeding germs.
 
 
@Reyn,

 
 
... "A Day in the Life" sold today for an impressive $1.2 million,...
 

So, what ya figure, Edgar, will this be a good investment for the buyer? It's a lot to pay for the lyrics of a single song?

 

He must want it for sentimental value. I don't see how he could reap a profit in reselling it.
 
 
@Reyn,

Yeah. I bet you could get an actual recording and still save money.
 
 
I bought a vinyl copy of the album it's on a few years back, for about six to eight bucks.
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wgrrQwLdME8 
 
 
All together now.
Nah nah nah nennah nahh
neneah nna nahhh
 
 
ALBUQUERQUE, N.M. - No words were minced when the character Ed Bailey jumped out of his seat in one of the early scenes of "Tombstone" and told the slick gambler and gunslinger Doc Holliday — played by actor Val Kilmer — to scram after their poker game went sour.

"Take your money and get out 'cause I'm tired of listening to your mouth," Bailey yelled.

Well, some of Kilmer's real-life northern New Mexico neighbors share Bailey's sentiments. They're upset with him, saying he made disparaging comments about San Miguel County and for chasing away people fishing on the Pecos River at his ranch.

The bitter feelings that have been brewing over the last several years have reached a boiling point. But unlike Holliday, Kilmer won't be able to settle this with a knife or a pair of six-shooters.

Kilmer has been asked to appear before county commissioners to explain himself during a meeting next Wednesday.

Calls and e-mails to Kilmer and his publicist have not been returned, but commission chairman David Salazar said the actor has indicated he will show up.

"I think it's a chance for him, an opportunity, to straighten out the record," said Salazar. "I think if he goes ahead and explains what happened, if he was misquoted or if he said something and somebody took it the wrong way, I think it's to his benefit to clear that up."

The hope, Salazar said, is that something good — for Kilmer and the community — comes from the meeting.

The flap started when Kilmer's Pecos River Ranch sought to open three guest houses to paying customers. The county zoning and planning commission approved the proposal 3-2 in March, but Rowe resident Abran Tapia appealed to the commission.

"He's not a good neighbor. That's all there is to it," Tapia said in an interview with The Associated Press.

Tapia has never met Kilmer, but he proceeded to tick off a list of reasons why the actor is on the bottom of his list. Included were the disparaging comments Kilmer allegedly made in two magazine articles years ago and the "no trespassing" signs posted around Kilmer's sprawling ranch, which includes a few choice miles of the Pecos River.

In October 2003, Rolling Stone published an article that quoted Kilmer as saying he lived in the "homicide capital of the Southwest" and 80 percent "of the people in my county are drunk."

Despite Rolling Stone standing by the article, Kilmer denied the statements and said he had actually bragged about New Mexico during the interview. Days later, he took out an ad in the Santa Fe New Mexican, saying he loved New Mexico and Pecos.

To make matters worse, Kilmer tried to explain for an Esquire writer two years later the emotional toll acting takes on an artist by talking about the soldiers who were shipped off to fight in Vietnam and how they were mentally unprepared for the horror of war. He ended up saying most of them were sent to the war because they were "borderline criminal or poor."

An Army veteran, Tapia was offended. He said his cousin and friend from school had fought and died in Vietnam.

He also accused Kilmer of being racist, claiming that the actor is trying to create "a segregated facility" at the ranch by charging people to stay at the guest houses. Tapia reasons that local Hispanics in the area would be excluded because they wouldn't be able to afford a night at the ranch.

Kilmer recently told the Albuquerque Journal that the accusations against him have been upsetting for his friends.

"I'm not worried at all about the reaction because I just see it as an opportunity to bring people together," he told the newspaper. "No one would make a false statement like this statement of racism if they knew what we were doing."

The flap has caught the attention of everyone from the New Mexico chapter of the American Civil Liberties Union, which has offered to defend Kilmer's 1st Amendment rights, to the California-based Committee on Chicano Rights and Gov. Bill Richardson, who is known for his diplomatic problem-solving skills.

Richardson, who is friends with Kilmer, said he has been pushing for all sides to meet.

"Val, he's got his rights," the governor said. "The 1st Amendment protects him to say anything he wants, but those comments he made a long time ago were not good comments. So I think there's a possibility of a gracious exit for both sides with the meeting coming up."
 
 
Don Pratt has sold his taxi firm A Cornish taxi driver is £250,000 better off thanks to the will of a grateful customer.

For 20 years Don Pratt and his wife Gill ferried Mary Watson to and from the shops, to the doctors and on other errands around Newquay where she lived.

Ten years ago she moved away and died aged 86 in December 2009, leaving the couple her estate which included a small house and savings worth £250,000.

Mr Pratt, 65, has sold his taxi firm and has retired.

Mrs Watson became a regular customer of Don's Cabs after Mr Pratt offered to help take her shopping into her home.

After that Don's Cabs was the firm Mrs Watson used every day to get around the Cornish seaside resort.

Mr Pratt said: "I always try to help old people because one day you will be needing that help yourself.

She was a feisty lady, she did not take any nonsense from people
Don Pratt
"It should be the same for everyone."

Mr Pratt said Mrs Watson was always a good tipper and about 12 years ago she asked him to be best man at her remarriage.

He said: "She told me that if she outlasted her husband, 'I shall make sure I'll look after you.'

"I took it with a pinch of salt at the time."

Mrs Watson moved to Northampton 10 years ago, but Mr and Mrs Pratt kept in touch with her until about two years before she died.

"Her solicitor called to tell us she had remembered us in her will.

"I couldn't believe it when we found out she had left us everything.

"I'm not sure how her family feel about it, but the solicitor was clear that she wanted me to have what she left."

Mr Pratt has fond memories of her, even without the bequest.

"She was a feisty lady, she did not take any nonsense from people.

"I liked her. She was a lovely lady."

Now he has sold his taxi firm to a friend and is looking forward to a relaxing retirement.

"We worked days and nights. Now we can go travelling and all the other things we have not been able to do."

No-one was available for comment at the Argyle House care home in Northampton where Mrs Watson spent the last two years of her life
 
 
The extraordinary ability of tiny ants to carry huge loads has been known for some time.

But scientists have now employed high speed video cameras and revealed how the ants use controlled head movements to maintain their stability.

The researchers also discovered that an ant's neck plays a critical part in balancing the load, a feature previously unknown in any insect.

Grass-cutting ants (Atta vollenweideri) carry plant fragments many times heavier and longer than themselves.

These ants harvest grass, hauling fragments considerable distances back to their nest, sometimes exceeding 100m.

We did not expect the neck joint being involved

Ants maximise the amount of grass they transport by selecting long fragments, the researchers explain.

But this is not an easy thing to do; in order to carry the cargo, workers need to both lift and balance their load.

"In this study we could experimentally show that workers carrying long fragments often fell over," says Karin Moll from the University of Cambridge in the UK, who undertook the study with Dr Walter Federle, also from Cambridge University, and Dr Falvio Roces from the University of Wurzburg in Germany.

To find out how the ants maintained their stability, the research team used high speed video cameras to measure the insects' head movements.

They gave the ants pieces of paper soaked in orange juice to mimic grass leaf fragments and measured the angles at which they carried them.

"In order to maintain stability the combined centre of gravity of ant and load needs to remain above the area of the supporting legs," Ms Moll says.

The researchers found that the ants carried long fragments at a steeper angle than short fragments of the same mass.

"Workers do not hold fragments differently, but change fragment positions by up and down movements of their head at the neck joint," she says.

That allows the ants to adjust their "leaf position" even if they are walking up or down hills or over objects.

When walking uphill, workers carried fragments at a significantly steeper angle than ants on a horizontal trail, the researchers wrote in the journal.
When walking downhill, the ants carried fragments at a significantly shallower angle.

The study has provided the researchers with a further understanding of "ant biomechanics" and has yielded some surprising results.

Biomechanics is the term used to describe mechanical principles of living organisms.

"We did expect the ants to have evolved an adaptation that enables them to carry long grass fragments," say Ms Moll.

"However, we did not expect the neck joint being involved in the adjustment of the load position, as this is not known to be involved in load carriage in any other insect."

Ms Moll explains that the study underlines the importance of considering biomechanical factors in theories of how ants forage, especially if large loads are involved.

The team hopes to conduct further work to explore the detailed function of the head movements, and how ants may sense and perceive carrying unequally balanced objects.

Grass-cutting ants occur in the Chaco region of north Argentina and Paraguay and belong to a subgroup of leaf-cutting ants that specialise in harvesting grass leaves.

Leaf-cutting ants are fungus growers, which means that harvested leaves are not eaten by the workers themselves, but serve to cultivate a symbiotic fungus within the nest, which is the main nourishment source for the ant larvae.
 
 
CNN) -- Watch out! It's 10 feet tall and hairy, and it could be coming to get you -- or your dogs!

Bigfoot, also known as Sasquatch, is said to be an ape-like monster but has never been proved to exist. Still, reported sightings never stop: Tim Peeler of Cleveland County, North Carolina, says he saw a giant, hairy "man-looking person" with six fingers that was going after his dogs June 5 and told it to "git." On Thursday, a large, muddy footprint in Burke County, North Carolina, stirred up more Bigfoot speculation.

Across human societies, variations on mythical creature stories like that of Bigfoot have persisted for thousands of years, and accounts of seeing or hearing them still abound. There may be some basic culture-based need for these fantastical tales, said Todd Disotell, professor of anthropology at New York University.

Monsters represent dark aspects of our subconscious worlds and can be metaphors for the challenges of life, said Karen Sharf, a psychotherapist in New York.

"Some monsters are scary. Some monsters are friendly. Sometimes in movies or myths, we befriend the monster, and it's just like in our inner world: There are monsters; there are dark aspects that we have to face," she said.

Humans also have a fascination with the divide between their species and animals, and Bigfoot bridges that gap, said John Hawks, anthropologist at the University of Wisconsin, Madison.

Believing in these creatures and following their trails in the forest is somewhat akin to an amusement park ride: They are safe ways of experiencing fear, said Jacqueline Woolley, professor of psychology at the University of Texas at Austin.

People are still searching for evidence of Scotland's Loch Ness Monster, said to have first been spotted by Vikings in the sixth century. There have also been reported sightings of mermaids -- in Israel last year, for one -- and ghosts: For instance, there are still believers in La Llorona, "the crying woman" said to have killed the children she had with Spanish explorer Hernán Cortés.

Other cultures also have legendary folk monsters that have supposedly been sighted but haven't been proved to exist. The "chupacabra," roughly translated as "goat sucker" in Spanish, has been blamed for the deaths of goats in Mexico. The blood-drinking creature is said to look like a cross between a giant dog and a lizard, and it has fiery eyes. A coyote-like creature in Blanco, Texas, created a frenzy last year as some speculated it could be a chupacabra.

Humans are inherently interested in the blurred line between fantasy and reality, psychologists say. People also want to feel like heroes; stories such as David and Goliath help people see themselves as capable of tackling their own challenges, even if their "monster" happens to be their boss or in-law, she said.

Serious scientists have studied the evidence that hunters of Bigfoot and others collect but have never made a shocking discovery based upon them.

Disotell has conducted DNA analyses of more than 15 samples over the years of blood, feces, bone, hair and other remnants of supposed chupacabra or Bigfoot-like creatures. His samples have come from various places in the United States, Canada and as far as Nepal, where the Abominable Snowman or Yeti is said to reside.

"It stretches credibility just from the sense that you can't just have one or two of these beasts running around for tens of thousands of years; you need a population to be viable," he said.

The "evidence" he has examined was, in reality, material from bears, coyotes, humans, mountain goats,and inorganic sources. He ran analyses of their DNA with the same rigor as any other samples in his lab, which routinely does such tests to help classify species of primates from all over the world.

Another strike against the reality of Bigfoot and its brethren is the lack of photos,
 
 
Twelve days after Lady Gaga wound up in his box at Shea Stadium during a Mets game, Jerry Seinfeld has called her "a jerk" and then some.

Joking or no? Read and decide.

"This woman is a jerk. I hate her," Seinfeld said during a WFAN radio interview on Monday. "I can't believe they put her in my box, which I paid for."

Gaga, dressed in a bra and swilling beer, was moved from her front row seat to Seinfeld's empty box (without his knowledge) after flipping off photographers.

"You give people the finger and you get upgraded? Is that the world we're living in now?" he said.

Seinfeld first said when asked about the June 10th incident, "I wish her the best. You take one 'A' off of that and you've got gag."

"I don't know what these young people think or how they promote their careers," Seinfeld said. "I'm older, I'm 56. I look at Lady Gaga the way Keith Hernandez watches these kids when they pull the pocket out, they wear the inside-out pocket.... Do you think he understands that? He can't understand that. That's a new game, that's kids."

He added, "I'm not one of these all-publicity-is-good people. People talk about you need exposure -- you could die of exposure."

 
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Sx-8N8xEedw 
 
 
NEW YORK — New York City's famous Naked Cowboy wants a bikini-clad woman who calls herself The Naked Cowgirl to stop ripping off his trademark.

The Times Square cowboy, whose real name is Robert Burck, is known for strumming his guitar wearing only briefs and a cowboy hat. He has sent a cease-and-desist letter to Sandy Kane, who wears a red, white and blue cowboy hat and matching bikini.

Burck says if Kane's going to make money by posing for photos, he wants her to sign a "Naked Cowboy Franchise Agreement." Most of his licensed franchisees are required to pay $5,000 a year or $500 a month and go through a screening process.

Kane, who is in her 50s, is a former stripper who's now a fixture of the city comedy scene. Her real name is Sandra Brodsky. She says she doesn't owe Burck anything.
 
 
Mapping Louse DNA Could Help Fight The Parasite

Scientists have decoded the DNA sequence of the human body louse. They're hoping that the new discovery will give them clues to how this pesky parasite evolved with its human host, as well as how to fend off the disease-spreading bug.
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JMRMW1FXSHw 
 
 
SIOUX FALLS, S.D. -- The South Dakota Supreme Court has ruled that a police officer acted correctly when he seized 15 cats from a woman who was driving with the animals running free inside her car.

In a 3-2 decision Thursday, the justices ruled that the felines were a distraction and interfered with driver Patricia Edwards' ability to see where she was going.

Chief Justice David Gilbertson said Edwards nearly backed into patrol car at a convenience store parking lot in Pierre, S.D., because of the moggies in her back window.

The court said Edwards and her cats presented a significant risk to the public.

Edwards was appealing a lower court ruling that transferred ownership of the cats to a humane society for adoption.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
SIOUX FALLS, S.D. --... seized 15 cats from a woman who was driving with the animals running free inside her car....
 

15 cats in a car... loose?  

Okay, what I want to know is how anyone would be able to get that many cats into a car, and then be able to keep them there to begin with!
 
 
I only report them. I can't vouch for the accuracy of a story.
 
 
A sailor has returned to shore after spending more than three years at sea without touching dry land.

Reid Stowe, 58, docked in Manhattan after his 1,152 day voyage, and was greeted by his girlfriend and 23-month toddler who he had never seen.

Mr Stowe left in the 70-foot (21m) two-masted sailing boat in April 2007.

Guinness World Records say they are looking into the claim that the trip sets a new record for the longest voyage.

Mr Stowe set off from New Jersey on a round-the-world trip which finished in Manhattan.

He originally set off with his girlfriend, Soanya Ahmad, 26, until she had to return to shore after suspecting she was pregnant.

The couple agreed that he would continue without her, despite it meaning that he would miss the birth of their son.

He said that seeing her go was the hardest part of his trip.

"Before we left, we had an agreement that if I had to get off for any reason, he would go on," Ms Ahmad said.

"I knew if he came back and didn't finish the voyage, he would just go back again. There was no way he wasn't going to finish it."

Yoga and painting
Mr Stowe said his trip was a "voyage of love" The vessel was built by Mr Stowe and his family 30 years ago, and named "Anne" after his mother.

While at sea, Mr Stowe says he spent his time repairing torn sails, painting, practising yoga and writing a book.

He was able to send e-mails and make satellite phone calls.

Mr Stowe refers to his trip as a "voyage of love".

"She's done what no vessel in the world has done," Mr Stowe said.

"She got worn out and beat down to death.

"I'll tell you that boat will take me for another year and there is still a years worth of food on that boat... It's a magical boat, it's full of love."

Charles Doane, editor of Sail magazine, said he believes that Mr Stowe set a new sailing record.

He said that the GPS satellite system that tracked the voyage provides evidence that the boat had not touched land during the trip.
 
 
WATERVILLE, Wash. — An argument over butter in a macaroni and cheese recipe churned into violence between a brother and sister near East Wenatchee.

A 21-year-old man called police June 6 to say his 17-year-old sister had tried to cut his neck with the serrated edge of a spatula.

The police report says the sister was making macaroni and cheese when her brother asked if she was using butter. That led to an argument over the difference between butter and margarine. And, then butter battle escalated.

The Wenatchee World reports the girl was charged in Douglas County Superior Court with fourth-degree assault.
 
 
When Ray Grasshoff saw his 3-year-old beagle, Jack, tossing a brightly striped snake violently in his mouth on June 9, then rubbing his snout, he remembered a rhyme from his childhood days working around cattle: "Red on yellow, kill a fellow." Sure enough, Jack was tossing a poisonous coral snake, identifiable by its red stripes next to yellow.

Grasshoff, 54, raced his pet from the family's backyard to an emergency veterinarian in nearby South Austin. Jack was panting heavily and vomited in the car.

But soon after they arrived, Grasshoff learned the emergency vet couldn't find any coral snake antivenin for animals in Austin.

That's because the company that used to make the antidote, Wyeth, now owned by Pfizer Inc., closed the manufacturing plant and stopped making the drug in 2003, Pfizer spokeswoman Gwen Fisher said.

That has led to a nationwide shortage of the rarely used antivenin, and no other company has stepped up to make the drug.

$1,556 per vial
The antivenin, which Fisher said costs $1,556 per vial (and generally requires several for treatment), is evidently not profitable because of its infrequent use, according to published reports.

After Oct. 31, existing supplies will finally expire. The Food and Drug Administration twice extended the deadline on vials that were to expire Oct. 31, 2008, saying testing showed they still were viable.

There will not be a third extension, FDA spokeswoman Shelly Burgess said Friday.

"We still have supply on hand that we are carefully managing," Pfizer's Fisher said. "We, as a company, do realize the critical medical importance of the product, and we are exploring alternatives."

Chews on its prey
Luckily, bites by shy coral snakes account for fewer than 1 percent of U.S. snakebites, and antivenin is not always needed. Only one human coral snake death has been reported in the more than 40 years antivenin has been available in the U.S.

Without it, deaths are about 10 percent of those bitten, according to an online eMedicine article.

Unlike a rattlesnake, which has front fangs that strike with efficient force, a coral snake has much smaller fangs and teeth.

It chews on its prey to deliver its venom, and "most people don't tolerate that very well, and they rip the snake off" before they get much venom, said Dr. Pat Crocker, chief of emergency medicine at Dell Children's Medical Center.

Emergency treatment
He said he's seen about a dozen coral snake bites in 30 years, but has used coral snake antivenin only once.

People and pets who are bitten still need to get emergency treatment and might need to be hospitalized and placed on a ventilator in case the person's or pet's respiratory system is paralyzed, Crocker said.

Jack was not showing any neurological damage, said Dr. Stephanie Fletcher at the Emergency Animal Hospital of Northwest Austin, South location.

He survived after spending the night at the hospital and being sent home with medicine, Grasshoff said.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

I bet they don't run out of Viagra, though...
 
 
@Rockhead,

Heck, a school district I just read about is giving condoms to 5 year olds.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

bet they make balloon animals with them...
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
I only report them. I can't vouch for the accuracy of a story.

 

Heavens, I don't doubt that the story isn't accurate.  

I'm just speculating outloud as to how someone would be able to corral 15 cats into a car, without some not wandering off. Cats are notoriously hard to herd.  
 
 
@Reyn,

I once had to put two cats in a car. It was not easy.
 
 
Here's how it could be done:

Get in the car, close the doors and all the windows except the driver's window, leaving it 6" down. Then have another person outside the car put each cat in through the partially open window until all are in. Then close the window really fast.

Whatever method you chose (excepting anesthesia), you'd have to have at least one extra person to help. I cannot imagine a single way to do this alone.
 
 
Yeah, I guess two people could manage.
 
 
The Raytown farmer who posted a sign on a semi-truck trailer accusing Democrats of being the “Party of Parasites” received more than $1 million in federal crop subsidies since 1995.

But David Jungerman says the payouts don’t contradict the sign he put up in a corn field in Bates County along U.S. 71 Highway.

“That’s just my money coming back to me,” Jungerman, 72, said Monday. “I pay a lot in taxes. I’m not a parasite.”

After a story about Jungerman’s trailer ran in Sunday’s Star, however, some readers called him a hypocrite for criticizing others for getting government help while taking government subsidies paid for by taxpayers.

Jungerman said he put up the sign to protest people who pay no taxes, but, “Always have their hand out for whatever the government will give them” in social programs.

Crop subsidies are different, he said. When crop prices dip below a certain point, the federal government makes up the difference with a subsidy payment.

According to a farm subsidy data base, Jungerman received $1,095,101 in the past 15 years, including $224,763 in 2000. Last year, he received $34,303.
 
 
 http://www.theonion.com/audio/neighbors-remember-serial-killer-as-serial-killer,13594/ 
Online News
Neighbors Remember Serial Killer as Serial Killer.
 
 
Something I learned yesterday:
Buy a lantern battery. Cost, four or five dollars.
Peel off label. Extract two screws. Lift cap enough to cut the two wires. Dump out a whole slew of AA batteries. I forgot how many you get, but it is far cheaper this way.
 
 
 
Oscar the cat may have lost one of his nine lives after a nasty encounter with a combine harvester, but he has two new prosthetic paws to show for it.
 
 
Young, healthy people shouldn't be putting more than about 1 teaspoon of salt, or 2,300 milligrams of sodium, into their bodies each day, the CDC reminds us. Blacks, middle-aged and older people, and folks with high blood pressure should consume even less.

The salt shaker isn't the culprit. Only about 10 percent of our sodium come from salt added at the table or during home cooking.

So where are we going wrong?

Well, a big part of the problem is with foods that don't taste all that salty.

Here are five categories of food, as grouped by the researchers, that contributed a lot of salt to people's diet.

No. 1: Grain mixtures, frozen meals and soups— 530 milligrams of sodium per day

How can foods whose primary ingredient is some kind of grain be so salty? Well, the offenders here include such American favorites as pizza, burritos, tacos, egg rolls, spaghetti with sauce and frozen meals whose main course is a grain mixture.

No. 2: Ham, bacon, sausages and lunchmeats—423 milligrams of sodium per day

"Mmmm... bacon," as Homer Simpson says. Who doesn't love bacon? Well, there are the cardiologists. And now the CDC, we suppose.

No. 3: Breads — 354 milligrams of sodium per day

Yeah, that's right. Your daily bread packs a sodium wallop. And we eat too much of it.

No. 4: Meat, poultry and fish mixtures — 286 milligrams per day

OK, we never trusted fish mixtures anyway.

No. 5: Cakes, cookies and crackers — 229 milligrams of sodium per day

Crackers, we might have fingered as salt sources, but cakes, too? Noooo!

If keeping track of food by sodium content seems daunting, there are ways to simplify the task. Avoid processed foods and restaurant meals. Cut back on bread. Eat lots of fruit, a source of only 5 milligrams of sodium per day, and eat fresh rather than processed vegetables.

For more on how we perceive the taste of salt, check out this recent story by NPR's Allison Aubrey.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

I saw this last night!! Dang!! You beat me to it.

 http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=128107345 

 
Oscar the cat may have lost one of his nine lives, but his new prosthetic paws make him the world's first bionic cat.

After losing his two rear paws in a nasty encounter with a combine harvester last October, the black cat with green eyes was outfitted with metallic pegs that link the ankle to the foot and mimic the way deer antlers grow through skin. Oscar is now back on his feet and hopping over hurdles like tissue paper rolls.
 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

The video of the bionic cat in action:
 http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/science_and_environment/10404251.stm 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

ever eat a slice of bread ?
7-8-9 % daily salt in one slice......
 
 
@hamburgboy,

Yep. Quite an unexpected question but yes the bread I tend to eat has a value of 7 to 9% daily amount of sodium per slice.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

I was just in the store looking for sausage with an acceptable salt level, but it was all the same. I bought a lower sodium bacon, but even it had way too much of it.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

 
The video of the bionic cat in action:
 http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/science_and_environment/10404251.stm 

 

Awww!
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=__cQPvLmqcg 
 
 
@edgarblythe,

rofl
 
 
Jack Thorpe sued the town of Jim Thorpe, Pa., Thursday, demanding that it return the legendary athlete's remains to Oklahoma. He cited a federal law designed to give Native American artifacts back to their tribal homelands.

Summary
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 http://www.27bslash6.com/missy.html 
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Yippee ki yay
 
 
@DrewDad,

Very funny.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Man Takes His AT-AT for a Walk in the Park in AT-AT Day Afternoon :
 http://nymag.com/daily/entertainment/2010/06/man_takes_his_at-at_for_a_walk.html?mid=agenda--20100628 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Thanks. Neat one.
 
 
There is no room for romance on board the cozy confines of the International Space Station, a NASA space shuttle commander said Monday when asked what would happen if astronauts had sex in space.
 
 
From Shit My Dad Says:
Don’t focus on the one guy who hates you. You don’t go to the park and set your picnic down next to the only pile of dog shit."
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Funny, edgar, that reminded me of an old joke about an Indian and his moccasins. Do they still make Shinola?  

another oddity.

FAA has approved this little car-o-plane.

 

The rest of the story

 http://jalopnik.com/5575383/terrafugia-flying-car-gets-faa-approval 
 
 
Fine plane/car, letty. But don't use it around me. I am not a believer in it.
 
 
@Letty,

Neato!
 
 
@Letty,

 
Funny, edgar, that reminded me of an old joke about an Indian and his moccasins. Do they still make Shinola?  

another oddity.

FAA has approved this little car-o-plane.

 

The rest of the story

 http://jalopnik.com/5575383/terrafugia-flying-car-gets-faa-approval 

 

I wonder if it's really street legal in the US even though it's approved for flight.
 
 
We reenacted the Civil War tonight. We opened up a can of Van Camps Pork N Beans to have with dinner. The soldiers then ate Van Camps also.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
We reenacted the Civil War tonight.
 

Were any weapons involved?
 
 
Just a can opener. Civil War soldiers ate Van Camps Pork N Beans, at least some of the time.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

A can opener could be considered a dangerous prohibited weapon on an airplane these days.

In the wrong hands...
 
 
 
 
 
@Reyn,

A flame could be dangerous in that case...
 
 
@DrewDad,

Holy crap, drewdad. Better get over there and get those blocks.
 
 
@Ceili,

 
A flame could be dangerous in that case...

 

Shades of Blazing Saddles!
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Good thing there's no smoking on planes these days!
 
 
If Ghostbusters Were a Silent, Steampunk Film
Whom shall you telegram? The League of S.T.E.A.M., naturally. (That's Supernatural and Troublesome Ectoplasmic Apparation Management.)
 http://nymag.com/daily/entertainment/2010/07/if_ghostbusters_were_a_silent.html?mid=agenda--20100701 
 
 
You better call right now.
 
 
How Star Trek should have ended:
 http://www.howitshouldhaveended.com/videos?bcpid=51434042001&amp;bclid=41247345001&amp;bctid=68701708001 
 
 
Hey!
 
 
LOS ANGELES — The apparently endless market for images of Marilyn Monroe now extends to inside the bombshell's body.

A set of three Monroe Chest X-rays from a 1954 hospital visit sold Sunday for $45,000 at the Hollywood Legends auction at Planet Hollywood Resort and Casino in Las Vegas.
 
 
 

The fine art of naval gazing.

 
 
 
@Butrflynet,

But not those navals, hopefully.
 
 
MEMPHIS, Tenn. — A Germantown woman is charged with DUI, but deputies didn't find the usual alcoholic drinks or drugs. What they discovered in Kelly Moss' car was vanilla.

Shelby County deputies responded to a call on Thursday to find Moss slumped over her steering wheel in front of Arlington Middle School. (Commercial Appeal: Moss' photo.)

The Commercial Appeal newspaper quoted the police report which stated the 48-year-old Moss was unable to stand or walk and her speech was slurred.

Deputies found diet cola cans and partly empty bottles of vanilla extract — 35 percent alcohol by volume.

Officers said Moss's breath smelled strongly of vanilla and a store receipt from Wednesday was for two 8-ounce bottles of the extract.

Moss was held on charges of DUI and refusing a blood-alcohol test.
 
 
If man asks for many laws it is only because he is sure that his neighbor needs them; privately he is an unphilosophical anarchist, and thinks laws in his own case superfluous.
Will Durant
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Years ago there was lemon essence.
and more recently here "essence" type food flavorings were relegated to the liquior store section of supermarkets because the kids were buying them. MUCH MUCH cheaper than regular alcoholic drinks
 
 
@dadpad,

A relative (an alcoholic relative) had nothing to drink one fine day. He took a swig of rubbing alcohol. It took him a good while to get his breath back. He learned a small lesson, but it didn't change him a bit.
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FFK_XuVqsCQ 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

punk had it coming.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Yes he did.
~
The 6 Most Important Things Humanity Just Plain Forgot
 http://www.cracked.com/article_18533_the-6-most-important-things-humanity-just-plain-forgot.html 
#5: The World's Largest Solid Gold Statue
 
 
I learned about scurvy in gradeschool.
 
 
Scientists have used the latest imaging techniques to look inside a python that had just swallowed a rat whole.

The resulting footage is part of a project using hi-tech scanning methods to explore animals' anatomy.

It took 132 hours for snake to fully digest the rat, the scientists said. Their work has revealed other strange insights into python digestion.

They presented the study at the Society for Experimental Biology's annual meeting in Prague, Czech Republic.
 
 
I somehow tuned an episode of Highway Patrol, with Broderick Crawford, this morning. It was interesting and humerous to see how these guys used a semi trailer to steal a computer. It took a year to build it at a cost of $100,000. They demanded a ransom of $100,000, reasoning that the company could lose a million in a year if they opted to build another one instead.
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oRjJuXfqd2E 
 
 
@edgarblythe,

That is AWFUL, edgar. Talk about sick.

Hmmm, The Russians finally made it, and this guy sends neat messages.

 

Wheelock is one of three American astronauts living aboard the space station. Three Russian cosmonauts make up the rest of the outpost's six-person crew.

In the past, astronauts have said they cannot see the fireworks from space during the celebrations that traditionally accompany the Fourth of July holiday in the United States. Fireworks are also not allowed on the International Space Station because they can pose a fire risk, NASA officials have said.

so, Wheelock sent a 4th of July message to earth. Love it!
 
 
Thanks letty.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Zombies and lobotomy patients want their latest generation iPhones gawd dammit!! Don't you get in their way OR ELSE!!
 http://techcrunch.com/2010/06/28/iphone-4-vs-evo-4g/ 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Sorry about the cross-post, Stephan.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

 
Zombies and lobotomy patients want their latest generation iPhones gawd dammit!! Don't you get in their way OR ELSE!!
 http://techcrunch.com/2010/06/28/iphone-4-vs-evo-4g/ 

 

I don't know all that sh#^t. I use a cell phone to make about five calls per week. And to tell time when working.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
... I use a cell phone...
 

Cell phone? What's a cell phone?
 
 
This is why I "think" I'm a real vampire
They have no desire to use us as lab rats or slaves. Before reading any farther on this site, I highly suggest reading the knowing if you are a real Vampire page, and the finding a real Vampire page on this site first. This site is not made for poser vamps, close-minded people, or those who think that they are, or claim to be, some great mythological thing because they think the spirit of a vampire entered them at some time making them a vampire. We call these people posers, which they are; they are confused lost children. This site is not here for them in any way! It is for real vampires, curious people, and open-minded skeptics. THE BEST COMPLIMENT THAT YOU CAN GIVE TO THIS SITE, IS TELLING ALL OF YOUR FRIENDS ABOUT IT

 http://vampirewebsite.net/ 
 
 
@Reyn,

I just barely got weaned away from my land line.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

You don't have one at all?
 
 
@Reyn,

Land lines are for luddites and land lubbers. Arghh!
 
 
Nobody ever called me on the land line. Why pay for it?
 
 
@edgarblythe,

If that's the case... perhaps I should drop my cell phone plan as well. Not much incoming activity going on there.  
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Go to the I Need a Friend thread and offer the number to the guy that desperately wants to have some friends. Then you should have a useful purpose for the phone.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

I'll have to think about that one.
~
Inspire :
Al Qaida's glossy print and online magazine.
 http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=128286027 
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
Nobody ever called me on the land line. Why pay for it?

 

I'm confused. No one called you on your landline. Who's calling you on your cell phone?  
 
 
@Reyn,

Oooh SNAP!
 
 
 
@Reyn,

 
 
Nobody ever called me on the land line. Why pay for it?

 

I'm confused. No one called you on your landline. Who's calling you on your cell phone?  

 

Sometimes the boss or my lead man. Sometimes my wife. Occasionally one of my children. Point is, they only called my cell phone. The other was totally wasted, but for the occasional telemarketer.
 
 
Snopes on the new mercury containing light bulbs
 http://www.snopes.com/medical/toxins/cfl.asp 
 
 
AP - Authorities in Iceland have exhumed the body of American chess champion Bobby Fischer to determine whether he is the father of a 9-year-old girl from the Philippines.
 
 
 http://www.theonion.com/audio/kentucky-legislature-bans-gay-pet-weddings,12454/ 
Kentucky Legislature Bans Gay Pet Weddings
 
 
@edgarblythe,

edgar, that Onion thing was hilarious. Loved it, Texas.

Hmmm. I have one of those light bulbs in the lamp on my monitor. The kid from Georgia told me about them. Guess I'll have to be careful.

I was looking for the classical piece (Dance of the Hours) upon which Sherman's Camp Grenada was based and found this odd and funny thing.

 http://www.freakingnews.com/Dancing-Animals-Pictures----1710.asp 
 
 
That's a strange and odd collection, letty.

When I come to this thread, I often think of gelisgesti (sp?). He had a thread similar to this that he fed for years. His visits gradually tapered off. Miss him.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
AP - Authorities in Iceland have exhumed the body of American chess champion Bobby Fischer to determine whether he is the father of a 9-year-old girl from the Philippines.

 

Now, that's just plain weird!  
 
 
 

 
By Mark W. Danielson

Recent changes in squirrel behavior were recently explained by the above photo, which was anonymously sent to me. Yes, this snapshot confirms that the US Army has been actively recruiting squirrels. Though this is a good temporary job for the unemployed, once they have served their military obligations, they are being randomly air-dropped into backyards across America, making these once super squirrels, an even bigger nuisance. Personally, I love these furry critters, but their inability to adjust to post-military life has been tough on all of us. So far, I’ve relocated fifteen of them, but there is at least one hold-out who is applying his military training to retain his residence of choice.
 

For the rest of the blogpost:
 http://murderousmusings.blogspot.com/2008/12/super-squirrel.html 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

That's neat.
 
 
Houston -
A man who died near downtown this morning when he jumped from the the cab of his moving 18-wheeler was apparently trying to stage a wreck early this morning to collect from his insurance company, police said.

The man died when he slammed onto the pavement in the 4200 block of the northbound Eastex Freeway feeder road near Cavalcade about 2 a.m., police said.

The victim, whose name has not been released, had head injuries. No other injuries were reported.

Police said the man's business partner told investigators the trucker was staging an accident to file a fraudulent claim with his insurance company.

The business partner said he was following the truck in a sport utility vehicle when the driver jumped through the door of the big rig just as the truck it hit the curb. He hit his head and later died.

The man said the trucker was attempting to intentionally drive the white Volvo truck into a freeway column on the feeder road beneath the 610 North Loop.

The truck was traveling at about 50 mph, police said. The driver was alone in the cab and was not pulling a trailer.

The witness said he stopped his SUV, ran after the truck as it slowly rolled on the street, climbed inside and put on the air brake to stop it.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

darwinism at it's best...
 
 
@Rockhead,

What a maroon. He won't do that again.
 
 
Nothing humerous about this one:

(CNN) -- The son of an Iranian woman who faces execution by stoning appealed to Iran's courts Wednesday in hopes of sparing his mother's life.

A lawyer for Sajjad Mohammedie Ashtiani traveled to Tehran to persuade judiciary officials to commute the sentence of Sakineh Mohammedie Ashtiani, who was convicted of adultery and condemned to death by stoning, a method deemed barbaric by human rights activists.

Sajjad Ashtiani also penned a new open letter to the international community in which he points out the legal discrepancies of his mother's case.

The letter comes after a human rights activist Mina Ahadi told CNN that only an international campaign designed to pressure the Islamic regime in Tehran could save Sakineh Ashtiani's life.

"Legally, it's all over," said Ahadi, who heads the International Committee Against Stoning and the Death Penalty. "It's a done deal. Sakineh can be stoned at any minute."

But Sajjad Ashtiani refuses to give up.

In freshly penned letter, he wrote there was neither evidence nor legal grounds for his mother's conviction and sentence. He said the family has traveled six times from their home in Tabriz to Tehran to speak with Iranian officials, but in vain.
If the sentence is carried out, Sakineh Ashtiani, 42, will be buried up to her chest, according to an Amnesty International report citing the Iranian penal code. The stones that will be hurled at her will be large enough to cause pain but not so large as to kill her immediately.

She was convicted of adultery in 2006 and forced to confess after being subjected to 99 lashes, human rights lawyer Mohammad Mostafaei told CNN. She later recanted that confession and has denied wrongdoing.

Her conviction was based not on evidence but on the determination of three out of five judges, Mostafaei said. She has asked forgiveness from the court but the judges refused to grant clemency.

Iran's supreme court upheld the conviction in 2007.

The circumstances of Ashtiani's case make it not an exception but the rule in Iran, according to Amnesty International,
 
 
 

The corpse flower is so rare that only 28 have ever been known to bloom in the United States. The 29th is poised to open any day now at the Houston Museum of Natural Science.

The lime-green bud, which resembles an oversized endive, was nearing 5 feet tall on Wednesday in the museum's Cockrell Butterfly Center and has been growing about 4 inches a day. Cockrell director Nancy Greig says it could open Friday or by early next week. Once open, the corpse flower will last about two days.

"Is it pretty?" a visitor to the museum asked Greig.

"I'd say it's spectacular," she answered.

The bloom of the Amorphophallus titanum, which can stand 10 feet tall and measure up to 5 feet across, is one of the world's largest. And, as its common name implies, stinkiest.

The only other one to bloom in Texas came in 2004, when a 61-inch specimen nicknamed Big Jack put on a show at Stephen F. Austin State University's Mast Arboretum in Nacogdoches.

The botanical name is the first clue that this is one weird, horticultural wonder: Amorphophallus translates to "shapeless phallus." Titanum means "giant."

Native to Sumatran rainforests, the endangered and unpredictable species produces the world's largest unbranched inflorescence. It's technically not a single flower, but a cluster of flowers on a stem.

The bloom structure consists of a central, fleshy spadix, or stem, that stretches taller than a man. Thousands of male and female flowers surround the base. The spadix is sheathed in a pleated, leafy spathe that opens like a frilly, raw-liver-colored Elizabethan collar.

Related to jack-in-the-pulpit, calla and caladium, the corpse flower grows from an underground corm that can weigh up to 200 pounds. A $75 walnut-sized corm six years ago, the museum's plant — nicknamed Lois after a former staff member's mother - now weighs 30 pounds.

As its common name warns, the corpse flower is a smelly thing, with the withering stench of rotting flesh. As the spathe begins to unfurl, the spadix becomes a gas chamber, heating its natural oil and emitting noxious fumes for eight to 12 hours to attract pollinating carrion beetles.

Greig is asking other institutions that grow the plant, also called a titan arum, for pollen to help Lois set viable seed. The male and female flowers don't open at the same time, discouraging self-fertilization.

Flowering takes tremendous energy, and after her big act, Lois will collapse; the corm will drop weight and rest.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

The authorities in Iran have announced that a woman convicted of adultery will not be stoned to death. But it is not clear whether they have lifted the death sentence against Sakineh Mohammadi Ashtiani, who has been in prison in Tabriz since 2006.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

your corpse flower reminds me of my friends voodoo lily.

The voodoo lily, technically referred to as Dracunculus vulgar, is a perennial plant that originates in the Mediiterranean area. The voodoo lily grows with rich green foliage, bright yellow bulbs and deep purple blooms. Though quite attractive, this lily has a foul aroma and its dark colors attract an array of flies.

(it stinks like hell when it blooms, too)
 
 
whooooa

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_w-9G8z4RCI 
 
 
@Philis,

Yikes! Yep, it's big.  

 

Having made mostly correct predictions during the European Cup in 2008, Paul the Psychic Octopus is at it again, this time making predictions for the 2010 FIFA World Cup.
Who does he have to win this year's World Cup?
Germany!
Paul's method consists of choosing between mussels placed in glasses of water with either a German or English flag.
There may be some bias here, however, as Paul is living in a German aquarium.
Nevertheless, the psychic octopus has correctly predicted all the games in South Africa to date.
 
 
@Letty,

Yes, i saw this. It has to be a kwinkydink. Or else he can read minds and he knows what we are thinking.
 
 
1.More than 3,000 varieties of mosquito inhabit the world. More than 200 live in the United States. San Antonio is home to more than 50, and Houston has 55 or 56 varieties.

2. Only female mosquitoes bite and suck blood. They need the protein to produce eggs.

3. After the bite, the result - think red welt and itching - is an allergic reaction to mosquito saliva.

4. It is better not to smack a mosquito if she is biting you. That can make the reaction worse. Better to take the pacifist approach and let her do her thing.

5. Mosquitoes don't survive very long after they feed on blood. They usually lay their eggs and then their business on Earth is done. Their life span is usually not much longer than three weeks.

6. Most mosquitoes don't bite humans or carry disease. But the ones that do both can be a problem.

7. Asian tiger mosquitoes, scientifically known as aedes albopictus, are among the most common in urban areas and have a reputation for being nasty. They are daytime feeders. The species was imported from Asia in the 1980s in tires. Its first stop in America was Houston, said Rudy Bueno, director of Harris County's Mosquito Control Division.

8. Another Texas favorite is the Southern house mosquito, or culex quinquefaciatus. This mosquito usually feasts on birds but will creep into a home and bite humans at night. It can carry West Nile virus and encephalitis.

9. Mosquitoes are attracted and repelled by smell and heat. What smells attract them is one of the issues that Dan Kline of the United States Department of Agriculture researches. But it is clear some mosquitoes are attracted to some people more than others. They like natural odors, such as body odors. We know they don't like DEET.

10. Mosquitoes are attracted to dark colors. Yet another reason to wear white linen in the summer. For more information visit Mike Merchant's mosquito safari website at  http://mosquitosafari.tamu.edu. 

Sources: Dan Kline, research entomologist with the U.S. Department of Agriculture in Gainesville, Fla.; Mike Merchant, urban entomologist with the Texas AgriLife Extension Service in Dallas; Molly Keck, entomologist and integrated pest management program specialist with Bexar County's Texas AgriLife Extension Service; Rudy Bueno, director of Harris County's Mosquito Control Division
 
 
Paul the octopus is in hot water, since Germany lost.
 
 
 
James Franco Helps Sell Gary Shteyngart’s New Novel
Maybe it takes a showman like Absurdistan author Gary Shteyngart to make a book trailer that's actually funny (watch it below, premiered exclusively on Vulture). It doesn't hurt that in promoting his third novel, the dystopian satire Super Sad True Love Story, the author managed to wrangle James Franco, his former student at Columbia's MFA program, for a supporting role. Jay McInerney also pops in and proves himself a surprisingly deft actor, especially when surrounded by very young women. As for the rest of the guest writers — Edmund White, Mary Gaitskill, Jeffrey Eugenides — judge for yourself.
 

 http://nymag.com/daily/entertainment/2010/07/gary_shteyngart_james_franco.html?mid=agenda--20100707 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

yes, I too love the Socratic method, also the Heimlich Maneuver.
 
 
 http://www.csmonitor.com/World/Global-News/2010/0709/PLA-Beat-It-video-Is-being-cheeky-about-China-s-military-risky-business 

 
Global News Blog

PLA 'Beat It' video: Is being cheeky about China's military risky business?
'Beat It' video of China's People's Liberation Army groovin' to a Michael Jackson song goes viral. Will officials 'harmonize' the tribute?

By Peter Ford, Staff Writer / July 9, 2010

Beijing

Chalk up another viral video in the “Soldiers, music, inappropriate use of” category.
 

 http://www.csmonitor.com/World/Global-News/2010/0709/PLA-Beat-It-video-Is-being-cheeky-about-China-s-military-risky-business 
The direct link to the video:
 http://www.tudou.com/programs/view/Xf4Ta-b1luc/ 
 
 
Not even officers from Israeli security service Shin Bet can escape the scourge of lost luggage it seems.

A bag belonging to agents travelling with Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu was mistakenly put on a flight from New York to Los Angeles, not to Washington.

Alarmingly the bag contained four 9mm Glock handguns, which are now missing.

A Shin Bet spokesman told the AP news agency that it is not known whether the guns went missing before or after the luggage was put on the wrong flight.

The Israeli officers were accompanying Mr Netanyahu to Washington for White House talks with President Barack Obama.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
The authorities in Iran have announced that a woman convicted of adultery will not be stoned to death. But it is not clear whether they have lifted the death sentence against Sakineh Mohammadi Ashtiani, who has been in prison in Tabriz since 2006.

 

And men ARE allowed to commit adultery without a penalty? Why don't we hear about men who commit adultery. Maybe they keep it silent fearing others will get the wrong idea about muslim men.
 
 
@Philis,

 
 
The authorities in Iran have announced that a woman convicted of adultery will not be stoned to death. But it is not clear whether they have lifted the death sentence against Sakineh Mohammadi Ashtiani, who has been in prison in Tabriz since 2006.

 

And men ARE allowed to commit adultery without a penalty? Why don't we hear about men who commit adultery. Maybe they keep it silent fearing others will get the wrong idea about muslim men.

 

Perhaps they blame the women for leading the men astray?
 
 
@edgarblythe,

it's those sexy burqa's that they wear. damned hussies...
 
 
 
He's a seagull. Or maybe he's a cat.

Or maybe, given his nickname, he's actually a bear.

Whatever he 'thinks' he is, Pooh the seagull is a family pet.

June Grimwood: "I think he does believe that he is actually a cat"
He has been part of the Grimwood family from Shoreham-by-Sea ever since he arrived unexpectedly as a baby.

Pooh didn't even arrive conventionally by exiting an egg.

In fact the Grimwoods found him in their fireplace one day.

"We heard a rustle in the lounge when we were watching telly and we suddenly thought 'Ooh - what's that?. " said June Grimwood.

"We reached into the chimney and pulled out this young chick.".

I wouldn't say he's mixed up. He's just very clever. he knows where a good B&B is by the seaside every year

June Grimwood
He was just a baby gull at the time, albeit an ash-covered baby after falling down the chimney.

"We put him back on the roof, but it was a bit of a windy day and he fell back off.".

Instead of getting into a flap, June and Steve Grimwood calmly nursed him and fed him cat food.

He ate it alongside some unlikely companions - the family cats.

"He slept in the cats' basket, mingled in amongst the cats and was happy as Larry,"

Then, one day, Pooh flew the nest.

But he still returns for six months every year. In fact, in a sense, he's still at home with Mum and Dad, because he and his partner nests on their roof.

Pooh comes in for meals three times a day, with the cats Mitzi, Gus and Henry.

"He feeds out of the cat bowls, he comes indoors and takes the cats biscuits out of their feeder. I think he does believe that he is actually a cat," said Mrs Grimwood.

"I wouldn't say he's mixed up. He's just very clever. he knows where a good B&B is by the seaside every year,".
 
 
@edgarblythe,

One lucky seagull! Probably needs to go on a diet though. Looks a little too chubby in this picture.
 
 
four 9mm Glock handguns end up in L.A. this is just, to me, rip-roaring funny.
Cute seagull story. DId you ever read Jonathon Livingston Seagull. I thought it was great that the writer was able to envision the life of a seagull. Never looked at a bird the same way again. I love seagulls.
 
 
Just don't feed seagulls at the beach.  
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Don't feed the laughing gulls on a ferry, either.

 
 
 
I can't explain why, but I love birds. Doesn't matter what make or model. I want to put a big bird house, with lots of rooms, in the back yard. All that keeps me from doing it is my experience from the last time. Neighborhood boys with BB guns.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

I love birds as well, edgar. When my cat Murdoch was alive, he would lie in our driveway and the blue jays would dart down and peck him on the head. He'd just lie there realizing there was nothing that he could do about it. My daughter saved a baby blue jay that had been kicked out of the nest.
 
 
We rescued sparrows when I was a kid. We had fun letting them go after they grew up. One of my greater joys these days is the simple act of tossing the bugs out of the pool skimmer. The birds watch for me and come down to get them. Once, when I was late, they took to swooping in front of me as I walked on the sidewalk.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Some more oddities and humor.

Barefoot Bandit has been captured:

 

Now, his poem,   Well, part of it at least

The Barefoot Boy

Blessings on thee, little man,

Barefoot boy, with cheek of tan!

With thy turned-up pantaloons,

And thy merry whistled tunes;

With thy red lip, redder still

Kissed by strawberries on the hill;

With the sunshine on thy face,

Through thy torn brim's jaunty grace;

From my heart I give thee joy, -

I was once a barefoot boy!

Prince thou art, - the grown-up man

Only is republican.

Let the million-dollared ride!

Barefoot, trudging at his side,

For the entire poem, see John Greenleaf Whittier.
 
 
The dog days of summer are here, & the name comes from stars (not dogs)
 http://hotword.dictionary.com/?p=671 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Well I say these are the big dipper days of summer, because we need to drink a lot of liquids.
 
 
@Letty,

 
Some more oddities and humor.

Barefoot Bandit has been captured:

 

Now, his poem,   Well, part of it at least

The Barefoot Boy

Blessings on thee, little man,

Barefoot boy, with cheek of tan!

With thy turned-up pantaloons,

And thy merry whistled tunes;

With thy red lip, redder still

Kissed by strawberries on the hill;

With the sunshine on thy face,

Through thy torn brim's jaunty grace;

From my heart I give thee joy, -

I was once a barefoot boy!

Prince thou art, - the grown-up man

Only is republican.

Let the million-dollared ride!

Barefoot, trudging at his side,

For the entire poem, see John Greenleaf Whittier.

 

I have a thread about this guy. It was not as popular as I had expected.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

That makes too much sense EB. That's why it would never catch on with the mainstream public. I'll try and use it and see if I can proselytize my coworkers into using it.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

would you be sirius...
 
 
@Rockhead,

Sirius as a heart attack!   But given my absent mindedness I'll probably forget about it by tomorrow morning.  
 
 
I have already forgotten it.
 
 
FYI
As of yesterday, Sun, 7-11-10, we now loose 2 minutes each day counting down to fall. Time is a flyin'
 
 
@Philis,

Wake me when we get there.  
 
 
 

Eleven-year-old Max is like another member of Donna Gardner's family.

You have to know Max, said Donna. He's a very smart dog and he just does things that I don't think a normal dog does all the time.

The chocolate lab proved that a couple weeks ago.

Donna ran an errand and took Max with her.

When she came home a short time later, she went inside the house, forgetting Max was still in the car.

I came in and started cleaning and about an hour later I heard a horn blow, said Donna.

She went outside, but didn't see anybody.

So, I came back in the house and I started cleaning again and the horn blew again, said Donna.

This time, Donna saw Max sitting in her driver's seat.

I rushed over and got him out real fast and he was panting like crazy, said Donna. I brought him in the house and he just dropped to the floor.

Donna gave him water and cooled him down with cold, wet rags.

Her daughter called the vet, who tells us Max was a little weak, a little slow but otherwise okay.
 
 
My darn 9 mth old girl gray tabby brought a baby bird into the house today. Too late to bring it to a vet.
 
 
A friend posted this on facebook this evening:
Toxic people get upset when you don't allow them to make you feel less than you are. They try and demean you, emphasize your mistakes, and get irritated when you don't react to their tirade. They lose their power. Good! Lol!
 
 
@edgarblythe,

better toxic people than toxic waste, edgar.  

I had no idea there was a REAL bird of paradise. Always thought it was a flower.

 

Now the humor.

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Dt_NjJk9gM4 

Jimmy also did Take an Old Cold Tater and Wait. Loved it when my adviser at UVA asked what a "tater" was.
 
 
I have been listening to and loving the little dickens all my life, letty.
 
 
Old Spice this week capitalized on the popularity of its recent TV advertisements with a series of YouTube videos in which "Old Spice guy" Isaiah Mustafa answered questions from the Twitter, Facebook, and Reddit communities.

"Today could be just like the other 364 days you log into twitter, or maybe the Old Spice man shows up @OldSpice," the company tweeted on its Twitter feed yesterday.

Users were encouraged to ask Mustafa questions, and he would respond in his "Old Spice guy" character in short, 30-second YouTube videos. Throughout the day, he fielded questions from journalists and celebrities, as well as regular users. He helped orchestrate a proposal, informed Gizmodo that his preferred method of Old Spice body wash application was via a "live Wolverine," and suggested that a man still living at home at age 28 was probably just trying to figure out how to "de-endanger white Bengal tigers."

The effort made its way around the blogosphere, with many people re-tweeting Mustafa's responses, pointing people toward the Old Spice Twitter feed, or posting videos on Facebook.

The campaign caught the attention of Twitter co-founder Biz Stone, who tweeted last night that he was "cracking up" at Mustafa's videos. Later, he noted that the Old Spice channel had 140 YouTube videos. "Does that smell like coincidence or something more powerful?" he wrote.

That has since jumped to 148.

Videos are still being posted. Most recently, Mustafa answered a question from a viewer who wanted the pitchman to adopt him
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Ah, I love Old Spice, edgar. Glad the guy is back.

Remember when you were a kid that if you kept digging a hole you would eventually end up in China?

 

 http://www.techsurf.com/2010/07/15/ufo-over-chinese-airport-video-of-ufo-over-china-2010/ 
 
 
I caught a quick glimpse of that story this morning before I had to start to work. Interesting footage. I am not sophisticated enough to know how that was done.
 
 
 
Dead horse flogged for €207k

Friday July 16 2010
A cable TV network rustled up $266,500 (€207,000) for famed singing cowboy Roy Rogers's stuffed and mounted horse, Trigger, at a New York auction.
 

 http://www.independent.ie/world-news/dead-horse-flogged-for-euro207k-2261040.html?from=dailynews 
 
 
I hope the new owner appreciates him more than Roy's family.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
Broadcast Date: Jul 3, 2010
Location/Title: Studio show: Anniversaries
Notes: Today on the Vinyl Cafe we mark three special occasions or anniversaries...not only is it Canada Day and Independence Day, this week also marks the 50th anniversary of Roger Woodward's trip over Niagara Falls.

Roger, for those of you who haven’t heard me speak of him before, is one of a handful of people who has gone over Niagara Falls and lived to tell the tale. He is not a daredevil. He wasn’t travelling in a padded barrel. Roger was seven years old when he went over the falls. And he was wearing nothing but a life-jacket. He went over as a result of a terrible accident, but lived to tell the tale and he told it to us a few years ago here on the radio. We play that interview today on the Vinyl Cafe and we have an update too.
 

 http://www.cbc.ca/vinylcafe/shows.php?vShowID=1355 
If your interested in the story as told by Stuart Maclean, I believe it's archived on iTunes under the July 3rd episode of the Vinyl Cafe.

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MaoBCniLsf4 
 
 
VINELAND, N.J. — Authorities say a New Jersey woman told them she was carjacked to cover up the fact that her car crashed because she was having sex.

The 23-year-old had initially told police she got lost on Sunday and asked a man for directions. Police say she told them the man pulled her out of the car at gunpoint and threw her to the ground.

Police say she later admitted she picked up a man and let him drive, and the car crashed into a tree while they were engaged in a sex act. Officers say the car had been set on fire.

The woman is accused of filing a false police report. She has refused to identify the man.
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZrYPJ4Yc31g 
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 

mebbe they should enquire at area hospitals for a guy with an injured penis?

that's a story her grandkids won't ever hear about...
 
 
A week has passed, and still no stink from Lois the corpse flower at the Houston Museum of Natural Science. Staffers have now cut a small hole in the flower and put rotting apples and bananas nearby in a bid to induce the bloom.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

To induce it to bloom? How would that work?
 
 
I wish I knew.
 
 
LOS ANGELES, Calif. -- Will Smith is about to play a "Legend" of Biblical proportions.

The "I Am Legend" actor will play the title role in "The Legend of Cain," based on the Biblical story of brothers Cain and Abel, the star's rep reportedly confirmed to Entertainment Weekly.

Like "I Am Legend," however, the upcoming film will incorporate "a vampiric twist," according to Deadline. In the Bible, Cain kills his brother, Abel, and is marked by God and sent to wander th earth -- a more villainous role than Will's usual heroic parts.

The star's own Overbrook Entertainment will produce the film.
 
 
The fire situation described below took place very near my home. All day long, the traffic has rerouted past my neighborhood. It took my wife over two hours to make what is normally a 45 minute round trip to Tomball today.

A Tomball paint warehouse burned for nearly 16 hours Saturday.

Several callers reported flames shooting from American Coatings, a painting manufacturer in the 10600 block of Mahaffey Road, around 2:40 a.m., said Dean Hensley, an arson investigator with the Harris County Fire Marshal's Office.

"We're still out here. It's still burning," Hensley said, adding that the building is approximately the size of two football fields.

About a dozen agencies responded to the blaze, including the Klein, Ponderosa, Cy-Fair, Magnolia, Rose Hill, Houston and Cypress Creek fire departments as well as Harris County hazmat and emergency management officials.

No one has been injured. A person of interest, arrested on unrelated charges, is being questioned.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Interesting oddities, edgar. Too bad about the fire, buddy.

I guess Will Smith will reflect the "mark of Cain" as being a vampire.

Moko

 

Hundreds of mourners Friday marked the death of a teenage bottlenose dolphin who won hearts and sometimes annoyed New Zealand swimmers and surfers with his boisterous antics.
Moko's body, placed in a blue coffin bedecked with flowers, was carried through a seaside town.
After a ceremony that drew more than 400 admirers, his casket was loaded on a charter boat that toured his favorite bays. He was buried privately on Matakana Island, where his carcass was found one week ago.
For three years, Moko was a familiar sight around the beaches of New Zealand's eastern coastal city of Gisborne, where he swam among beach-goers and stole balls and surf boards. He received worldwide fame in 2008, when he guided two stranded pygmy sperm whales back to deep waters.
Not everyone was charmed, though. Moko was known for pushing surfers out to sea, even leaving one woman stranded on a buoy when he stole her board. He also overturned kayakers and water skiers.
Moko's body was found a week ago on a beach on Matakana Island. The cause of death has not been determined, but post mortems have ruled out deliberate violence or a boat collision.
Initially, indigenous Maori contested the right to determine how and where Moko should be buried. They agreed after negotiations with New Zealand's Ministry of Conservation to lay him to rest on Matakana.
 
 
I would have enjoyed that dolphin - but only from a distance.
 
 
 
The cause of death has not been determined,
 

He was beaches as bro. Heaps beached.

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZdVHZwI8pcA 
 
 
@dadpad,

Poor beached dude!! No water and no plankton!!

Kind of wished they spoke with closed caption to appease my accent illiterate ears.  
 
 
Is a bucket of water too much to ask?
 
 
@tsarstepan,

 
no plankton
 

Its plinkton.
 
 
@dadpad,

Aaaaah! Seems to make moore since now!
 
I'm assuming that plinkton has more vitamin c in it than plankton, non ?
 
 
A search of plinkton brings one to that same video.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Dear lord, these guys are deadly serious!!
 http://www.koolaidmaninsecondlife.com/ 
An all too serious and high brow intellectual interview where the one being interviewed is depicted as the Kool-Aid Man walking around in the online computer world of Second Life.

Viewer beware. It gets a tad spicy for an online video (it after takes place in the infamous world of Second Life). I found it by following a link on a video game culture article at the nytimes.com
 http://www.nytimes.com/2010/07/16/theater/16video.html?ref=television 
 
 
JAKARTA, Indonesia — Indonesia's top Islamic body says it may forbid followers from drinking the world's most expensive coffee — extracted from the dung of a civet cat — over concerns it is unclean.

Kopi Luwak is made from hard beans that have been eaten by the nocturnal critters and then fermented in their stomachs before being pooped out and roasted. It's highly prized for its smooth flavor and bitterless aftertaste, sometimes fetching well over $200 a pound online.

Maruf Amien, acting head of the powerful Ulema Council, said a ruling on whether Muslims should be banned from drinking the brew could be made as early as Tuesday. He said the key issue is whether or not the coffee is clean.

"God willing it will be an easy decision," said Amien. "If the farmers clean the beans before they are grinded, they are halal, or legitimate, and there won't be a problem."

Kopi Luwak is produced on several Indonesian islands, spanning from Sumatra in the west to Sulawesi in the east, but it also can be found under different names elsewhere in Southeast Asia. Only 1,000 pounds are said to be produced annually worldwide.

Indonesia is the world's most populous Muslim nation. The influential Ulema Council often issues fatwas, or edicts, including several controversial rulings against smoking and yoga. Its edicts are not legally binding, but many devout Muslim abide by them.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Perhaps they need to issue out a nonviolent jihad against this shudder-inducing coffee manufacturing technique.
 
 
 Orig story 
Is there a point to an artists conception of something invisible?
 
Artists representation of what the CIWS laser beam looks like which, in reality, is invisible.
 
 
If you're a parent, I don't have to tell you what Call of Duty is. Your kids are probably hooked on this video game, too. All the parents I know throw up their arms. They don't know what to do. Their kids play Call of Duty nonstop all day.

If you're not a parent, can I come over your house and watch Dog the Bounty Hunter?

Call of Duty is a violent, blood-splattered, military battlefield video game. Usually, teams of six players face each other in various war settings, like an airport, desert or abandoned amusement park. Each player moves through the battlefield shooting at the enemy - and getting shot at. The games are generally about 10 minutes long, and the screen keeps a tally of which side has more "kills."

The game also keeps individual statistics, like how many people you've killed, how many times you've been shot and how long you've been playing. I don't like to brag, but my 13-year-old son is the 4,043,614th best Call of Duty player in the world.

The other day, I told him, "You have to stop playing this game - it's all you do. I'll bet you've wasted a whole day of your life on this thing."

He said, "You never let me play it. I've probably played it two hours total."

To be exact, he's wasted 75 hours and 26 minutes playing Call of Duty.

I don't want to be a squealer, but his friends Andy, Ricky, Harrison, Palmer and Zach have spent much, much more time on Call of Duty. Matthew has spent 44 days on it, although he claims that somebody hacked his account and fudged the numbers.

Sure. And I'm buying this ointment for a friend.

I can hear you, "Hey, just take the game away from him. You're the parent. You're the boss. It's a pretty sick world when kids are making the rules."

Easier said than done. I also said my kid would never eat fast food.

I'm 0 for 3. I am not going to be the one mean dad who won't let his kid play Call of Duty when all of his friends are playing it. And a note to parents who won't let their kids play... they're playing it at my house. And Andy's house. And Ricky's house. And Harrison's house.

And at the neighborhood burger hangout.

Your kid who isn't playing it... is playing it.

Call of Duty was introduced in 2003, and 60 million games have been sold around the world. They also sell Call of Duty comic books, computer games, T-shirts and trading cards. It's a $3 billion industry. The manufacturer donated 3,000 Call of Duty games to the U.S. Navy, which distributed them to ships and submarines and recreation facilities.

So our sailors can fight for fun - after fighting for real.

For fun is more fun, I'm guessing.

As much as this game drives me crazy, I have to admit, it's amazingly clever. Eleven other people, scattered across the globe, are playing your particular game, and each one can look at the others from his unique perspective.

Turn around! Quick!

Too late! The player in Lima, Peru, shot you from behind.

There are thousands of games being played at the same time. You can invite your friends to play, or you can be assigned to a team at random.

Kids rush home from day camp to play Call of Duty. They want to eat dinner on the couch so they won't miss a game. My kid has sleepovers in our house, and I walk downstairs at 3 a.m. and they're playing Call of Duty.

Call of Duty is addictive - like crack cocaine or Häagen-Dazs. Teens turn into zombies when they play it. I swear, they don't blink. I read about a man who lost his job and his family because of his addiction to Call of Duty. After the divorce, the man was allowed to see his children for four hours every other weekend.

The ex-wife asked the children, "What did you do with Daddy today?"

They said, "Nothing, we just sat there and watched him play Call of Duty."

My kid is bolted to the couch, wearing a headset like Julie the Time-Life operator. I like to walk in front of the TV when he's playing. He goes ballistic. "Thanks, I just got killed because of you!"

And I'm missing Man vs. Food. We're even.

As he goes Rambo on the enemy, he's talking to players in Russia, Japan, South Africa and his friend Andy on Georgetown Street around the corner.

I eavesdropped on the headset one day. You'd have to buy the complete Rosetta Stone tape collection to understand everything, but I know profanity in a lot of languages. This is when my kid and I had our little talk about giving information to strangers. "When somebody on this game asks where you are from, just say Texas and nothing more."

Got it?

Yes.

I mean it, you got it?

Yes.

Like a lot of things on the Internet, you have to be careful. I don't want Dateline: To Catch a Predator in my house.

Here's the best thing about Call of Duty. Even though parents hate it, it's our No. 1 disciplinary tool.

"Clean your room or I'm taking Call of Duty away."

His room is clean within 15 minutes.

It's not just kids playing Call of Duty. Marcus Coleman is a former Houston Texan and Dallas Cowboy. He played 11 years in the NFL and intercepted 25 passes, two for touchdowns. He's hooked on Call of Duty something bad, too.

"Sure, tell your kid I'll play him, but also tell him this - I don't ease up just because he's a kid. I play extra hard against kids," Coleman said.

ken.hoffman-chron.com
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Nothing to say about that except... WoW.
 
 
@dadpad,

<ROFLMAO, dadpad!>

Whatever you do, DON'T buy your kid a subscription to World of Warcraft. SonofEva has logged months if not years on this game, and he's still behind some of his friends. It will never end. I wonder what it will take to break the addiction. Banning him from playing doesn't work. He can play it at all his friends' houses and at school. It is everywhere. Even when he doesn't log on, he watches over others' shoulders and tells them what moves to make.
 
 
I am almost certain that's the game one of my grandsons sat up all night playing, once, when we babysat him. He had no place to be next day anyhow - but in my defense, I thoght he would tire and get some sleep, so I left him up that night. He was eleven or twelve.
 
 
A kid I know has pasted the following on facebook:
must READ ! This isnt fake. apparently if u
copyand paste this to ten people in the next ten minutes u will have
thebest day of ur life tomorr. u will either get kissed or asked
out,if u break this chain u will see a little dead girl in urroom
tonight.in 53 mins someone will say i...love... you...
 
 
 
The Cartoon Batman & Robin Theme, Now Starring the Pug Who Can Say ‘Batman’

Teddy, the chubby pug who says "Batman" when he barks, is now the star of his own theme song.
 

 http://nymag.com/daily/entertainment/2010/07/the_cartoon_batman_robin_theme.html?mid=agenda--20100721 
 
 
@Letty,

It is a flower. And New Guinea has maybe a half dozen birds called The Bird of Paradise. Also, some of the largest varieties of insects in the world.
 
 
 http://www.peopleofwalmart.com/?page_id=9804&paged=2 
Seymore Butts
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Ancient finger bowls found in Mayan tomb (bowls filled with fingers, that is)
 http://www.csmonitor.com/Science/2010/0719/Ancient-finger-bowls-found-in-Mayan-tomb-bowls-filled-with-fingers-that-is 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

I bet they are crunchy.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

good with salsa, though...
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kheZD1bE-qw 
 
 
 
SUV in Milwaukie sinkhole.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Here's the oddity.

Ancient woman suggests diverse migration

By MARK STEVENSON, Associated Press Writer Mark Stevenson, Associated Press Writer – 1 hr 34 mins ago
MEXICO CITY – A scientific reconstruction of one of the oldest sets of human remains found in the Americas appears to support theories that the first people who came to the hemisphere migrated from a broader area than once thought, researchers say.
Mexico's National Institute of Anthropology and History on Thursday released photos of the reconstructed image of a woman who probably lived on Mexico's Caribbean coast 10,000 to 12,000 years ago. She peeks out of the picture as a short, spry-looking woman with slightly graying hair.

Here's the humor.

Never Argue with a Woman

One morning, the husband returns the boat to their lakeside
cottage after several hours of fishing and decides to take a nap.

Although not familiar with the lake, the wife decides to take the boat out.
She motors out a short distance, anchors, puts her feet up,
and begins to read her book.
The peace and solitude are magnificent.

Along comes a Fish and Game Warden in his boat.
He pulls up alongside the woman and says, 'Good morning, Ma'am. What are you doing?'

'Reading a book,' she replies, (thinking, 'Isn't that obvious?')

'You're in a Restricted Fishing Area,' he informs her.

'I'm sorry, officer, but I'm not fishing. I'm reading.'

'Yes, but I see you have all the equipment.
For all I know you could start at any moment.
I'll have to take you in and write you up.'

'If you do that, I'll have to charge you with sexual assault,' says the woman.

'But I haven't even touched you,' says the Game Warden.

'That's true, but you have all the equipment..
For all I know you could start at any moment.'

'Have a nice day ma'am,' and he left.
 
 
Well, I don't get into it with women anyway. They don't argue fair.
 
 
Something going around facebook (complete with idiotic photo):
Sometimes your knight in shining armor is just a retard in tin foil
 
 
@edgarblythe,

 
Sometimes your knight in shining armor is just a retard in tin foil
 

That sounds like a signature line, if I ever heard one!
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=r2PM0om2El8 
 
 
@boomerang,

Thanks, boomer. What a wonderful video. There is a TV show called Wipeout, in which men and women compete getting through a ridiculously contrived obstacle course. I have been noting that as many women as men reach the top of the order each week.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

This will wipe you out, Texas. Did you know that dogs can sing?

 

This one isn't exactly Scottish, but he's not bad with the bagpipes.

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jJBgSsVyQns&feature=related 

Good one, boomer. You'll have to visit the radio thread.
 
 
@Letty,

I love the look on the Labrador's face when they stop the bagpipe... it's kind of why did you stop?! IT was getting to the good part! <<<sigh>>>!
 
 
I love to watch animals reacting to their humans.
 
 
 

A bear climbed into an empty car in the US state of Colorado, sounded the horn and sent the vehicle rolling down hill with the terrified animal still inside.

The car's owner, 17-year-old Ben Story, took a snap of the panic-stricken bear as it demolished the inside of his vehicle in its bid to escape.

Police in Larkspur, near Denver, eventually freed the animal by opening the door from a distance using a rope.

It is believed the bear was attracted by a sandwich left on the back seat.
 
 
 http://www.chron.com/video/?248171451001 
For a time lapse video of the blooming of Lois the corpse flower :
 
 
Headline in MYYAHOO OMG feature:
Angelina Stuns in Cleavage-Bearing, Red-Hot Dress
 
 
Houston's beloved corpse flower Lois bit the dust Sunday evening.

Or at least her famous bloom did.

After weeks of drawing record crowds to the Houston Museum of Natural Science, the spadix of the stinky flower collapsed about 4:45 p.m. — leaving visitors to mourn the loss.

"We came to see a piece of history," said Mark Swist, a 27-year-old Austin resident who was waiting in line when the bloom fell. "It's kinda disappointing to be so close. We wanted to see it in real life, but we're just enjoying being here and the experience."

Roughly 65,000 visitors made their way to see Lois in July, more than triple the Cockrell Butterfly Center's June figures.

The so-called corpse flower - nicknamed for its stench - drew a cultlike following since word of her potential bloom spread earlier this month with thousands watching the bloom via webcam. It was just the second rare Amorphophallus titanum bloom in Texas and the 29th in the nation.
 
 
Just in case you ever have to give your opossum a pedicure....

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1MRE2K3x-AY 
 
 
I suppose possum pets are not new, but I never saw it before. When I trap any, I take them to the park and turn them loose.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

More oddities and humor. (inspired by your corpse flower)

 

The graveyard shift was so named because before embalming if someone was buried and still alive, they could ring a bell that was interred within the coffin. This would alert the members of the graveyard shift to help out the unfortunate person.

Now the humor, edgar.

Screaming Jay Hawkins.  

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eceUXYtdw8Q&feature=related 
 
 
@edgarblythe,

By all the evidence, someone around here traps skunks and turns them loose in the park. Fortunately, they seldom overreact to people, though they are usually given wide berth.
 
 
@roger,

Our skunks hang in the vicinity of the dairy farm, up the road a piece. At least, that's where the skunk road kill appears the most. Maybe they like something the cows eat.
 
 
I think I heard that about the graveyard shift somewhere, letty. That's a cute "screamin'" song.
 
 
The Indian military has announced a plan to convert the world's hottest chili pepper into a weapon.

"The chili grenade has been found fit for use after trials in Indian defense laboratories, a fact confirmed by scientists at the Defense Research and Development Organization (DRDO)," said defense spokesperson Col. R. Kalia.

The government is also developing a version of the weapon for crowd-control by police and for self-defense use by women.

The weapons will be made from the bhut jolokia, also known as the "ghost chili" and acknowledged by Guinness World Records as the most potent chili in the world. The potency of the bhut jolokia measures more than one million Scoville units, compared with the 2,500 to 8,000 Scoville units of the typical jalapeno pepper, or the 2,500 to 5,000 Scoville units of Classic Tabasco sauce.

The peppers are grown and predominantly consumed in northeast India, and are also used as a cure for stomach problems. They are small, wrinkled and deep maroon in color, resembling prunes. Their flesh is so potent that it can burn the skin, forcing farmers, grocers and chefs to handle them with gloves on.

"This is definitely going to be an effective nontoxic weapon because its pungent smell can choke terrorists and force them out of their hide-outs," R. B. Srivastava, the director of the DRDO's Life Sciences Department in New Delhi.

But chili broker Ashit Mehta questioned the government's characterization of the pepper as non-toxic, calling for rigorous safety tests on the aftereffects of exposure to weaponized bhut jolokia. In contrast to tear gas, which produces "only... this eye burning sensation," the ghost chili can burn the skin itself, he said. Although people who are used to consuming and handling the pepper can tolerate it in small amounts, its effect on most people is far more severe.

"People should not get burned," he said. "Normal people will have a lot of problems."

Sources for this story include:  http://apnews.myway.com/article/201...   http://www.csmonitor.com/layout/set.... 
 
 
 http://video.adultswim.com/robot-chicken/epilepsy-research-center.html 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

 
 http://video.adultswim.com/robot-chicken/epilepsy-research-center.html 

 

You've reached this page because we are currently not allowed to share our videos across US borders.
 
 
@dadpad,

Terribly sorry guys!  
 
 
Guess who is 70 yrs old this day?
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=D1xqrdtJs8w 
 
 
Korean-Style Tacos Across America

Korean Chicken Tacos (July 28, 2010)
Mr. Lee, a 42-year-old native of Seoul, South Korea, who grew up in Mustang, Okla., took a step toward realizing that dream in October 2009 when he opened Hankook Taqueria in Atlanta, serving tacos stuffed with soy- and garlic-marinated beef, along with chicken and pork, all barbecued in the Korean style.

“I was going to open a traditional Korean barbecue restaurant,” Mr. Lee said. Then his wife, Mackenzie, had an idea. “She saw this thing about Kogi on the Web,” he recalled. “And I thought tacos might be a way to get Korean food on everybody’s table.”

What captured Ms. Lee’s attention was Kogi Korean BBQ-To-Go, a retrofitted catering truck that rolled onto the streets of Southern California in November 2008, selling corn tortillas piled with Korean-style barbecued short ribs known as kalbi, garnished with onion, cilantro and a hash of chili-soy-dressed lettuce.
 
 
Remember it takes a college degree to fly a plane, but only a high school diploma to fix one; a reassurance to those of us who fly routinely in our jobs.

After every flight, UPS pilots fill out a form, called a 'gripe sheet,' which tells mechanics about problems with the aircraft. The mechanics correct the problems, document their repairs on the form, and then pilots review the gripe sheets before the next flight. Never let it be said that ground crews lack a sense of humor. Here are some actual maintenance complaints submitted by UPS ' pilots (marked with a P) and the solutions recorded (marked with an S) by maintenance engineers. By the way, UPS is the only major airline that has never, ever, had an accident.

P: Left inside main tire almost needs replacement.>>>
S: Almost replaced left inside main tire.>>> *>>>>>>>>>
P: Test flight OK, except auto-land very rough.>>>
S: Auto-land not installed on this aircraft.>>> *>>>
P: Something loose in cockpit>>>
S: Something tightened in cockpit>>> *>>>
P: Dead bugs on windshield.>>>
S: Live bugs on back-order.>>> *>>>
P: Autopilot in altitude-hold mode produces a 200 feet per >>> minutedescent.>>>
S: Cannot reproduce problem on ground..>>> *>>>
P: Evidence of leak on right main landing gear.>>>
S: Evidence removed.>>> *>>>
P: DME volume unbelievably loud.>>>
S: DME volume set to more believable level.>>> *>>>
P: Friction locks cause throttle levers to stick.>>>
S: That's what friction locks are for.>>> *>>>
P: IFF inoperative in OFF mode..>>>
S: IFF always inoperative in OFF mode.>>> *>>>
P: Suspected crack in windshield.>>>
S: Suspect you're right.>>> *>>>
P: Number 3 engine missing..>>>
S: Engine found on right wing after brief search>>> *>>>
P: Aircraft handles funny.>>>
S: Aircraft warned to straighten up, fly right and be serious.>>> *
P: Target radar hums.>>>
S: Reprogrammed target radar with lyrics.>>> *>>>
P: Mouse in cockpit.>>>
S: Cat installed.
P: Noise coming from under instrument panel. Sounds like a midget pounding on something with a hammer.
S: Took hammer away from midget.>
 
 
@edgarblythe,

I'm familiar with this back and forth between pilots and maintenance.

You'd think the pilots, if they had a maintenance concern by now would be a bit more specific about their complaint so they wouldn't leave themselves open to this kind of very funny retort.
 
 
For some reason, this one struck me as very funny!

 
P: Target radar hums.>>>
S: Reprogrammed target radar with lyrics.>>> *>>>
 
 
 
A Pennsylvania woman has been cited for harassment after her son told police she cleaned the bathroom with his toothbrush, then returned it to its holder.

A family in Colorado will never again have to worry about the call of nature on the road after designing a twin-bowl toilet car.

A man sporting horns (created with Teflon implants), tattooed eyebrows and earlobe implants has allegedly attempted to run over his landlord. Heavy metal fan Jesse Thornhill, of Tulsa, Oklahoma, was arrested and spent the night in jail before being released on bail.
 
 
And finally....
A bearded Pennnsylvania man robbed a bank with a toy gun while wearing a woman’s blonde wig, fake breasts under a sweater and clown trousers, police said. Dennis Hawkins, 48, was arrested sitting in a car in a nearby car park, covered in red dye from an exploding packet in a bag of money.
 
 
Wookieleaks

 http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=128879386&sc=fb&cc=fp 
 
 
You two are hot tonight.
 
 
@littlek,

Speaking of starwars.

Darth Vader, in a full head mask and cape, made off with an undetermined amount of cash from a bank in Long Island, New York. The only part of the uniform that was out of place were his camouflage pants. And a handgun — no light sabre.
 
 
@dadpad,

 http://www.funnyordie.com/videos/4a87d48fdd/undercover-karaoke-with-jewel 
 
 
@DrewDad,

Love it. She had me the moment somebody held up the nose.
 
 
@DrewDad,

That was absolutefreakinglutely incredible DD !
 
 
@DrewDad,

good job tasmanian dad
 
 
Somebody is playing with the atmosphere this morning. I could not get my news show to come in on Channel eleven and then my car radio program was invaded by a competing station. What is going on out there?
 
 
 
Sirius the dog is the brightest star in the sky at this time of the year and the ancients so named this time the dog days of summer.
 
 
August bees the wurstest month out of the year, in our part of the country. The only respit from extreme heat is the occasional hurricane.  
 
 
 
 http://www.tonic.com/article/taxidermy-squirrel-flask/ 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

 
 
 http://www.tonic.com/article/taxidermy-squirrel-flask/ 

 

                                         
 
 
all sorts of disturbing, that!
 
 
@littlek,

Just plain wrong. One of my ex brother in laws had a taxidermy deer's tail end, which he hung in the living room. Very humorous, so he thought.
 
 
@littlek,

I learned about it on NPR's Wait Wait Don't Tell Me.

I'm glad I don't drink beer. So if someone managed to buy me one as a gift (highly unlikely) then I can't hurt that person's feelings when I don't drink the beer in the bottle.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

You know I don't like this..

she snarffles.
 
 
I wish I was over there ----------------------->
 
 
@ossobuco,

Technically, neither do I. I like squirrels. I don't like dead squirrels.  
 
 
 

 http://news.nationalpost.com/2010/07/21/parachuting-donkey-frightens-russian-beachgoers/ 

England buys the donkey and all is well.

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tD8o1Z9gr2k&feature=related 

Perhaps he will get serenaded now
 
 
Good version of Donkey Serenade, letty. I hope they punish that donkey's owner.
 
 
 
1936 Bugatti has sold for $30 mil.
 
 
Geordie wakes after stroke with new accent

By Nigel Bunyan

A woman spoke of her distress yesterday at emerging from a stroke to find that her Geordie accent had been transformed into a Jamaican one.

Linda Walker, 60, is one of only 50 people to have been recorded as suffering from foreign accent syndrome. She is now helping researchers from Newcastle University in the hope that they can find a cure for future sufferers.

The condition occurs when patients wake up after a brain injury. In Mrs Walker's case it appeared as she regained consciousness from a stroke in March.

She failed to realise the extent of the transformation of her voice until her speech therapist played her a tape.

"I was devastated," said Mrs Walker. "I don't sound like me. It is so strange because you don't feel the same person. Not only did I have a stroke but I got lumbered with this foreign accent syndrome as well."

There is nothing in Mrs Walker's history to indicate why she should now have an accent that some hear as Jamaican and others as an Eastern European dialect.

She was brought up in the Westerhope area of Newcastle and now lives a short distance away in Fenham. She lived for a brief period of time in Canada.

After four months of speech therapy she is beginning to despair of recovering her native accent.

She said: "I want my own voice back. It's like losing a big part of your identity. You don't feel like the same person any more."

Frauke Buerk, Mrs Walker's speech therapist, said: "Although Linda has improved it looks likely that she will be left with an accent."

Foreign accent syndrome was first discovered in Norway in 1941 when a young woman started to speak with a German accent after an air raid.

 link to story 
 
 
@Reyn,

That sounds similar to the tale of Lobsang Rampa. He was an ordinary Brit, but something like that happened to him. After that, he always said he believed that a dying Tibetan Buddhist took his body so that he could finish his work. As the monk, Rampa wrote a dozen or more books and worked studying the human 'aura.' I don't recall the year he died.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Weird stuff, huh?    
 
 
Watching the football game a bit earlier, the announcer remarked, "Wade Phillips has lost forty pounds. He looks good." About that time, Phillips walked by, with his enormous gut hanging down. -
 
 
Visine Introduces New Eye-Whitening Strips
onion.com
NEW BRUNSWICK, NJ—The Johnson and Johnson company unveiled its new Visine-brand "Eye-Bright" whitening strips Tuesday, an over-the-counter product designed to reduce unsightly stains in bloodshot and yellowed eyeballs.
 
 
NPR
As a dinosaur enthusiast from the tender age of 5, it was with an existential sense of upheaval that I read the recent news about my favorite prehistoric herbivore, Triceratops. Turns out that gentle giant is simply the teenage version of the not-nearly-as-famous Torosaurus. As educational publishers gnash their teeth and I throw away my VHS copy of “The Land Before Time” (I’ll always love you Cera!), Need to Know spotlights 5 things you learned in school that heartless scientists have since ripped away…

1. Triceratops
Montana State University paleontologists John Scannella and Jack Horner announced in the Journal of Vertebrate Paleontology that the dinosaur we’ve always known as Triceratops was, in fact, just a juvenile Torosaurus. It was an easy mistake, they say. Like humans, some dinosaurs also had awkward teenage years. In their case, it wasn’t just “backne” or a bad perm, but the shape of their skulls was actually significantly different from that of mature animals. Traditionalists can take solace in the fact that the Torosaurus lost the name battle and both juveniles and adults will now be known as Triceratops.

2. Pluto
Remember the days of My Very Excellent Mother Just Served Us Nine Pizzas? Gone. All gone. In 2006, the International Astronomical Union removed “Pizzas” from the planetary mnemonic when they voted in a definition of planet that demoted Pluto from the celestial hierarchy. Now, it’s just a “plutoid.” And apparently, there are a couple of new dwarf planets we’re supposed to learn, named Ceres (formerly an asteroid) and Eris (larger than Pluto, discovered in 2005 and originally known as Xena). In 2008, 10-year-old Maryn Smith of Great Falls, Mont., won a National Geographic Children’s Books contest for a new solar system mnemonic — My Very Exciting Magic Carpet Just Sailed Under Nine Palace Elephants. Childhood-destroying collaborator and songstress Lisa Loeb even wrote a tune about it.

3. Five kingdoms of biology
Back when I was dissecting flatworms and building baking soda & vinegar volcanoes, there were five kingdoms I had to memorize for my biology test — Animalia, Plantae, Fungi, Protista and Monera. But since then, scientists have decided that’s just not good enough. In the ‘70s, a new group of organisms was identified and named the Archaea. These microscopic guys can live in extreme environments like deep sea rift vents and the digestive tracts of cows and are genetically very different from the bacteria formerly classified under Monera. Now, the taxonomic system is in debate. According to a 2008 article in American Biology Teacher, an educator in Massachusetts said, “In my district, for example, a 1997 textbook I had been using in seventh grade life science presents five kingdoms; its 1999 update includes six; and our high school biology text, from 2004, uses the three-domain system.” Are you happy now, scientists?

4. Four tastes
One of the earliest science class demonstrations I remember was the tongue map. We took cotton swabs dabbed in different tastes — sweet, salty, sour and bitter — and put them on our tongues in what, retrospectively, was probably the vector for our second-grade outbreak of strep throat. Receptors on the tips of our tongues were supposed to be sensitive to the sweet taste. Salt and sour were on the sides, and bitter was supposed to light up the back. Turns out, that’s all a lie based on a century-old misconception that no one bothered to challenge until 1974. Actually, the entire tongue is sensitive to all of those tastes. And that’s not all. There are fifth and sixth tastes. Umami, or savory, is what makes bacon and soy sauce so delicious, and the taste of fat is also a distinct flavor. Mmmmmm…

5. Gravity
What’s next for those ivory tower snobs to destroy? In a paper from January 2010 entitled “On the Origin of Gravity and the Laws of Newton,” string theorist and University of Amsterdam physics professor Erik Verlinde takes issue with gravity as a fundamental force. He’s not the first to do this — Einstein wreaked havoc with Newtonian physics a century ago — but he’s one of the most recent to provoke heated discussion. Verlinde told a New York Times reporter, “We’ve known for a long time gravity doesn’t exist. It’s time to yell it.”

So, will my tears shed over the loss of grade school science still fall to the ground? Admittedly, it might only be sentimental geeks like me that mourn the passing of the tongue taste test or the nine-planet solar system. Most people seem to be moving on just fine. Elizabeth Carney, the editor of Scholastic’s SuperScience classroom magazine for 3rd to 6th graders says they have to stay on top of the science. “Here, when Pluto was demoted we did articles. We made a new poster. Fortunately, kids aren’t as married to these things as adults are. They took it all in stride.”

We’ll see how those kids feel 20 years from now when their precious Kingdom Archaea turns out to be a crock.
 
 
Hillary Clinton Drags Taliban Leader's Body Through Streets Of Kabul

onion.com
KABUL, AFGHANISTAN—As members of the international press looked on, Secretary of State Hillary Clinton rode on horseback through the streets of Kabul Monday, dragging the mutilated remains of Taliban leader Mullah Abdul Jalil through the dirt behind...
 
 
Here's a goody!

--------------

Nearly naked biker arrested in Hamilton, charged for failing to wear helmet

The Canadian Press

HAMILTON - A Hamilton, Ont. man is facing several charges after taking an early-morning motorcycle ride wearing nothing but a T-shirt.

Police spotted the nearly-nude 40-year-old going down a city street dotted with shops and homes at around 4 a.m. on Sunday.

The man tried to get away once he saw an officer, momentarily loosing control of his bike before steadying himself and speeding away.

Police caught up with the nearly nude man a short time later. He tried to flee on foot, but was arrested close to his home after a brief struggle.

Acting Staff Sgt. David Hennick said the man had been drinking, but was not impaired.

Despite his nudity, the pants-free rider was not charged with indecent exposure.

"No one else was around, it was just the officer and the accused," said Hennick.

"It is kind of bizarre," he chuckled.

The man faces several charges, including flight from police, dangerous driving and failing to wear a helmet.

 link to story 
 
 
 
 
 
@DrewDad,

Oh yes, it's Monday alright.  
 
 
Reading this story reminded me of a similar incident I had as a meter reader a few years back.

I was on a rural road and saw a cat with a tin can on its head. I guess it had been hungry and tried to get ahold of any food scraps left in the can.

So, I firmly held onto the can and the cat did the rest by moving around and backing away from the can until it managed to get itself loose.

Before running away, it turned and gave me what appeared to be a knowing look of 'thanks'.

--------------------

at 12:17 on August 14, 2010, EDT.

Days from death, Florida wildlife officials free plastic jar that was stuck on bear cub's head

The Associated Press

OCALA, Fla. - A black bear cub in Florida affectionately known as "jarhead" can finally enjoy a good meal.

A clear plastic container was removed from the 6-month-old cub's head after being stuck for at least 10 days. The cub poked its head into the jar when digging through trash in a neighbourhood in central Florida.

Biologists say the cub was days away from death because the jar made it impossible to eat or drink. The team had to tranquilize the mother bear and then grab the cub to remove the jar from the bear's head.

The subdued mother was then put in a trap and the cubs followed. After she awoke and nursed the cubs, the bears were moved to a less populated area nearby.

 link to story 
 
 
@Reyn,

From here on in, I shall refer you as   Saint Reyn, savior of all simple minded and/or desperate cats.  
 
 
@tsarstepan,

It was nothing. I'm sure the cat would have ended up starving to death, more than likely.

Hopefully, it learned from its experience that maybe this was not the best place to look for food.  
 
 
Good stories, reyn.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Thanks, Edgar.  
 
 
@Reyn,

Great stories, everybody. Glad they all ended well, however.

Oddity? Two left hands playing piano.

 

Now the funny. Nature Boy?

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TUJdPceUazM 
 
 
  I wonder if the employees were blaming each other for the missing food, or maybe a janitor?

----------------

at 07:58 on August 18, 2010, EDT.

Police: Homeless man lived into US library basement for nearly 2 weeks, took employees' food

The Associated Press

OCEAN TOWNSHIP, N.J. - Police say a homeless man lived unnoticed in the basement of a New Jersey library for nearly two weeks.

Police told the Asbury Park Press that a custodian saw Charles Jones Jr. peeking out a basement window of the Ocean Township library in Monmouth County on Friday night.

Neptune police Detective Lt. Steven Peters says Jones told officers he had been living in the building. Police discovered several books in the basement and found the 26-year-old had taken food from the employee break room.

Jones was released on a criminal summons. He's charged with burglary and theft.

 link to story 
 
 
That's a strange recording, letty. I copied some information on it from youtube.

This is a song with a lot of legend and lore behind it, summed up pretty well by GojuBob from the Mad Music Archives:

"..Because of the recording ban of 1948, the only member of the Natural Seven in it is Karen Tedder the singer. Most of the rest (including sound effects) is provided by the famous disc jockey Jim Hawthorne. The song has lots of his 'in' jokes and trademarks (hogan, Skippy, peachy keen, etc.). Only toy or wacky instruments are used: kazoo, ukulele, cardboard box... The weird noise in the second part of the instrumental bridge is made by Jim Hawthorne's 'hogantwanger': graduated hacksaw blades mounted on a wooden frame. As a hillbilly parody of 'Nature Boy' (as sung by Nat King Cole), why isn't this called 'Erutan Yob'? 'Serutan' and 'under 40' are sneaky references to contemporary commercials for a laxative called 'Serutan' promising regularity to the over 35s. Some people think that Karen Tedder is really Jo Stafford in disguise (Jo Stafford had already recorded 'Temptation' with Red Ingle, as 'Cinderella G. Stump'). There was a real person called Karen Tedder who sang with Red Ingle; but the voice in this song does sound rather like the voice in 'Temptation'.." Thanks, GojuBob!!
 
 
@Reyn,

Two weeks is a long time. He had to have taken quite a lot of food and drink.
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Yeah, that's what I figured!
 
 
I suppose this counts as an oddity -- a strange and beautiful oddity....

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JI335i1L_sY 
 
 
@boomerang,

totally!
 
 
onion on facebook:
Dog Experiences Best Day of His Life For 400th Consecutive Day
 
 
News: 56-year-old chimpanzee gives birth

KMBC.com
At Sunset Zoo in Manhattan, Kansas a 56-year-old chimpanzee gave birth. According to reports, the… Post Chronicle ·
 
 
Hope he doesn't mind that I grabbed this off of facebook:
.
.Jonathan Jeffries
Now that you mention it, I am a little p.o.ed about all those Mexican Restaurants right near the Alamo!!

edgar(the devil made me do it)blythe
 
 
Man shot in head, notices years later
After doctors found a bullet, he recalled a blow to the head at a party years ago when he was drunk.
Bing:
Nude Oregon St. player tased, busted
 
 
@edgarblythe,

Well, we know that alcohol was the original "ether" and that bit about the nude guy was odd and funny.

This claim has been made before, but it's back.

Adolf Hitler is likely to have had Jewish and African roots, DNA tests have shown.

By Heidi Blake
Published: 6:25AM BST 24 Aug 2010

Now the humor.

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MReV9dkAVhY 

It's also odd that we talked about Charlie Chaplin and The Great Dictator.
 
 
der furher's face is a comic masterpiece to me.
 
 
The Onion CORRECTIONS: Last Sunday, The Onion failed to post the answer to the Kids' Korner brainteaser. The correct way to bring the fox, hen, and sack of corn safely across the river in the two-passenger canoe is to first beat both the fox and hen into unconsciousness with the sack of corn and then take them across the river together, making a second trip to retrieve the corn. The Onion regrets the error.
 
 
My wife knows everything the wife doesn't know.

(Watch it to the end)

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BVMY-VX7NyA 
 
 
@boomerang,

That was a cute one.
 
 
Watching the news, a woman was caught smuggling a tiger cub. It had been sedated and placed among a collection of stuffed animals in her luggage. I have wondered how it received oxygen.
 
 
COLOMBO, Sri Lanka — A Sri Lankan maid returned from her job in Saudi Arabia with 24 nails inside her body — the result of torture by the family who employed her, according to a doctor and a government official.

L.G. Ariyawathi's body is riddled with needles and nails, which are scheduled to be removed Friday, a doctor confirmed.

Ariyawathi, 49, returned to Sri Lanka on Saturday from Saudi Arabia and was hospitalized the next day with severe pain at a facility about 100 miles away from capital, Colombo, according to media reports.

She told a local newspaper that her employers tortured her with the nails as punishment.

"They (employer and his family) did not allow me even to rest. The woman at the house had heated the nails and then the man inserted them into my body," Ariyawathi was quoted as saying in the Lakbima, a newspaper published in local Sinhalese language.

She told the paper that she went to Saudi Arabia in March and was paid only two months' salary, with her employer withholding three months' salary to buy an air ticket to send her home.

Dr. H.K.K. Satharasinghe of Kamburupitiya hospital said X-rays showed Ariyawathi has 24 nails and needles in her body. The nails range from 1-2 inches.

Her initial puncture wounds have healed over, the doctor told The Associated Press by telephone. However, she finds difficult to walk because she has two nails in her knee and two in her ankles.

Another needle is in her forehead, and the rest are in hands, he said.

"Her condition is stable, but we are giving antibiotics and painkillers," Satharasinghe said, adding that doctors will begin removing the nails on Friday.

The 24 nails are "inside the body due to torture meted out by her Saudi employer," Lakshman Yapa Abeywardena, deputy minister of economic development, said in a statement on a government website.

Abeywardena said the government would "report about this matter to the Saudi Government and provide her adequate compensation."

Kalyana Priya Ramanayake, a spokesman for Sri Lanka's Foreign Employment Bureau, said that Ariyawathi had been too afraid to complain about the abuse to Saudi authorities, fearing that her employers might not let her return home.

She also did not report the abuse to Sri Lankan officials, until she was hospitalized.

The bureau is a government agency that oversees the welfare of expatriate workers.

Working as maids or drivers, Sri Lankan workers can earn higher salaries overseas. About 1.5 million Sri Lankans work abroad, nearly 400,000 of them in Saudi Arabia alone.
 
 
How the heck could the thief plead 'not guilty' here?

--------------

at 20:38 on August 24, 2010, EDT.

Gotcha! Camera catches thief in background as NJ family poses for photo at Wis. state capitol

The Associated Press

MADISON, Wis. - The camera of a vacationing New Jersey family who posed for a picture in front of the Wisconsin state capitol captured more than smiles. It also caught a thief in the act.

John Myers, of Bloomfield, N.J., set the self-timer on his camera and hustled into the frame with his wife and two children Saturday. While their backs were turned, someone grabbed their bag, which held Myers' wallet and other items.

After Myers discovered the bag missing, he checked his camera. Sure enough, the image showed a man picking up the bag.

Myers told the Wisconsin State Journal that he showed the photo to officers, who recognized the man.

When officers found him, he was still carrying the bag.

The suspect pleaded not guilty Tuesday to misdemeanour theft.

 link to story 
 
 
